Rapid, optical immunoassay for streptococcal pharyngitis.Defining the limits of office (and home) laboratory testing: rapid streptococcal antigen tests.[Evaluation of a rapid technique for detecting the type A Streptococcus antigen (Test Pack Strep A)].To test a rapid technique of Antigen Detection (TAD) of Type A Betahemolitic Streptococci (BHSA) in Acute Tonsillitis (AT), comparing it with and using as a point of reference traditional Blood Agar Cultivation (BAC). Additionally, the use of Clinical Data as a method of supposed Diagnosis was studied.Prospective observational study. SITE. Health Primary Care (Maspalomas Health Centre).118 patients between the ages of 1 and 71 affected by AT.There was a proportion of 13.56% BHSA in the AT of our sample, with a Confidence Interval (CI) of 95% (7.38-19.74) using the BAC; and 17.80% with a CI of 95% (10.90-24.70) using the TAD. The following values were obtained for the TAD: Sensitivity (S) of 93.75%, Specificity (Sp) of 94.12%, Positive Predictive Value (PPV) of 71.43% and Negative Predictive Value (NPV) of 98.9%. Of the clinical variables studied, only the presence/absence of Exudate and Adenopathies were linked to the presence of BHSA in the Cultivations (p less than 0.05 and p less than 0.01 respectively); with, however, inconclusive S, Sp, PPV and PNV values.We found insufficient correlation between clinical findings and the presence of BHSA to consider it a valid method of supposed diagnosis. There was however a statistical link between the presence of Exudate and local Adenopathies, and a positive result in the cultivation. The TAD is shown to be a rapid method, easy to use, and highly reliable for the discovery of the presence of BHSA in AT.Rapid streptococcal tests.Comparison of LightCycler PCR, rapid antigen immunoassay, and culture for detection of group A streptococci from throat swabs.We compared the performance characteristics of a real-time PCR method, the LightCycler Strep-A assay (Roche Applied Science, Indianapolis, Ind.), to those of a rapid antigen immunoassay, the Directigen 1-2-3 Group A Strep Test kit (BD Diagnostic Systems, Sparks, Md.), and a standard culture method for detection of group A streptococci (GAS) from 384 throat swabs. The LightCycler PCR produced more positive results (n = 58) than either culture (n = 55) or the Directigen immunoassay (n = 31). The results of the LightCycler PCR and the Directigen method were independently compared to the results of the accepted "gold standard," bacterial culture. The sensitivities, specificities, and positive and negative predictive values for this comparison were as follows: for the Directigen method, 55, 99, 97, and 93%, respectively; for the LightCycler PCR, 93, 98, 88, and 99%, respectively. In no case was a throat swab positive by both the LightCycler PCR and the Directigen method but negative by culture. The medical histories of patients whose throat swabs were negative by culture but positive by either the LightCycler PCR (n = 7) or the Directigen method (n = 1) were reviewed. All of these patients had signs or symptoms compatible with GAS disease, and therefore, all of these discordant positive results (along with positive results by either the Directigen method or the LightCycler PCR that agreed with the culture results) were counted as true positives for statistical analysis. For this analysis, the LightCycler PCR detected more true-positive results than the culture method (58 versus 55 swabs); however, this difference was not statistically significant (P = 0.5465). In contrast, statistically significantly more true-positive results occurred by culture than by the Directigen method (55 versus 31 swabs; P < 0.0001) and by the LightCycler PCR than by the Directigen method (58 versus 31 swabs; P < 0.0001). The LightCycler PCR is a suitable stand-alone method for the detection of GAS from throat swabs. Additionally, this method requires less than half the personnel time and the procedure can be completed in considerably less time ( approximately 1 h) than our standard approach (up to 2 days) for detection of GAS in throat swabs (i.e., testing by the Directigen method with negative results verified by culture).Comparison of Directigen Group A Strep Test with a traditional culture technique for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.The Directigen Group A Strep Test (DGAST), a new rapid method of detecting group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from throat swabs, was compared with a traditional culture technique for the detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Five hundred oropharyngeal swabs from pediatric and adult patients were cultured and then processed by using the DGAST. Of the 144 specimens positive by culture, 131 were DGAST positive (sensitivity, 90.9%). Of the 356 specimens negative by culture, 353 were DGAST negative (specificity, 99.2%). Twelve of the 13 false-negative DGAST results were from pediatric patients. One hundred isolates of non-group A beta-hemolytic streptococci were recovered, primarily groups C, F, and G. The DGAST is easy to perform, rapid, sensitive, and very specific for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from swabs. Supplementing the DGAST with a culture on a 5% sheep blood agar plate would enhance detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci, especially in pediatric patients.[A rapid test for tonsillitis/pharyngitis as an aid in the diagnostic arsenal].Rapid detection of group A streptococcal antigen with a new optical immunoassay.Are current rapid detection tests for Group A Streptococci sensitive enough? Evaluation of 2 commercial kits.A new, 1-step, enzyme-linked immunoassay kit for detection of Group A Streptococci (GAS) in throat samples (QuickVue In-Line One-Step Strep A Test; Quidel Corporation, San Diego, CA) was evaluated for use in a study comprising 536 patients in 8 primary healthcare centres. Compared to conventional culture at the clinical microbiology laboratory, the sensitivity achieved was 73.9% and the specificity 86.8%; these figures were not affected to any major extent by broth enrichment of samples before culturing or following PCR testing of the cysteine proteinase gene for independent diagnosis of GAS. It was also found that most samples containing low numbers of GAS were missed by the rapid test. We therefore evaluated the kit in use in our area (TestPack Plus Strep A Test; Abbott Laboratories, Chicago, IL) in a separate study of 615 patients. Somewhat increased sensitivity (82.8%) and specificity (96.1%) were obtained. As current antigen tests depend on subjective judgement of test outcome, improvements in test design or provision of more detailed instructions may be desirable in order to achieve optimal results.[Rapid diagnosis of Streptococcus A angina].Evaluation of a rapid test for group A Streptococcus at a physician's office and hospital laboratory in Buenos Aires, Argentina.Rapid detection of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population with optical immunoassay.Streptococcal pharyngitis in a primary care clinic.A study to determine the sensitivity and specificity of the Directogen Group A Streptococcal Test was carried out in a primary care clinic in University Hospital, Kuala Lumpur. The study also looked at the prevalence of streptococcal pharyngitis in the clinic. We found that the rapid test has a sensitivity of 90.9% and a specificity of 90.7%. Viral pharyngitis is the commonest form (63%) of pharyngitis followed by Group A Beta haemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis (14.2%). The presence of exudates, tonsillar enlargement and the presence of tender cervical lymph nodes have a significantly higher association with streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of an immunochromatographic method for rapid identification of group A streptococcal antigen with culture method.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of Concise Strep A (Hybritech, San Diego, Calif), an immunochromatographic group A streptococcal rapid antigen detection system, with a two-plate culture method for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis, and to evaluate the need for routine back-up culture when this rapid test is used.Throat cultures were obtained from 351 children with acute pharyngitis by duplicate rayon-tipped swabs held in parallel and vigorously rubbed against both tonsils and the posterior pharyngeal wall. One swab was tested for group A streptococcal antigen by a registered licensed laboratory technologist in the pediatrician's office. The other swab was streaked over each of two sheep blood agar plates, one of which was enhanced with trimethoprim in combination with sulfamethoxazole. The plain sheep blood agar plate was then incubated in a candle-extinguish jar. The enhanced agar plate was placed in a gas-pack anaerobic jar. Both plates were incubated for up to 48 hours at 35 degrees C.A six-person group pediatric practice.Three hundred fifty-one children.The Concise Strep A antigen detection test produced 129 positive results. Only six of the 129 were not confirmed by culture method. There were four false-negative rapid streptococcal antigen detection test results, all of which were found after a single overnight incubation. The sensitivity for the Concise Strep A test was 96.9% and the specificity was 97.4%. The plain 5% sheep blood agar plate (without trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole), which was incubated in a candle-extinguish jar, identified 123 (97%) of the 127 positive throat cultures. The second 24-hour incubation and use of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole agar were not rewarding for this study.Concise Strep A, a polyclonal antibody test, in conjunction with a color immunochromatographic assay for soluble streptococcal carbohydrate antigen A appears to be accurate, sensitive, and specific when throat swabs are carefully obtained and when qualified, licensed laboratory technologists perform the procedure. Further studies should be done to confirm our findings, especially when nurses or office staff perform the rapid test procedure in the office setting. If our findings are confirmed, the use of back-up cultures for negative rapid test results obtained using Concise Strep A would be unnecessary.Relationship between the clinical likelihood of group a streptococcal pharyngitis and the sensitivity of a rapid antigen-detection test in a pediatric practice.The sensitivity of a rapid antigen-detection test (RADT) for group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis is critical to whether the test is cost-effective and to whether a confirmatory throat culture is needed. We evaluated a second-generation RADT to determine if its sensitivity varies across the broad clinical spectrum of patients tested for GAS in pediatric outpatient practice.We used laboratory logbooks from a single pediatric clinic to identify 1184 consecutive patient visits at which an RADT was performed. In a blinded chart review, we calculated McIsaac scores to separately estimate the pretest clinical likelihood of GAS pharyngitis for visits at which the RADT result was positive (n = 384) and for visits at which the result proved to be false-negative (n = 65). Positive RADT results were assumed to be true positives, and test sensitivity was estimated by dividing the number of positive results by the sum of positives and false-negatives.As the clinical likelihood of GAS increased, there were stepwise increases in RADT sensitivity (from 0.67 to 0.88). Sensitivity was low (0.73; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.62-0.86) in patients clinically unlikely to have GAS (McIsaac score < or =2) and high (0.94; 95% CI: 0.89-0.99) in patients <15 years old who had tonsillar exudate and no cough. False-negative RADT results were associated with lighter growth of GAS than found on specimens obtained from a random sample of clinic patients who had only primary throat cultures ordered.For pediatric patients who are clinically unlikely to have GAS pharyngitis, as indicated by a McIsaac score < or =2, the sensitivity of a second-generation RADT may drop below thresholds reported for cost-effectiveness. For children who have tonsillar exudate and no cough, the test may be sensitive enough to meet current pediatric practice guidelines for stand-alone testing.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of a kit for the rapid detection of group A streptococci.A rapid immunoassay method using an Event Test Strip Strep A experimental kit (Boehringer Mannheim) was evaluated. Results obtained were compared with culture results to evaluate the accuracy of detection of group A streptococci directly from throat swabs or from artificial swabs containing various bacterial concentrations. A good diagnostic accuracy was obtained with a sensitivity of 96.9% in the assay of throat swabs which provided more than ten group A Streptococcus colonies per plate. Since a low level of micro-organisms may indicate infection, it is recommended that a culture be performed when the rapid test based on antigen detection is negative.[Evaluation of the diagnostic reagents which detect group A Streptococcus with the immunochromatographical method].Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was evaluated for this sensitivity and specificity. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A had a capacity to detect Group A Streptococcus in 1.5x10(5) cfu/swab. The sensitivity of Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was 4 times higher than the sensitivity of the latex agglutination test (Serodirect 'Eiken' Strep A) and was almost the same as the immunochromatography test (TESTPACK Plus STREP A, CLEARVIEW STREP A and ImmunoCard STAT! STREP A TEST). No cross reaction was observed among 27 strains of 25 species microorganisms with Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was compared with TESTPACK Plus STREP A among throat swabs from 50 patients with pharyngitis. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A had a sensitivity of 92.9%, a specificity of 90.5% and an agreement of 91.8%. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A is found to be useful diagnostic assay in the clinical laboratories.The utility of rapid antigen detection testing for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in low-resource settings.To evaluate the utility of rapid antigen detection testing (RADT) for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis in pediatric outpatient clinics in four countries with varied socio-economic and geographic profiles.We prospectively evaluated the utility of a commercial RADT in children aged 2-12 years presenting with symptoms of pharyngitis to urban outpatient clinics in Brazil, Croatia, Egypt, and Latvia between August 2001 and December 2005. We compared the performance of the RADT to culture using diagnostic and agreement statistics, including sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values. The Centor scores for GAS diagnosis were used to assess the potential effect of spectrum bias on RADT results.Two thousand four hundred and seventy-two children were enrolled at four sites. The prevalence of GAS by throat culture varied by country (range 24.5-39.4%) and by RADT (range 23.9-41.8%). Compared to culture, RADT sensitivity ranged from 72.4% to 91.8% and specificity ranged from 85.7% to 96.4%. The positive predictive value ranged from 67.9% to 88.6% and negative predictive value ranged from 88.1% to 95.7%.In limited-resource regions where microbiological diagnosis is not feasible or practical, RADTs should be considered an option that can be performed in a clinic and provide timely results.[Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis].Evaluation of streptococcal clinical scores, rapid antigen detection tests and cultures for childhood pharyngitis.Use of selective vs standard sheep blood agar for the diagnosis of hemolytic streptococcus group A pharyngitis.[Streptococcal pharyngitis in the pediatric emergency department: value and impact of rapid antigen detection test].The French Health Agency (Afssaps) recommands the resort to the streptocoque rapid test strip for a better targetting of antibiotics prescription.To evaluate the systematic use of the test in a pediatric emergengy department.Comparison of results of the test to the laboratory cultures. Our study took place between January and December 2004. Two thousand one hundred (and) forty-four children with acute pharyngitis have been included (mean age: 4.8+/-3.6 years).Group A streptococcus was involved in 57 pharyngitis (26%). Mean age of children with positive culture was 7+/-3 years versus 4+/-3 years if culture was negative (p>0.05). The test sensitivity was 77% (CI 95%: 65-86) and its specificity 82% (CI 95%: 75-87), the positive predictive value was 60% (CI 95%: 49-71) and the negative predictive value 91% (CI 95%: 85-95). Antibiotic prescriptions have diminished: no prescription for 70% of pharyngitis and for 93% if cultures were negative.The rapid test strip wide use has a strong repercussion on the antibiotics prescription. This test is realist in pediatric emergency unit.Point-of-care testing of group A streptococcal antigen: performance evaluated by external quality assessment.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the overall performance of rapid antigen detection (RAD) in group A streptococcus (GAS) in Finland by using the results of external quality assurance (EQA) samples. We also compared the performance of laboratory professionals to that of nursing professionals. Around 22,800 EQA results among a total of 383 laboratories and physician's offices were analysed. Vocational data on the personnel who carried out the tests were available for 10,088 EQA samples, 7,428 of which were tested by laboratory technicians and 2,531 by nursing staff. The best overall performance was found with GAS-negative samples: 99% of the reports were correct. In contrast, the overall performance was only 76% when the samples were weakly positive for GAS antigen. The laboratory technicians performed statistically significantly better than the nursing staff, with both strongly positive (correct results 98.9% vs. 95.1%, respectively; p<0.001) and weakly positive (79.3% vs. 65.3%, respectively; p<0.001) samples. With negative samples, no difference in performance between the laboratory and nursing staff was found (99.5% vs. 99.0%, respectively). The professional skills of the person performing the RAD test for GAS have a major impact on the sensitivity of the test. Based on the results of this study, we suggest that EQA-like artificial specimens could be used as a tool to improve and validate the quality of RAD testing in individual testing sites.Performance characteristics and utilization of rapid antigen test, DNA probe, and culture for detection of group a streptococci in an acute care clinic.Group A streptococcus (GAS) antigen testing has become a routine point-of-care (POC) test in acute care settings. Concern about performance parameters (PP) of these tests as well as inappropriate antibiotic use has resulted in various recommendations regarding diagnosis of GAS. There were two objectives in this study. The first was to evaluate the rapid GAS antigen test presently in use (Thermo BioStar, Boulder, Colo.) and the GAS Direct probe test (Gen-Probe, San Diego, Calif.) compared to culture. The second was to define the optimal use of these technologies in a large acute care pediatric clinic. A total of 520 consecutive pediatric patients presenting with symptoms of pharyngitis at any of three Lahey Clinic acute care facilities were evaluated. Pharyngeal specimens were collected using a double-swab collection device (Copan, Corona, Calif.). One swab was used for the antigen test, the second was used for the probe test, and the pledget was placed in the collection device for culture on 5% sheep blood agar, incubated for 48 h anaerobically, and subsequently placed in Todd-Hewitt broth. After discrepant analysis, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were as follows: 94.8, 100, 100, and 96.9% for the probe test and 86.1, 97.1, 93.7, and 93.4% for the antigen test, respectively. Sensitivity using an enhanced culture technique was 99.4% (163 of 164). False-positive (FP) antigen results were often seen from patients previously diagnosed and/or treated for GAS. No FP results were seen with the probe test. Colony counts for the false-negative (FN) antigen tests were higher than those for the FN probe tests. Compared to culture and DNA probe, the rapid antigen test (RAT) offered a result at the time of the patient's visit, with acceptable PP when prevalence of disease is high. Follow-up testing with the RAT of GAS patients who previously tested as positive should be avoided due to increased FP results. The probe test was comparable to culture in performance. Results indicate the probe test can be used as the primary test or as a backup to negative antigen tests. The probe test offers the advantage over culture of same-day reporting of a final result but, in contrast to a POC test, necessitates follow-up communication to the patient. Preliminary data show the specificity of the probe test to be greater than that of the RAT for patients previously diagnosed with GAS.[Fast diagnostic tests in the management of group A beta-heamolytic streptococcal pharyngitis].Routine clinical diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes in pharyngitis is not always easy. The use in common practice of rapid diagnosis test (RDT), might offer a best control of the antibiotic treatments. The aim of this study is to present seven rapid diagnosis tests, to assess their feasibility and finally to determine the bacteriological correlation.We propose to compare the results obtained with seven RDT, and to assess their interest in medical diagnosis for group A streptococcus pharyngitis. A prospective study was conducted for three months, a RDT was performed for children (n=75) between eight and fourteen years old presenting acute pharyngitis. Several throat sampling were performed to order cultures.The group A streptococcus was isolated in 33% (n=25) of throat sampling. Comparing cultures results, and for all studied tests, we obtained comparable performances with manufacturer data, specificity upper than 94% and sensitivity upper than 88%.All assessed RDT may offer to physicians a decision-making tool for rapid diagnosis. However, because of its complexity, the agglutination test can be used only in pathology laboratories.[Strep A test and ear irrigation].[Rapid technics for antigen detection in acute streptococcal pharyngitis].[Predictive value of rapid antigenic technics in the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngitis].Use of plastic kits for rapid recovery of streptococci in epidemiological studies.Evaluation of two ELISA tests for the rapid detection of group A streptococci.We examined 579 oropharyngeal swab specimens from children presenting with pharyngitis in order to compare two rapid diagnostic ELISA tests for group A streptococcal antigen: the TestPack Strep A (TPSA), and the Direct Strep A EIA (DSAE), with an anaerobically incubated sheep blood agar culture. The sensitivities of the methods were respectively 60.8% (TPSA) and 64.4% (DSAE), the specificities 98.3% (TPSA) and 93.2% (DSAE), the positive predictive values 88.6% (TPSA) and 70.3% (DSAE) and the negative predictive values 92.0% (TPSA) and 91.2% (DSAE). We conclude that the TPSA is easy to interpret and is sufficiently specific to initiate treatment in patients with a positive test. It is not sufficiently sensitive to ensure negative or intermediate results. The performance of the DSAE test is similar but the specificity is slightly lower and more false positive results occur.Acute pharyngitis: no reliability of rapid streptococcal tests and clinical findings.Rapid streptococcal tests.Value of new rapid tests for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Enzyme fluorescence procedure for rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Sensitivity of a rapid antigen detection test for group A streptococci in a private pediatric office setting: answering the Red Book's request for validation.In the office laboratory of our private practice, the sensitivity of a single rapid antigen detection (RAD) test for group A streptococci (compared with backup throat culture) was examined over 3 winter periods. When cultures were held only 24 hours, the sensitivity was 92%; in the second period, when cultures were held to 48 hours, the sensitivity declined significantly to 86%; when the cultures were read without knowledge of the RAD test result, the sensitivity was 85%. As the Red Book Committee has suggested, physician office laboratories should validate the sensitivity of their RAD test against culture onto blood agar before abandoning the backup throat culture.Effect of using 2 throat swabs vs 1 throat swab on detection of group A streptococcus by a rapid antigen detection test.To assess the effect of using 2 throat swabs vs 1 on rapid detection of group A streptococcus by the STREP A OIA MAX (hereafter, OIA MAX) test.Children aged 5 to 18 years with acute pharyngitis were randomized to 1 of 2 study groups. In group 1, one throat swab was obtained, streaked first on sheep blood agar, and then used for OIA MAX testing. In group 2, two throat swabs were obtained simultaneously. One swab was streaked first on sheep blood agar and then joined with the other swab for OIA MAX testing. In both groups, the pledgets in the collection-transport tube were incubated in Todd-Hewitt broth. A positive group A streptococcus culture either by sheep blood agar or Todd-Hewitt broth was confirmed by a latex agglutination test.Three hundred sixty-three patients were enrolled, 177 in group 1 and 186 in group 2. Cultures were positive for group A streptococcus in 154 (42.4%) of 363 patients. The sensitivity and specificity of OIA MAX testing were 94.7% and 100.0%, respectively, in group 1, and 92.4% and 96.3%, respectively, in group 2. There was no statistical difference between the sensitivity, the specificity, and the predictive values of the OIA MAX test performed with 1 swab compared with those performed with 2 swabs (P>.10). There was no association between OIA MAX test sensitivity and the severity of pharyngitis as measured by the modified Centor criterion (history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal or tonsillar exudates, and presence of cervical lymphadenopathy) scores.The OIA MAX test yielded comparable sensitivity and specificity in both study groups. The use of 2 throat swabs instead of 1 swab did not increase the sensitivity of the OIA MAX test. The performance of the OIA MAX test did not depend on the severity of pharyngitis.Evaluation of a new immunologic test kit for rapid detection of group A streptococci, the Abbott Testpack Strep A plus.We compared the Testpack Strep A plus (TPSAP) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GAS) antigen rapid detection with blood agar culture in 454 pediatric patients with clinical pharyngitis. Of the 454 patients, 118 (25.9%) had positive oropharyngeal cultures for GAS. TPSAP sensitivity was 89.9% (106 of 118) and specificity was 95.8% (322 of 336). We conclude that the TPSAP is specific enough to indicate treatment for a patient with a positive test but that a negative test should be confirmed by culture.[New methods for the group identification of beta-hemolytic Streptococci].Comparison of the Inverness Medical Acceava Strep A test with the Genzyme OSOM and Quidel QuickVue Strep A tests.Previous studies of the accuracy of rapid in-office tests for group A Streptococcus had disparate results, ranging from sensitivity of 70% to more than 90%. The sensitivity and specificity of 3 commercially available Strep A tests were determined in 2 private pediatric office settings. Acceava Strep A, Genzyme OSOM Strep A, and the Quidel QuickVue Strep A tests were the representative rapid tests for detection of Streptococcus pyogenes. Overnight culture on standard 5% sheep blood agar was the reference standard for this study. All 3 CLIA (Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments)-waived tests had sensitivities and specificities that exceeded 95%.[Comparative analysis of clinical and laboratory methods for diagnosing streptococcal sore throat].Diagnosis and correct treatment of group A streptococcal sore throat is important particularly to prevent non-suppurative sequelae. Clinical findings continue to be used to differentiate streptococcal infection from viral sore throat. The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that streptococcal sore throat diagnosis should always be performed by microbiological identification methods. The aim of this study is to evaluate the accuracy of clinical diagnosis in comparison with culture and rapid test.Children aged 2 to 13 years who had received a clinical diagnosis of sore throat and sought treatment at the pediatric emergency unit of São Paulo Santa Casa were evaluated and those with clinical signs or viral infection were excluded. Clinical findings were recorded and swabs were taken for group A Streptococcus cultures and a Streptococcus rapid test.The culture was positive in 96 (24.4%) of the 376 children evaluated. The presence of petechiae, purulent exudate and painful tonsils were more likely to occur in children with positive streptococcus cultures, however they exhibited low diagnostic accuracy. The doctors' subjective evaluation failed to identify 21% of positive cases and antibiotics were prescribed in 47% of negative cases, compared with 3 and 6%, respectively, for the rapid test.A microbiologic method is necessary for the correct prescription of antibiotics in children with streptococcal sore throat.Optical immunoassay for streptococcal pharyngitis: evaluation of accuracy with routine and mucoid strains associated with acute rheumatic fever outbreak in the intermountain area of the United States.The Strep A OIA (BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.) rapid detection system is an intriguing technology that utilizes an immunoassay relying on changes in reflected light to directly detect group A streptococcal antigen from specimens. In this evaluation, 424 routine pediatric throat specimens and 20 simulated oropharyngeal specimens with added mucoid (M type 3, 18) strains were cultured and tested by the Strep A OIA. The respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: Strep A OIA versus enhanced broth culturing, 84.2 and 95.7%; and streptococcus-SXT agar (BBL Microbiology Systems, Cockeysville, Md.) culturing versus enhanced broth culturing, 82.9 and 98.6%. The Strep A OIA is an 8-min, technologist-friendly, accurate technique with an 89.4% agreement with traditional culturing.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis with enzyme immunoassay.From June 1988 to May 1989, 444 throat swab specimens were tested with an enzyme immunoassay kit for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. The results were compared with those of throat culture method. The rapid test was positive in 37 of 42 culture-positive specimens and negative in 379 of 402 culture-negative specimens, thus yielding a total agreement of 93.7%, sensitivity 88.1%, specificity 94.7%, positive predictive value 61.7%, negative predictive value 98.7%. According to this practical application, we suggest that enzyme immunoassay test can be applied in outpatient clinics by busy pediatricians for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Diagnostic accuracy of a rapid antigen test for GABHS performed by nurses in a pediatric ED.Rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Use of antigen detection tests in the diagnosis and management of patients with group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of an optical immunoassay technique with two culture methods for the detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric office.For detecting group A beta-hemolytic streptococci in an office setting, an optical immunoassay method was compared with two culture methods. The sensitivity and specificity of OIA as compared with 5% sheep blood agar cultures were 91.4% and 95.6%, and as compared with a Todd-Hewitt broth method were 90.4% and 94.1%, respectively.[Basic and clinical evaluation of the new rapid diagnostic kit for detecting group A streptococci with the immunochromatographical method].Basic and clinical performance of a new diagnostic kit that detects Group A Streptococci by an immunochromatographical method, QuickVue Dipstick Strep A (Quidel Corporation; San Diego, CA) were evaluated. In basic specificity study, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed positive reaction only to group A Streptococci strains among 34 strains of 10 species of bacteria. In detection limit study, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A had a capacity to detect Group A Streptococci in 1.0 x 10(4); cfu/ml (1.0 x 10(3) cfu/test). This sensitivity was about 6 times higher than that of the existing similar immunochromatographical test, STREP A TESTPACK Plus (TESTPACK, Abbott Japan, Tokyo). In clinical study compared with bacterial culture test using 100 patients' throat swab specimens, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed a sensitivity of 94.4% (34/36), a specificity of 100% (64/64) and an accuracy of 98% (98/100). Furthermore in correlation study with the reference test, TESTPACK, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed 100% agreement (34 positive and 66 negative specimens). As the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A has several advantages as not only simple operation, rapid reaction and good performance but also easy storage (under room temperature), compact size and minimum waste products, we conclude that this new test is useful as Point-of-Care Testing kit and plays a peripheral role in the diagnosis of Group A Streptococci infection and pertinent medical treatment by antibacterial agents.[Performances of rapid antigen detection kits for group A Streptococcus].The group A streptococcus rapid antigen detection kits used to test throat swabs are frequently used by doctors for the screening of pharyngitis caused by bacteria. The Swiss Centre for Quality Control (CSCQ) has organised External Quality Assessment Schemes (EQAS) for these kits since 1997. From 2004 to 2008, negative, positive, and moderate positive antigen containing samples were sent to the laboratories. After analysing the samples, 7749 results obtained with more than 14 different test kits were returned to the CSCQ. The correct results ranged between 84.8 and 99.8% which shows that all the test kits gave good results during the EQAS. However, in case of a negative result with clinical suspicion of a bacterial pharyngitis, the result is to be confirmed by culture.Group A streptococcus-associated upper respiratory tract infections in a day-care center.Little information is available about the epidemiology of group A streptococcal upper respiratory tract infections in child day-care centers. During an initial 3-month period, symptomatic upper respiratory tract infections associated with throat cultures or rapid antigen detection tests positive for group A streptococci developed in 55 of 214 (26%) children and adult staff in one day-care center. When the entire day-care center population (except for those receiving antibiotics at the time) was then surveyed, 52 of 146 (36%) children and two of 24 (8%) adult staff had throat cultures positive for group A streptococci. Of the 54 group A streptococcal isolates found during the survey, the three most frequently encountered serotypes were M2,T2/28 (35%), M3,T3/13 (30%), and M-NT, T25 (20%). Rapid antigen detection was performed at the same time as the throat culture in the first 98 individuals examined during the culture survey but was positive in only 11 (35%) of 31 individuals with positive throat cultures. Sensitivity of the rapid antigen test was related to degree of positivity of the throat culture but not to age. The overall group A streptococcal positivity rate was 49% for 187 children and 33% for 27 adult staff; 18 of 66 (27%) children younger than 31/2 years of age were found to have group A streptococci in their upper respiratory tracts. This is the first report of high prevalence rates of group A streptococci associated with upper respiratory tract infections in a day-care center. The group A Streptococcus may represent a significant upper respiratory tract pathogen in the day-care setting.Empirical validation of guidelines for the management of pharyngitis in children and adults.Recent guidelines for management of pharyngitis vary in their recommendations concerning empirical antibiotic treatment and the need for laboratory confirmation of group A streptococcus (GAS).To assess the impact of guideline recommendations and alternative approaches on identification and treatment of GAS pharyngitis in children and adults.Throat cultures and rapid antigen tests were performed on 787 children and adults aged 3 to 69 years with acute sore throat attending a family medicine clinic in Calgary, Alberta, from September 1999 to August 2002. Recommendations from 2 guidelines (those of the Infectious Diseases Society of America and of the American College of Physicians-American Society of Internal Medicine/American Academy of Family Physicians/US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention) were compared with rapid testing alone, a clinical prediction rule (ie, the modified Centor score), and a criterion standard of treatment for positive throat culture results only.Sensitivity and specificity of each strategy for identifying GAS pharyngitis, total antibiotics recommended, and unnecessary antibiotic prescriptions.In children, sensitivity for streptococcal infection ranged from 85.8% (133/155; 95% confidence interval [CI], 79.3%-90.0%) for rapid testing to 100% for culturing all. In adults, sensitivity ranged from 76.7% (56/73; 95% CI, 65.4%-85.8%) for rapid testing without culture confirmation of negative results to 100% for culturing all. In children, specificity ranged from 90.3% (270/299; 95% CI, 86.4%-93.4%) for use of modified Centor score and throat culture to 100% for culturing all. In adults, specificity ranged from 43.8% (114/260; 95% CI, 37.7%-50.1%) for empirical treatment based on a modified Centor score of 3 or 4 to 100% for culturing all. Total antibiotic prescriptions were lowest with rapid testing (24.7% [194/787]; 95% CI, 21.7%-27.8%) and highest with empirical treatment of high-risk adults (45.7% [360/787]; 95% CI, 42.2%-49.3%), due to a high rate of unnecessary prescriptions in adults (43.8% [146/333]; 95% CI, 38.4%-49.4%).Guideline recommendations for the selective use of throat cultures but antibiotic treatment based only on positive rapid test or throat culture results can reduce unnecessary use of antibiotics for treatment of pharyngitis. However, empirical treatment of adults having a Centor score of 3 or 4 is associated with a high rate of unnecessary antibiotic use. In children, strategies incorporating throat culture or throat culture confirmation of negative rapid antigen test results are highly sensitive and specific. Throat culture of all adults or those selected on the basis of a clinical prediction rule had the highest sensitivity and specificity.Towards a better diagnosis of throat infections (with group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus) in general practice.Sore throat is a common complaint in general practice. However, management strategies are not very clear. A better diagnostic procedure is needed to prevent the overuse of antibiotics.To assess the diagnostic value of a rapid streptococcal antigen detection test in addition to four clinical features in patients with sore throat, using throat culture and antibody titres as reference tests.Four clinical features [fever (history) > or = 38.0 degrees C, lack of cough, tonsillar exudate, and anterior cervical lymphadenopathy] were registered in 558 patients aged 4 to 60 years presenting with sore throat of no more than 14 days' duration. A rapid diagnostic test was performed, as well as a throat culture and antibody titres [fourfold increase in anti-streptolysin-O (ASO) and/or anti-deoxyribonuclease B (anti-DNAase B)] in patients aged 11 years and older.Throat cultures were positive for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS) in 33% of the patients. Rapid tests were positive in 24%. Compared with the throat culture, the sensitivity of the rapid test was 65%, the specificity 96%, the positive predictive value 88%, and the negative predictive value 85%. However, for patients with three or four clinical features, the sensitivity of the rapid test was considerably higher at 75%. Children (< or = 14 years) had a slightly raised specificity and raised positive predictive value and prevalence. With the antibody titres as a reference, the rapid test performed as well as the throat culture with regard to its predictive value.For the management of patients with sore throat in general practice, a rapid test may have an additional value, especially in patients with a high chance of having GABHS infection. However, as the sensitivity of the test studied is low, tests with a higher sensitivity are needed.A comparison of the BioStar Strep A OIA rapid antigen assay, group A Selective Strep Agar (ssA), and Todd-Hewitt broth cultures for the detection of group A Streptococcus in an outpatient family practice setting.In some studies the BioStar Strep A OIA (optical immunoassay) has yielded inconsistent results, although originally it was reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture for the detection of group A Streptococcus (GAS). The Group A Selective Strep Agar with 5% sheep blood (ssA) incubated anaerobically has been reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture in the detection of GAS. We compared the BioStar Strep A OIA GAS rapid antigen detection kit to anaerobic culture on ssA with and without preincubation in Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) for the detection of GAS. From September 1995 through January 1996, throat swabs were collected in duplicate from 75 children (< or = 18 years) and 188 adults (> 18 years) who presented with pharyngitis in the outpatient University of New Mexico Family Practice Clinic. Thirty-one (12%) of the 263 cases were positive for GAS by culture and/or broth. Compared with anaerobic culture on the ssA, with and without preincubation in THB, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the BioStar Strep A OIA were 77, 62, 22, and 95%, respectively. Compared with enrichment in THB followed by subculture on ssA and anaerobic incubation, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of direct culture on ssA and anaerobic incubation were 79, 99, 98, and 96%, respectively. All isolates were serologically grouped. The BioStar Strep A OIA is as sensitive as direct culture on ssA incubated anaerobically, but the low specificity and low positive predictive value when the OIA is used in low prevalence populations could lead to unnecessary antibiotic treatment.Clinical utility of a new rapid test for the detection of group A Streptococcus and discriminate use of antibiotics for bacterial pharyngitis in an outpatient setting.To evaluate the clinical usefulness of the Diaquick Strep. A Test (SAT) as a rapid streptococcal antigen test, and its effect on antibiotic use in children.This was a prospective study of children with acute catarrh, fever, and acutely inflamed throat/tonsils. Paired throat swabs for SAT and culture were collected. None of the children received antibiotics prior to testing.Five hundred and five children were included in the study: 278 were boys (55%) and 409 (81%) were aged under 5 years. The SAT was negative in 434 cases (86%) and positive in 71 (14%); culture was negative in 425 cases (84%) and positive in 80 (16%), including nine cultures that grew bacteria other than group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GAS). Both the SAT and culture were negative in 422 cases (84%) and positive in 68 (13%), but were inconsistent in 15 cases (3%). For GAS infection, the SAT positive predictive value was 95.8% (68/71). The negative predictive value for the whole group as well as for children under five years of age was over 99% (422/425 and 355/358, respectively). SAT sensitivity was almost 96%. Finally, only 74 children (15%) were given antibiotics, while a staggering 431 (85%) were not.The Diaquick Strep. A Test (SAT) is a quick, reliable, and clinically useful test, which could help to dramatically reduce the usage of antibiotics in children with fever, catarrh, and acute pharyngotonsillitis.Effect of a rapid diagnostic method on prescribing patterns and ordering of throat cultures for streptococcal pharyngitis.The sensitivity and specificity of a rapid identification test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus and its impact on prescribing antibiotics and ordering throat cultures were evaluated in a primary care office setting. The calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 82 percent, 92 percent, 76 percent, and 94 percent, respectively. Throat cultures were ordered for 98 percent of patients with acute pharyngitis regardless of the method of testing available. After use of the rapid identification test within the office, a reduction was observed in physician prescribing of antibiotics before the throat culture results were known. Physicians were more likely to initiate antibiotics immediately when rapid test results for streptococcal infection were positive and provide patient education regarding symptomatic treatment when the results were negative. The rapid identification test is an acceptable alternative to the standard culture technique in the family practice office. The rapid test was apparently responsible for the observed reduction in antibiotic prescribing and should reduce unnecessary cost and antibiotic exposure in the ambulatory setting.The role of point of care testing for patients with acute pharyngitis.There is no consensus favoring a particular strategy for evaluating patients with pharyngitis.To compare a clinical decision aid and a rapid office-based point of care (POC) test with routine culture for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS).Prospective observational study.Among 179 patients enrolled, 150 were eligible and 148 had POC testing and cultures initially performed.An encounter form included eligibility criteria, clinical information based upon the Centor rule, and treatment provided. Sensitivity and specificity of POC test compared to routine culture for GAS.Thirty-eight patients (25.7%) had a positive GAS culture. The POC test was 92.1% sensitive (95% confidence interval [CI] 80% to 98%) and 100% specific (95% CI 97% to 100%). Although the Centor rule did not adequately discriminate among symptomatic patients with or without GAS (receiver operating curve area 0.63), the 3 patients with a false-negative POC test had a Centor score of less than 2. Among patients with a negative POC test, 26% initially received antibiotics.For patients with a Centor score of > or =2, a POC test was highly sensitive for GAS. Future studies should confirm these results and assess whether implementation of POC testing as part of a local practice guideline can decrease variability in testing and treatment.Rapid office diagnostic tests for streptococcal pharyngitis.Effects of a rapid antigen test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis on physician prescribing and antibiotic costs.Decision analysis and opinion survey suggest that introduction of rapid antigen detection tests should decrease the number of patients with negative test results for group A streptococcal pharyngitis treated by antibiotics. We reviewed all cases in which a test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis was performed during the last 7 months of culture diagnosis and the first 7 months of antigen test diagnosis at an inner city community health center, recording culture or antigen test results, whether antibiotics were prescribed, and patient status (as regular health center patients or patients referred to the center). Positive rates for culture and antigen-test periods were similar (10% and 12%), but 53% of patients with negative culture were treated, where only 32% of patients with negative antigen-test results received prescriptions. Significant reductions in the treatment of patients with negative test results were found in both patient-status subpopulations: health center patients, 43% to 29%; referred patients, 91% to 52%. Among health center patients reductions were consistent for both adult (30% to 21%) and child and adolescent (55% to 45%) age groups. For all patients with negative test results, direct costs of diagnostic reagents and antibiotic prescriptions fell from $3.58 per patient with culture to $3.45 with antigen testing; the $0.13 savings per patient was due to less treatment of referred patients. Thus, rapid antigen testing led to (1) significantly fewer patients with negative test results receiving antibiotic prescriptions; and, (2) savings in antibiotic costs offsetting reagent cost of antigen detection diagnosis.Diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus using clinical scoring criteria, Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test, and culture.Cultures for group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus were performed on 806 patients presenting with a sore throat to five urgent care centers. The accuracies of a clinical scoring system and of a liposomal in-office direct test for Streptococcus were compared with culture results. The Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test had a sensitivity of 67%, a specificity of 85%, a positive predictive value of 61%, and a negative predictive value of 89% compared with culture. The scoring system had a sensitivity of 26%, a specificity of 94%, a positive predictive value of 58%, and a negative predictive value of 79%. Using a combination of the direct test results and the clinical score did not improve the accuracy significantly over the use of either alone. The rates of delayed treatment, unnecessary treatment, and increased costs were compared using different combinations of the clinical scoring system, the in-office streptococcal test, and culture. Neither the Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test nor the clinical score can replace culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.[Comparative study of 2 rapid antigenic technics for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis].Spectrum bias of a rapid antigen detection test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population.Rapid antigen detection testing (RADT) is often performed for diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis among children. Among adults, the sensitivity of this test varies on the basis of disease severity (spectrum bias). A similar phenomenon may occur when this test is used in a pediatric population, which may affect the need for culture confirmation of all negative RADT results.To assess the performance of a clinical scoring system and to determine whether RADT spectrum bias is present among children who are evaluated for GABHS pharyngitis.Laboratory and clinical records for a consecutive series of pediatric patients who underwent RADT at the Marshfield Clinic between January 2002 and March 2002 were reviewed retrospectively. Patients were stratified according to the number of clinical features present by using modified Centor criteria, ie, history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal exudates, and cervical lymphadenopathy. The sensitivity of the RADT was defined as the number of patients with positive RADT results divided by the number of patients with either positive RADT results or negative RADT results but positive throat culture results.RADT results were positive for 117 of 561 children (21%), and culture results were positive for 35 of 444 children (8%) with negative RADT results. The overall prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 27% (95% confidence interval: 23-31%). The prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 18% among patients with 0 Centor criteria, 16% among those with 1 criterion, 32% among those with 2 criteria, and 50% among those with 3 or 4 criteria. Spectrum bias was present, inasmuch as RADT sensitivity increased with Centor scores, ie, 47% sensitivity among children with 0 Centor criteria, 65% among those with 1 criterion, 82% among those with 2 criteria, and 90% among those with 3 or 4 criteria.The sensitivity of RADT for GABHS pharyngitis is not a fixed value but varies with the severity of disease. However, even among pediatric patients with > or =3 Centor criteria for GABHS pharyngitis, the sensitivity of RADT is still too low to support the use of RADT without culture confirmation of negative results.Rapid antibody capture assay for detection of group-A streptococci using monoclonal antibody and colloidal gold-monospecific polyvalent antibody conjugate.A rapid one step, sensitive and specific antibody capture assay for detection of group-A streptococci from the throat swabs of children is described. Monoclonal antibody either MA-106 or MA-107 specific for group-A streptococci polysaccharide (APS) was used as the capture antibody on nitrocellulose paper and rabbit monospecific polyvalent antibody conjugated with colloidal gold to detect the presence of antigen. The lower detection limit of this assay is 15.6ng APS/ml. The assay is specific for APS and failed to recognize polysaccharides obtained from group-B,-C,-G streptococci as well as Staphylococcus aureus. Antigen extracted from throat swabs of children who were positive for beta-hemolytic plaques (other than group-A streptococci) as seen on blood agar culture gave negative readings, thereby confirming the specificity of the assay for APS.[Rapid diagnosis of the group A streptococcal infection--comparison with culture method, latex agglutination and enzyme immunoassay].Rapid detection of group A streptococci on throat swabs.Value of rapid tests for the detection of streptococcal infections.Quality of care in the retail health care setting using national clinical guidelines for acute pharyngitis.Rates of adherence to an acute pharyngitis practice guideline in the retail clinic setting were measured as an indicator of clinical quality. An analysis of 57,331 patient visits for the evaluation of acute pharyngitis was conducted. In 39,530 patients with a negative rapid strep test result, nurse practitioner and physician assistant staff adhered to guidelines in 99.05% of cases by withholding unnecessary antibiotics. Of 13,471 patients with a positive rapid strep test result, 99.75% received an appropriate antibiotic prescription. The combined guideline adherence rate for groups with positive and negative rapid strep test results was 99.15%. Strep cultures were performed on 99.1% of patients with a negative rapid strep test result, and 96.2% of patients with a positive culture were treated with an antibiotic. Finally, 0.95% of patients with a negative rapid strep test result were provided an antibiotic outside clinical guidelines; however, approximately half of these prescriptions (n = 190) were supported by documentation of clinical concerns for which an antibiotic was a reasonable choice.["When throats are visiting...." A profitable business for a rapid test?].Impact of rapid streptococcal test on antibiotic use in a pediatric emergency department.Acute pharyngitis is commonly seen in children. Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus is the most common bacterial cause of acute pharyngitis and accounts for approximately 15% to 30% of cases in children, but this condition is generally overdiagnosed and overtreated. The availability of rapid streptococcal tests (RSTs) have made this diagnosis simpler and reduced the use of antibiotics. Overuse of antibiotics leads to drug-resistant bacterial strains. Reducing the number of antibiotic prescriptions provided for upper respiratory tract infections has been strongly recommended to limit bacterial resistance.To assess the impact of RSTs on antibiotic prescriptions in children with pharyngitis in the emergency department.A retrospective study from September 2005 to September 2007 of all patients (3-18 years old) presenting to the pediatric emergency department with sore throat as the chief complaint or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis and who had an RST performed. Patients with a negative RST result had a culture performed. The information of the patients with the diagnosis of pharyngitis was also collected in a 2-year control period before the availability of the test. Patients with a negative RST result had a culture performed. In addition, the antibiotic prescriptions for these patients were also recorded.A total of 8280 patients were included in the study. Throat culture results of 1723 patients were reviewed in the pre-RST phase. During the post-RST phase, 6557 children underwent RST. The RST results were positive in 1474 children (22.5%) and negative in 5083 patients (77.5%). Rapid strep testing was associated with a lower antibiotic prescription rate for children with pharyngitis (41.38% for those treated in the pre-RST phase versus 22.45% for those treated in the post-RST phase; P < 0.001).The availability of a RST could substantially reduce the unnecessary prescription of antibiotics. This study supports the screening of all children with pharyngitis by performing an RST to guide decision making for antibiotic administration. This strategy has a significant impact on reducing the antibiotic prescription rate to almost 50%. In addition, only 2 children (0.04%) had negative rapid antigen test results with cultures positive for Streptococcus.Suitability of a throat culture method for evaluation of group A streptococcal antigen detection kits.Previous reports have indicated a wide variation in observed sensitivity of antigen-detection kits for group A streptococci. Before undertaking an evaluation of these new kits, the sensitivity of the throat culture technic routinely used by this laboratory was reexamined. Each throat swab was directly inoculated to sheep blood agar containing trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole (SXT X BA) and drug-free sheep blood agar (SBA) plates. Swabs were then washed in saline and the saline used to inoculate one more of each type of medium. SXT X BA cultures were incubated aerobically (5 to 10% CO2), and SBA cultures were incubated anaerobically, both for two days at 35 degrees C. From 726 patients, 164 (22.6%) of the specimens contained group A streptococci, 99% detected on directly inoculated cultures and 100% on cultures inoculated with the saline wash. Either an aerobically (CO2) incubated SXT X BA or an anaerobically incubated SBA, directly inoculated and held for two days, appears to offer a satisfactory reference culture method for the recovery of group A streptococci.Direct detection of groups A, C and G streptococci in clinical specimens by a trivalent colour test.A simple trivalent colour test, developed for the rapid detection and identification of streptococci belonging to Lancefield groups A, C and G, was evaluated for sensitivity and specificity with cultures and when directly used with wound and throat swabs. In tests performed on cultures, all of 94 group A, 78 group C and 94 group G cultures were correctly identified. In direct tests on wound swabs, 49 of 52 group A, 17 of 19 group C and 48 of 51 group G streptococci were detected and correctly identified; no false positives were observed. With throat swabs from pharyngitis patients 34 of 36 group A, 3 of 6 group C and 5 of 8 group G streptococci gave positive results. Almost 10% of these swabs gave false positive reactions with the group C component of the test system. Samples taken from uninfected individuals indicated that the false positives were probably associated with blood group A. The test system gives rapid and reliable results with streptococcal cultures, but when directly applied to clinical samples the results must be interpreted with caution, particularly if the patient's blood group is not known.The relationship between the clinical features of pharyngitis and the sensitivity of a rapid antigen test: evidence of spectrum bias.We evaluate the test characteristics and test for spectrum bias of a rapid antigen test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis among adults.Medical record and laboratory results of consecutive adult patients receiving a rapid antigen test for GABHS in the emergency department or urgent care clinic of an urban teaching hospital between August 1999 and December 1999 were analyzed. Patients were stratified according to the number of clinical features present using the following modified Centor criteria: history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal exudate, and cervical lymphadenopathy. The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test was defined as the number of patients with positive rapid antigen test results divided by the number of patients with either positive rapid antigen test results or negative rapid antigen test results and positive throat culture results.In the study sample of 498 patient visits, the prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 28% (95% confidence interval [CI] 24% to 32%). The prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis increased as modified Centor scores increased: 0 or 1=14%, 2=20%, 3=43%, and 4=52%. An increased number of modified Centor criteria (0 or 1, 2, 3, 4) was associated with increased rapid antigen test sensitivity (61%, 76%, 90%, and 97%, respectively) (Mantel-Haenszel trend test; P =.001).The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test for GABHS is not a fixed value but varies with the spectrum of disease. Among adults with 3 or 4 clinical criteria for GABHS pharyngitis, further study may reveal that culture confirmation of negative rapid antigen test results are not necessary.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal infections.[Early diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in paediatric practice: Validity of a rapid antigen detection test].To determine the validity of the rapid antigen test for the diagnoses of acute pharyngitis caused by group A beta-haemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) compared with culture.Observational study of a consecutive sample of paediatric patients.Two primary care centres (PCC) from the metropolitan area of Barcelona.Children aged 1-14 years with sore throat of no more than 5 days duration were chosen at PCC.Oropharyngeal samples were collected from tonsillar bed and posterior pharynx. A rapid diagnostic test was performed, as well as a throat culture.A total of 211 patients were studied. The overall prevalence of pharyngitis due to Streptococcus was 34.1%. Compared with the throat culture, the sensitivity of the rapid test was 90.3% (95% CI: 81.0-96.0), the specificity was 78.4% (95% CI: 70.6-84.9). The percentage of false negatives was 9.7% and the false positives was 21.6%. Spectrum bias was present, inasmuch as the rapid test sensitivity increased with Centor scores.The diagnostic value of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in paediatric patients at PCC is high. However, the percentage of false positives and negatives is too high, and also the sensitivity is too low in patients with fewer symptoms to support the use of rapid antigenic test without culture confirmation and bacterial sensitivity test.Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by rapid antigen detection from the throat swab.Optical immunoassay for rapid detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Should culture be replaced?To evaluate an optical immunoassay rapid antigen test to detect group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from throat swab specimens.Criterion standard with "blinded" comparison. Double-swab pharyngeal samples were obtained; one swab was cultured and the other was used for the rapid antigen test.Microbiology laboratory in a primary care center at a university teaching hospital.Two hundred sixty-two outpatients with pharyngitis.The results of the optical immunoassay rapid antigen test were compared with results of standard aerobic culture.Sixty-two (24%) of 262 samples were culture-positive; 48 of these 62 were positive by the optical immunoassay rapid test (sensitivity, 77%). Of the 200 culture-negative samples, seven (4%) were positive by the rapid test (specificity, 96%).The optical immunoassay performed well, but like other rapid tests, is not sensitive enough to replace standard culture for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.Proper evaluation of rapid antigen detection methods for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis.Emergency department testing for Streptococcus in children with sore throats.Polymerase chain reaction for Streptococcus pyogenes used to evaluate an optical immunoassay for the detection of group A streptococci in children with pharyngitis.In evaluations of sensitive rapid tests for group A streptococci such as the optical immunoassay (OIA), some samples are positive by the antigen test but negative by culture. A method is needed for resolving these discrepant results.To develop a PCR-based assay to detect group A streptococci and to use it to establish a reference standard for evaluating an OIA for group A streptococcal antigen.A PCR assay that detects a segment of the MF gene of Streptococcus pyogenes was developed for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs. Paired swabs were obtained from 200 children with symptomatic pharyngitis and used to perform OIA, agar culture, broth-enhanced culture and PCR. As a reference standard any patient with group A streptococci detected by either culture or PCR was considered to be truly positive.In comparison to agar and broth-enhanced culture procedures, OIA had sensitivities of 82 and 80% and specificities of 87 and 89%, respectively. Eight (44%) of 18 samples that were positive by OIA but negative by culture were positive for group A streptococci by PCR. Compared with the reference standard, sensitivities were OIA 76%, agar culture 79%, broth-enhanced culture 86% and PCR 96%. The specificity of OIA was 92%.PCR can be used to establish a reference standard for evaluating rapid tests for group A streptococci. With this reference standard OIA was nearly as sensitive as but less specific than agar culture for detection of group A streptococci. Maximum detection requires use of both tests.Rapid strep tests in the emergency department: an evidence-based approach.Accuracy of rapid strep testing in patients who have had recent streptococcal pharyngitis.Some clinicians have questioned the accuracy of rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis by commercial immunochemical antigen test kits in the setting of recent streptococcal pharyngitis, believing that the false-positive rate was increased because of presumed antigen persistence.We studied 443 patients--211 cases--who had clinical pharyngitis diagnosed as group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus infection in the past 28 days and compared them with 232 control patients who had symptoms of pharyngitis but no recent diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis. Our aim was narrowly focused to compare the rapid strep test with the culture method we used in our clinical practice.We found that the rapid strep test in this setting showed no difference in specificity (0.96 vs 0.98); hence, the assertion that rapid antigen testing had higher false-positive rates in those with recent infection was not confirmed. We also found that in patients who had recent streptococcal pharyngitis, the rapid strep test appears to be more reliable (0.91 vs 0.70, P < .001) than in those patients who had not had recent streptococcal pharyngitis.The findings of this study indicate that the rapid strep test is both sensitive and specific in the setting of recent group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis, and its use might allow earlier treatment in this subgroup of patients.Rapid test, throat culture and clinical assessment in the diagnosis of tonsillitis.Our aim was to identify a group of patients with clinical signs of tonsillitis to whom antibiotics could be prescribed without further diagnostic actions, and to compare the outcome of clinical assessment with the result of an antigen detection test using culture as the gold standard.During two winter months, patients aged > or =4 years attending for sore throat at three primary health care centres in Malmö, Sweden, were examined. Odds ratios, sensitivities, specificities and predictive values were calculated for clinical assessment and for an antigen detection test.Among the 169 participating patients, growth of group A beta-haemolytic streptococci (GAS) was found in 53 cultures, and 23 patients (14%) were clinically assessed as 'absolutely positive', representing positive clinical assessment. Nineteen had positive cultures for GAS. The sensitivity, specificity and predictive positive and negative value for the antigen detection test were 82, 96, 90 and 93%, respectively, and for positive clinical assessment 36, 97, 83 and 77%.It is possible to identify a small group of patients with convincing signs of tonsillitis in which the specificity as well as the predictive positive value of the rapid test and the clinical assessment are close to equal. Antibiotics may be prescribed to these patients without further diagnostic actions.Detection of Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus employing three different detection methods: culture, rapid antigen detecting test, and molecular assay.In order to study the prevalence of Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) pharyngotonsillitis in our pediatric population and to compare different sampling methods of GABHS detection, oropharyngeal swabs from 50 children with acute pharyngotonsillitis, between 1 and 12 years old, were used simultaneously for culture, molecular assay and rapid GABHS antigen detection tests. All children were clinically examined at the Division of Pediatric Otorhinolaryngology of the Federal University of São Paulo. Diagnostic criteria were based on signs and symptoms, including sore throat, fever and oropharyngeal purulent secretion. Children that had been treated with antibiotics were excluded. Overall, combining the three methods, the prevalence of GABHS was 34%. GABHS was diagnosed in 30% of the bacterial cultures, in 25% of the samples tested with the molecular nucleic acid hybridization method and in 26% of the cases tested with the rapid antigen detection test. There was no significant difference between these three methods.[A direct, rapid method for the identification of Streptococcus pyogenes from throat smears].Streptococcal throat infection: calculation of test standards and a comparison between an antigen detection test and culture.The standard minimum sensitivity (94%) and minimum specificity (89%) of a group A streptococcus (GAS) test were calculated, assuming that no more than 10% false positive and no more than 2% false negative test results should be allowed. The clinical judgement of the need for immediate antibiotic treatment in tonsillitis/pharyngitis was an unreliable indicator of a GAS aetiology, 20-29% of the results being false positive and 2-10% false negative. The rapid antigen detection test Tandem Icon Strep A was not sensitive enough to be used as a single test, though it was specific enough. The sensitivity of culture almost reached the standard demand. Two combinations of rapid test and culture (sequence testing) were superior to the rapid test, but were not significantly better than culture.Comparison of two rapid streptococcal antigen detection assays with culture for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.In this study, 801 pharyngeal specimens were cultured for group A streptococci and tested with the Biostar Strep A Optical Immunoassay (Strep A OIA). The respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 97.1 and 100%; Strep A OIA, 91.5 and 94.8%. Of the 801 specimens, 597 were also tested with the Abbott TestPack Strep A Assay (TP-ST). For those specimens tested by all three methods, the respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 98.1 and 100%; Strep A OIA, 92.3 and 95.4%; and TP-ST, 79.4 and 100%. The Strep A OIA is significantly more sensitive than TP-ST and compares favorably with culture.Comparison of direct specimen testing utilizing TestPack strep A with testing of specimens following a two-hour broth enrichment.In a previous study, we demonstrated that a 2-h enrichment of throat swabs in broth followed by a direct fluorescent antibody test was significantly more sensitive than the Abbott TestPack Strep A for the detection of group-A streptococci. In this study, in an effort to simplify the technique, we utilized broth enrichment with an enzyme immunoassay detection method. A total of 1017 pharyngeal specimens were tested with TestPack Strep A (DTP), culture on a selective streptococcal agar, and a 2-h broth enrichment in Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) followed by TestPack Strep A (ETP). Subculture of the THB was used to arbitrate discordant test results. The sensitivities and specificities respectively were as follows: DTP (69% and 99%), ETP (90% and 98%), and SSA (97% and 100%). This enrichment method offers significantly greater sensitivity than direct testing for antigen yet still allows the potential for finalized same-day reporting of results.Streptococcus A in paediatric accident and emergency: are rapid streptococcal tests and clinical examination of any help?Rapid streptococcal tests (RSTs) for streptococcal pharyngitis have made diagnosis at once simpler and more complicated. The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that all RSTs be confirmed by a follow up throat culture unless local validation has proved the RST to be equally sensitive.To evaluate (a) RST as a single diagnostic tool, compared with RST with or without throat culture; (b) clinical diagnosis and the relative contribution of different symptoms.The study included 213 patients with clinical signs of pharyngitis. Throat swabs were analysed using Quickvue+ Strep A Test; negative RSTs were backed up by throat culture. Thirteen clinical features commonly associated with strep throat were analysed using backward stepwise logistic regression.Positive results (RST or throat culture) were obtained in 33 patients; RST correctly identified 21. Eleven samples were false negative on RST. At a strep throat prevalence of 15.9%, sensitivity of RST was 65.6% (95% CI 46.8% to 81.4%) and specificity 99.4% (96.7% to 99.9%). Sensitivity of clinical diagnosis alone was 57% (34% to 78%) and specificity 71% (61% to 80%). Clinically, only history of sore throat, rash, and pyrexia contributed to the diagnosis of strep throat (p<0.05).The high specificity of RST facilitates early diagnosis of strep throat. However, the low sensitivity of RST does not support its use as a single diagnostic tool. The sensitivity in the present study is markedly different from that reported by the manufacturer. Clinical examination is of limited value in the diagnosis of strep throat. It is important to audit the performance of new diagnostic tests, previously validated in different settings.[Incidence of streptococcal pharyngitis].To determine the incidence of streptococcal pharyngitis in patients younger than 2 years of age, and to evaluate the role of group C streptococci as a pathogenic agent in acute pharyngitis through throat culture in symptomatic patients.We performed a retrospective descriptive study of patients with clinical symptoms of acute pharyngitis and fast detection of streptococcal antigen and/or exudate culture who attended the emergency department between February 2004 and February 2005.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS) was isolated by pharyngeal culture in 85 patients aged less than 2 years (12.6%). In these patients the fast test displayed lower sensitivity and positive predictive value (PPV) (sensitivity: 78%; PPV: 69%, p < 0.01). Patients aged less than 2 years had a greater frequency fever, exanthema and catarrhal symptoms than older children (p < 0.01). In the younger age group, erythromycin resistance rates increased to 24.7% (p = 0.08). Group C streptococcus was isolated in 5.2% (43 patients). The most frequent reason for consultation was fever (74.4%) and the most common findings on examination were abnormal pharynx in 90.7%, odynophagia and adenopathies in 55.8%. Two incidence peaks (in May and September) were observed, with sporadic cases throughout the year.In our sample, the percentage of GAS in patients aged less than 2 years was higher than that reported in other series. In this age group, the sensitivity of the fast test is lower than in other age groups and there is a higher rate of erythromycin resistance. The percentage of tonsillitis due to serotype C was also slightly higher than expected. Two peaks of incidence were observed, similar to those occurring with SGA, with sporadic cases throughout the year.[Diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis in the pediatric department with the help of antigen detection test].The aim was to examine the validity in the paediatric hospital department of an antigen detection test (ADT) for the diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis.A prospective multicenter study including three Danish paediatric hospital departments was performed from May 1, 1998 to April 30, 1999. In 353 children aged 0-14 years the result of the ADT, Clearview Strep A, was compared with the result obtained with cultivation in an aerobic culture and the clinical parameters: hyperaemia, swelling, coating, adenitis and a temperature > or = 38.5 degrees C. In 126 patients the results of the ADT were also compared with white blood cell count (WBC), neutrofil count (NC) and C-reactive protein (CRP).The prevalence of Group A Streptococci (GAS) from culture was 15%. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of ADT were 67%, 95%, 72% and 94%, respectively. The positive predictive value of the ADT was significantly lower in patients aged 0-4 years than in patients aged > or = 5 years (p = 0.02). The prevalence of positive ADT was significantly higher in patients with heavy growth of GAS than in patients with moderate or sparse growth (p = 0.01). The prevalence of adenitis (p = 0.003) and coating (p = 0.003) was significantly raised in ADT-positive patients. In patients with growth of Group A Streptococci in cultivation in an aerobic culture the prevalence of adenitis (p = 0.006) and elevated CRP (p = 0.03) was significantly raised.The sensitivity of 67% for the ADT is not satisfactory. However, in our opinion, this is not a sufficient argument against using ADT. It was a problem that the result of the ADT was sometimes difficult to read. Adjustment of the test procedure and the use of easy readable and high-sensitive optical immunoassay tests would probably improve the results significantly. Until the results of such studies exist, we suggest that the method of cultivation in an aerobic culture is used in the case of negative ADT, at least in patients with pronounced symptoms and/or clinical signs of streptococcal tonsilitis (adenitis and coating).[Childhood pharyngitis in Sfax (Tunisia): epidemiology and utility of a rapid streptococcal test].The authors studied the epidemiology of pharyngitis in children and evaluated the contribution of a rapid streptococcal test.This prospective study was conducted from June 2007 to May 2008 in a primary health care institution (Policlinique de la Caisse Nationale de Sécurité Sociale) in Tunisia. Clinical findings were recorded; throat swabs were performed, and a rapid streptococcal test was made.Five hundred and four children were included in this study. The mean age was 5 years and 8 months. Culture was positive for group A streptococcus in 166 cases (32.9 %). Group A streptococcus was more frequently isolated in children aged 5 to 8 years. There was no difference in clinical features between groups of streptococcal and non-streptococcal pharyngitis. The sensitivity and specificity of the rapid test were respectively 93.2 and 95.3 %.Pharyngitis was of bacterial origin in one third of cases; among these, group A streptococcus was the most frequent bacterium. The rapid test is a quick and reliable tool for the diagnosis of pharyngitis and hence an appropriate treatment.The diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by optical immunoassay.Rapid diagnostic assay for strep throat.Detection of group A streptococcal antigen from throat swabs with five diagnostic kits in general practice.During a 5-month period, 248 general practitioners from 164 general practice offices obtained duplicate throat swabs from 2469 patients with acute pharyngotonsillitis. At the general practice office, one of the swabs was assayed for the presence of group A streptococcal antigen, using one of five commercially available diagnostic kits. (The participants did not receive instruction in the use of the kits). The other swab was cultured in our laboratory for the presence of group A streptococci. The diagnostic parameters for the five kits were as follows: Abbott TestPack Strep A--sensitivity, 79% (110/139) and specificity, 98% (490/501); Direct Strep A EIA (Roche)--sensitivity, 79% (104/132) and specificity, 63% (178/281); Respirastick--sensitivity, 55% (46/84) and specificity, 96% (298/309); Reveal Colour Strep A--sensitivity, 82% (114/139) and specificity, 83% (223/268); Tandem ICON Strep A--sensitivity, 78% (111/143) and specificity, 98% (362/368). The antigen detection test results were heavily influenced by the clinical prediction of a streptococcal or viral etiology. It is concluded that in the absence of a standard throat culture, the Abbott TestPack Strep A kit and the Tandem ICON Strep A kit both offer a more safe diagnostic alternative than clinical assessment. Depending on the current prevalence of group A streptococci, the additional use of a throat swab culture should be considered in case of negative antigen detection test results.Diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a private clinic: comparative evaluation of an optical immunoassay method and culture.We compared the sensitivity and specificity of the Strep A Optical ImmunoAssay (OIA) method with our routine trypticase soy agar with 5% sheep blood (TSA) culture technique and with a broth-enhanced culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal infection. Compared with broth-enhanced culture, the Strep A OIA had a sensitivity and specificity of 94.8% and 98.8%, respectively; TSA culture had a sensitivity and specificity of 92.5% and 99.4%, respectively. The Strep A OIA, which takes 10 minutes to perform, offered sensitivity and specificity equivalent to that of TSA culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use of the rapid antigen detection test in group A streptococci pharyngitis diagnosis in Tunis, Tunisia].The aims of this study were to determine the contribution of commercial rapid antigen detection test (RADT) in the rapid diagnosis of pharyngitis caused by group A streptococci. A total of 292 children with pharyngitis was included. A duplicate throat swabs was taken simultaneously from each patient. One of them was used for RADT achievement and the other for culture. When cultures were positive, a semi-quantitative evaluation was done. Throat culture and RADT were positive in 59 and 72 cases respectively. Fifty four specimens were positive simultaneously with RADT and culture and 215 specimens were negative using both methods. Eighteen specimens were positive only with RADT, 5 of them were treated by amoxicillin. Regarding to the group of patients with a negative RADT and a positive culture (5 cases), all of them had a culture evaluation at "+" or "++". Specificity and sensibility of the RADT were 92.2% and 91.5% respectively. RADT use by physicians can reduce antibiotic prescription among paediatric population. Because of the high specificity of RADT, therapeutic decisions can be made on the basis of a positive test.[Evaluation of a rapid test for direct detection of group A streptococcal antigen in throat swabs. Study of 4 commercial test systems].Four commercially prepared test reagent kits for the rapid screening of throat swabs for group A streptococci were examined in comparison to bacteriological cultures of 963 double throat swabs. The sensitivities of the test systems were 86.7% (Abbott Test Pack Strep A), 81.8% (Hybritech Tandem Icon Strep A), 79.6% (Pharmacia Phadirect Strep A), and 72.6% (Wellcome Reveal Colour Strep A) respectively. The specificity of the four tests was above 90%. Marked variations between different test reagent batches could be observed. The two tests based on the enzyme immunoassay principle proved to be superior to the agglutination tests investigated with respect to sensitivity and reading accuracy. Our results are evaluated in the light of the published literature on these tests.[Reliability of the rapid Streptococcus A test].The results of three second-generation immune assays for direct detection of group A streptococcus were compared in 65 patients with acute pharyngitis. The assays included Strep A Plus, (Abbott), Concise Strep A (Hybritech) and Cards Plus (Pacific Biotech). A standard culture was used as reference. Additionally a nucleic acid hybridization assay (Gen-Probe) was applied after enhanced broth culturing. The sensitivities and specificities of the three immunoassays were similar and showed that Strep A Plus had an 84.2% sensitivity and 88.9% specificity, Concise Strep A an 82.4% sensitivity and 92.3% specificity, and Cards Plus an 84.2% specificity and 90.7% sensitivity. The Concise Strep A had significantly more doubtful results in comparison with the two other rapid immune assays (9.7% versus 2.3%, P = 0.034. The standard culture and the DNA probe test gave the same results in 94% of cases. Clinical parameters were found to be unreliable for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. However, findings show that when the rapid immune assay is positive, it is reasonable to start antibiotic treatment without performing a bacterial culture. In cases with a negative assay, management is best tailored to clinical symptoms and laboratory examinations.Use of rapid group A strep throat screening tests.Comparison of TestPack Strep A test kit with culture technique for detection of group A streptococci.Results obtained with Abbott Laboratories TestPack Strep A (TPSA), a 7-min enzyme immunoassay method, were compared with culture results to measure the ability of this assay to detect group A streptococci directly from 365 throat swabs. Our study demonstrated a sensitivity of 90.0% and a specificity of 97.4% for TPSA compared with cultures incubated for 48 h. The positive and negative predictive values of this assay versus the culture method were 92.8 and 96.3%, respectively. If specimens that provided fewer than 10 colonies per plate of group A streptococci are eliminated from the data, the sensitivity is increased to 95.6%. Additionally, 10 group A and 40 non-group A streptococcal isolates were tested directly with TPSA for the ability to distinguish group A from non-group A streptococci. All 50 isolates were correctly identified (100% accuracy). TPSA is a rapid, accurate, and easy-to-interpret method for detection and confirmation of group A streptococcal antigen directly from throat swabs and pure culture isolates.Evaluation of a two-minute strep A direct swab test (SADST) on patients with pharyngitis at a primary care clinic.A two-minute strep A direct swab test (SADST) was used to detect the presence of Lancefield group A streptococci (GAS) from the throats of 207 patients with pharyngitis at a primary-care clinic. The results were compared with a standard culture method. Fifty-one specimens were positive and 156 specimens were negative for GAS by culture. The SADST had a sensitivity of 96% (49 of 51) and specificity of 98.7% (154 of 156). The predictive values of a positive and negative SADST, for GAS, were 96% and 98.7% respectively. The SADST showed negative reactions with five specimens containing beta-haemolytic streptococci other than GAS and 34 known stock cultures other than GAS. Our results indicate that SADST is a rapid, simple, convenient and reliable test to use for diagnosis of GAS pharyngitis at primary care clinics, physicians' offices and clinical laboratories.Diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Importance of inoculum size and sampling effect in rapid antigen detection for diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis.Current recommendations suggest that negative rapid Streptococcus pyogenes antigen tests be backed up with a culture, reflecting evidence that culture may have a higher sensitivity and also that testing of a second swab may yield a different (i.e., a positive) result because of variation in sample size or distribution. If the latter is common, the sensitivities of current antigen detection tests might be improved by simply increasing the amount of sample tested. The present study assessed the effect of antigen testing of two swabs extracted together compared to independent testing of each swab extracted separately for children with clinical pharyngitis. S. pyogenes grew from one or both swabs for 198 (37%) of 537 children. The combined culture was significantly (P < 0.05) more sensitive than culture of either swab alone. Compared to combined culture, antigen testing of two swabs extracted and tested together was significantly more sensitive than two single swab extractions (94.1 versus 80%; P = 0.03); however, the specificity was decreased (81.5 versus 89.8 to 92.7%; P < 0.05). This study suggests that sample size and/or uneven sample distribution may have influenced the apparent sensitivities of prior studies that compared antigen tests to a single plate culture. A strategy, such as the one used in the present study, that increases the sample size available for antigen testing (i.e., extraction of samples from both swabs) may improve detection rates to a level that will better approximate true disease status and obviate the need for backup cultures if specificity can be improved.Evaluation of the Strep A OIA assay versus culture methods: ability to detect different quantities of group A Streptococcus.The Strep A OIA assay by Biostar (Boulder, Co., USA) is a unique optical immunoassay system for the rapid detection of Group A streptococcal carbohydrate. As part of a community-based pediatric cohort study of Group A Streptococcus (GAS) persistence following antibiotic therapy of pharyngitis, the performance of the Strep A OIA assay was compared with the amount of growth from standard throat swab culture methods. A total of 363 throat swabs taken over the course of the study was evaluated from 248 children between 2 and 18 years of age. Two culture methods were performed: an agar plate with the throat swab using Columbia agar base with 5% sheep blood incubated under an anaerobic environment for 48 h and Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) enhancement. The Strep A OIA was then performed. A total of 144 of 363 (39.7%) samples was positive for GAS by one or more of the laboratory tests across study visits: agar culture detected 132 of 144 (91.7%), THB culture detected 128 of 144 (88.9%), and the Strep A OIA assay detected 129 of 144 (89.6%). Complete agreement among all three laboratory tests was found for 333 of 363 (91.7%) of the samples. Agar culture results were comparable to THB cultures with a sensitivity of 96.9%, specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 93.9%, and a negative predictive value of 98.3%. Although the performance of the Strep A OIA assay had similar specificity (96.5%) and positive predictive value (93.8%) compared with the combined results of the two culture methods, the sensitivity (89.0%) and negative predictive value (93.6%) were lower. A significant difference (p < 0.001) was found in the ability of the Strep A OIA assay to detect agar culture-positive swabs that had a light growth (1+ or 2+) (63.0%) versus a moderate (3+) or heavy (4+) growth (98.1%) of GAS. Although the Strep A OIA assay allows GAS throat swab results to be reported an average of 24 h sooner than either of the cultures, the rapid assay was not as sensitive in detecting light growth GAS-positive cultures.[Does a pharyngeal culture have to be requested when using rapid antigen techniques?].Role of rapid antigen detection test for the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus in patients with pharyngotonsillitis.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS) is an important pharyngotonsillitis etiologic agent. Correct etiologic diagnosis and early treatment prevent suppurative and non-suppurative complications of streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis; however, clinical diagnosis is not reliable. Within this context, rapid detection methods of GAS antigen are useful to diagnose this agent.The objective of the present study was to determine sensitivity and specificity of rapid GAS antigen detection tests used in Brazil.Clinical prospective.Eighty-one patients with clinical diagnosis of acute pharyngotonsillitis seen at the otorhinolaryngology emergency department of the University Hospital, FMUSP, between May 2001 and April 2002 were submitted to two simultaneous collections of oropharyngeal material using swabs. The rapid GAS antigen detection test was compared to culture on blood agar, the gold standard for the diagnosis of this etiologic agent.Among the 81 patients studied, the rapid test was positive in 56% and negative in 44%. GAS growth in culture was observed in 40.7% of the patients. Sensitivity and specificity of the rapid test were, respectively, 93.9% and 68.7%, and the negative and positive predictive values were 94.2 and 67.4%, respectively.We concluded that high sensitivity of the test allows its use in the identification of patients with GAS. Rapid streptococcal antigen detection tests have been shown to be an important adjuvant tool in the etiologic diagnosis of pharyngotonsillitis.Novel, rapid optical immunoassay technique for detection of group A streptococci from pharyngeal specimens: comparison with standard culture methods.A novel immunoassay system based on the changes in the reflection of light, termed an optical immunoassay (OIA), was utilized to directly detect group A streptococcal (GAS) carbohydrate antigen from clinical specimens. In two studies, a total of 1,275 throat swabs were tested for the presence of this antigen with the Strep A OIA rapid detection system and the results were compared with those of standard culture methods. In both studies, the Strep A OIA yielded more positive results than plating of the throat swab onto a selective agar, Trypticase soy agar containing sheep blood, or an enriched broth. In one study, the sensitivity and specificity of Strep A OIA compared with those of the broth-enriched culture were 97.4 and 95.6%, respectively. In a second study a sensitivity of 98.9% and a specificity of 98.6% were achieved. It was also shown that the carbohydrate antigen could be detected in the absence of viable GAS organisms. The Strep A OIA is an easily interpretable method and was shown to be more sensitive than routine culture methods for detecting GAS infections directly from throat swabs.Identification of streptococcal pharyngitis in the office laboratory: reassessment of new technology.[Validation of a rapid antigenic test in the diagnosis of pharyngitis caused by group a beta-haemolytic Streptococcus].To determine the validity of the rapid antigen test (RAT) OSOM StrepA Genzyme for the diagnosis of acute pharyngitis caused by group A beta-haemolytic strep (GABHS).Diagnostic techniques survey.Urban primary care centre, Spain.All patients over 14 years old seen in 6 surgeries with sore throat and 2 or more Centor criteria: pharyngotonsillar exudate, tender laterocervical nodes, absence of coughing, and/or history or presence of fever.Pharyngeal swabs were taken from all the patients, one for RAT and another to send for culture in the microbiology department.A total of 182 patients were evaluable, with a mean age of 30.6 (12.1) years of which 116 were women (63.7%); 63 patients had 2 Centor criteria; 83 had 3 and 36, the 4 criteria. The culture was positive in 102 patients (56%), with GABHS showing infection in forty (22%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 21.2-22.8). Group C Streptococcus was isolated in 26 patients (14.3%). GABHS was higher among patients with four Centor criteria (38.9% vs 25.3% observed among those with 3 criteria and 7.9% with 2 criteria; P<.001). Sensitivity of RAT was 95%, with a specificity of 93%, a positive predictive value of 79.2% and a negative predictive value of 98.5%.These results show the usefulness of RAT for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis. Its use should be spread to all primary care practices.[Rational use of antibiotics in pediatrics: impact of a rapid test for detection of beta-haemolytic group A streptococci in acute pharyngotonsillitis].To assess the reliability and validity of a rapid test for the identification of Streptococcus pyogenes in the pharyngeal exudate of children presenting with pharyngotonsillitis. To evaluate the impact of its use in outpatient clinics on antibiotic use, on the incidence of second medical visits and complications, and on the degree of parental satisfaction.After a clinical diagnosis of acute pharyngitis was established and written informed consent obtained from the parents, dual throat swabs were collected from 430 children who attended the emergency department of our hospital or the pediatric offices of three health centers in our area. The first specimen was examined by the rapid test, QuickVue Flex Strep A, and the second one was sent to the laboratory for conventional culture. As a rule, antibiotics were indicated only when the rapid test was positive. Special emphasis was placed on explaining to parents that treatment was not necessary when the test was negative. Telephone follow-up was provided to the family during the next four weeks, after which a satisfaction survey was carried out.The sensitivity of the investigated rapid test was 91.2% (negative predictive value: 96.5%) and specificity was 96.2% (positive predictive value: 90.4%). Antibiotics were given to 41.9% of the patients, approximately half the expected rate in the absence of the rapid test. There was no significant difference in the number of second visits or hospitalizations between the groups of treated and non-treated subjects. Clinical evolution was good in all cases. The degree of parental satisfaction was very high, independent of the treatment given to the patients.The rapid test for the detection of group A streptococci is a reliable tool for the selection of patients able to benefit from antibiotic treatment. It is easy to handle and apply and its use allows a significant reduction in the administration of antibiotics in pharyngotonsillitis. Most users accept and are satisfied with this novel diagnostic and therapeutic procedure.[Rapid antigen tests for the diagnosis of group A streptococci in practice].Evaluating the American Academy of Pediatrics diagnostic standard for Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis: backup culture versus repeat rapid antigen testing.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that all negative rapid diagnostic tests for Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis be backed up by culture, which creates a dilemma for clinicians who must make treatment decisions without complete diagnostic information at the time of visit. The use of a follow-up serial rapid antigen test instead of a follow-up culture would provide a more timely result.Two swabs were collected from children who were suspected of having S pyogenes pharyngitis. Each swab was used for a culture and an OSOM Ultra Strep A Test rapid antigen test. The gold standard of comparison was defined as the identification of S pyogenes on either of the 2 culture plates. Three diagnostic strategies were evaluated: a single rapid antigen test, a rapid antigen test with follow-up rapid antigen test (rapid-rapid), and a rapid antigen test with follow-up culture (rapid-culture).A total of 210 (23.7%) of 887 throat cultures with matched data were identified with S pyogenes. A single rapid antigen test had a sensitivity of 87.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 83.2%-92.1%), the sensitivity of the rapid-rapid follow-up was 91.4% (95% CI: 87.6%-95.2%), and the sensitivity of the rapid-culture follow-up was 95.7% (95% CI: 93.0%-98.5%), which was significantly higher than the others. As shown in Fig 1, when these test strategies were evaluated on a subgroup with clinical symptoms commonly associated with S pyogenes pharyngitis, the sensitivities all increased and were no longer significantly different. None of the strategies reliably exceeded a 95% sensitivity threshold.The American Academy of Pediatrics strategy for S pyogenes detection in children with pharyngitis, requiring a backup culture for those with negative antigen tests, was not exceeded by any other test strategy; however, a rapid-rapid diagnostic strategy may approximate it with the use of judicious clinical selection of patients.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Comparison of two antigen detection techniques for group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric emergency department.Evaluation of the throat culture as a follow-up for an initially negative enzyme immunosorbent assay rapid streptococcal antigen detection test.In a study of the efficacy of following up an initially negative enzyme immunosorbent assay (EIA) rapid streptococcal antigen detection test with a throat culture, 2 double swabs (4 total) were obtained from 264 pediatric patients with sore throats. Although a throat culture was more specific (97%) than the EIA (89%), the sensitivity (87%) and negative predictive value (97%) of a single EIA was the same as that of a single throat culture. A follow-up throat culture was more accurate than a follow-up EIA. We conclude that the office EIA tested results in more false positives but misses no more true positives than a single throat culture processed by a well-controlled microbiology laboratory. If a follow-up technique is used for an initially negative EIA rapid streptococcal antigen detection test, the throat culture is the superior test and would be equally applicable following an initially negative throat culture or EIA.[Rapid diagnostic tests of Streptococcus group A in pharyngitis. Value and limitations].[Evaluation of clinical data and a technique of rapid detection (TestPack Strep A) in the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngo-tonsillitis].We have evaluated the validity of the clinical data, the clinical impression (CI) of the physician and a rapid antigenic technique (RAT) for the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngitis and tonsillitis (SPT). We evaluated 126 patients aged 7-60 years (October 1988-March 1989). The incidence of SPT was 19%. SPTs had a significantly higher frequency of lack of cough and sudden onset as isolated findings, and of the associations fever greater than 38 degrees C + exudate + lack of cough, and sudden onset + fever greater than 38 degrees C + exudate + lack of cough. CI had a sensibility (S) of 56%, a specificity (Sp) of 72%, a positive predictive value (PPV) of 32%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88% and an overall valve (OV) of 69%. The RAT had a S of 79.2%, a Sp 93%, a PPV of 73%, a NPV of 95%, and an OV of 90.5%. Only some clinical data are useful to diagnose SPT. The CI of the physician has a low predictive value, whereas TestPack Strep A is useful and has a similar value as pharyngeal culture.TestPack Strep A kit for the rapid detection of group A streptococci on 11,088 throat swabs in a clinical pathology laboratory.Results obtained with Abbott Laboratories' TestPack Strep A, a rapid test kit to detect group A streptococcal antigen on throat swabs, were compared with the culture results. All tests were performed by American Society of Clinical Pathology-registered technologists in a large clinical laboratory. A total of 11,088 throat swabs were tested; 9,161 belonged to pediatric patients and 1,927 to adults. For TestPack Strep A, the study demonstrated a sensitivity value of 0.91 and a specificity value of 0.96; positive predictive value and negative predictive values were 0.82 and 0.98, respectively. These data indicate that even when performed by experienced technologists, in a laboratory setting, approximately 1 of 10 patients with group A streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis will be missed if physicians rely solely on this direct antigen test. A backup culture on all patients who are negative by a rapid antigen detection test is recommended.Rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection kit: effect on antimicrobial therapy for acute pharyngitis.Newly introduced rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcal pharyngitis should facilitate appropriate antimicrobial use in patients with group A streptococcal pharyngitis. Because of high rates of acute pharyngitis in Tuba City, AZ, at the Navajo Indian reservation, the use of rapid diagnostic test was prospectively evaluated. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was measured and changes in physician prescribing patterns attributable to use of the test were correlated. Of 320 patients with pharyngitis enrolled during the present 3-week study, 86 met the study's definition of a patient with streptococcal pharyngitis and 163 met the study's definition of a patient with nonstreptococcal pharyngitis. The rapid test was 62.8% sensitive and 96.9% specific in identifying patients from whom group A streptococci were isolated. Although treatment of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis at the time of the first visit increased from 36.5% in a retrospective sample to 72.5% during the study, treatment of patients in whom cultures were negative remained the same. Further analyses showed that physicians tended to treat patients with signs characteristic of streptococcal pharyngitis and, as the study progressed, to rely less on negative rapid test results as a reason to withhold antimicrobial agents. It was concluded that rapid tests with good specificity but limited sensitivity may improve treatment of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis by allowing earlier specific therapy. A more sensitive test with a higher negative predictive value would be necessary to prevent treatment of persons with nonstreptococcal pharyngitis.The rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal infection.Comparison of BioStar Strep A OIA optical immune assay, Abbott TestPack Plus Strep A, and culture with selective media for diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.We directly compared three techniques for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in 500 symptomatic children seen in the Emergency Department or Child Care Clinic of The Children's Hospital of Denver. Throats were vigorously swabbed with two rayon swabs, which were transported immediately to the Microbiology Laboratory. Each swab was cultured aerobically on Strep A Isolation Agar (Remel) and then tested for antigen-one swab by the Strep A OIA optical immune assay (BioStar) and the other by the TestPack Plus Strep A (Abbott) technique. Each test was performed blind to the others. The refrigerated pledget was cultured in Todd-Hewitt broth if an antigen test was positive and both direct plate cultures were negative (the "gold standard" was any culture positive). All isolates were serologically grouped. Of 500 complete patient cultures, 151 (30%) were positive for group A streptococcal growth. The two antigen tests gave comparable results with an average sensitivity of 83%. Each was significantly (P < 0.02) less sensitive than its corresponding culture. The BioStar Strep A OIA optical immune assay produced significantly (P < 0.003) more false-positive results than did the Abbott test. Rapid antigen testing is not sensitive enough to eliminate the need for backup cultures.Rapid diagnosis of group A strep pharyngitis in the emergency department.Two ten-minute rapid tests for diagnosing Group A streptococcal pharyngitis in 147 emergency department patients with a complaint of sore throat were evaluated using positive throat cultures as the marker for disease. Treatment was initiated solely on the basis of clinical judgment. Sensitivity and specificity were 78% and 93%, respectively, for the rapid test and 69% and 56%, respectively, for clinical judgment. The rapid test was significantly better than clinical judgment alone in determining the presence of disease (P less than .05). The predictive values of the positive and negative and were 78% and 93%, respectively, for the rapid test and 38% and 85%, respectively, for clinical judgment. In the ED setting in which adequate followup is difficult, the rapid test can identify more accurately than can clinical judgment alone those patients who need therapy.Evaluation of rapid streptococcal detection tests.Repetition of the rapid antigen test in initially negative supposed streptococcal pharyngitis is not necessary in adults.To determine whether the repetition of the rapid antigen detection test (RADT) in patients, with a high suspicion of presenting pharyngitis by group A beta-haemolytic streptococci (GABHS), with a previously negative test improves the validity of the test.Two hundred and twenty-two patients aged 14 years or more with acute pharyngitis and two or more Centor criteria--tonsillar exudates, fever, tenderness in the lymph glands and/or absence of cough--were consecutively recruited. In all patients, a pharyngotonsillar sample was obtained with two swabs, one for the RADT (OSOM Strep A Genzyme test, Genzyme Diagnostics, Cambridge, MA, USA) and the other was sent to the Department of Microbiology for culture. In patients with a negative RADT, the determination was repeated. The sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were determined.Cultures were positive for GABHS in 55 patients (24.8%). Three false-negatives and 14 false-positives were observed by comparing the rapid test with throat culture, achieving a sensitivity of 94.5% and a specificity of 91.6%. Positive and negative predictive values were 78.8% and 98.1% respectively. Taking the second determination in the negative cases into account, the results were 96.4%, 91.6%, 79.1% and 98.7% respectively.The negative predictive value achieved with the RADT determination was very high. Repetition of the test only slightly improved this percentage, making repetition of this test unnecessary.Rapid strep tests in the pediatric clinical setting.Evaluation of a new rapid antigen detection kit for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.To evaluate the use of a new rapid antigen-detection kit for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus and compare results with previously published studies.Throat swabs were obtained prospectively from patients, aged one to 18 years, presenting to the emergency department, acute concerns clinic, and walk-in clinic of an urban tertiary care children's hospital. Throat swabs were first inoculated on a 5% sheep blood agar plate and then used for the streptococcus A optical immunoassay (OIA) kit. Results of both the throat culture and the rapid antigen-detection test were then compared.Two-hundred thirty-three patients were enrolled. Seventy-three patients had a positive culture and 63 patients had a positive OIA. Fifteen patients had a false negative result for the OIA kit and five patients had a false positive result. Test sensitivity was 79.5%, specificity was 96.9%, positive predictive value was 92.1%, and negative predictive value was 91.2%Although previous studies have demonstrated OIA kit sensitivities as high as 98.9% and authors have, as a result, recommended that the performance of a backup throat culture for a negative OIA test is unnecessary, our results do not support this. A sensitivity of 79.5% is not sufficiently high to justify omission of a standard throat culture. Accordingly, all OIA tests that are negative should be confirmed by the performance of a throat culture.[Diagnosis of sore throat. A multipractice study of 3 different ways of antigenic determination for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs].During five months in the winter of 1992/1993, 34 general practitioners (GPs) from 18 offices participated in a clinical testing of three group A streptococcal antigen detection test (ADT) kits (Abbott TestPack Strep A Plus (Abbott), Concise Strep A, Hybritech (Concise) and Kodak SureCell Strep A (Kodak)). The GPs obtained duplicate throat swabs, one for processing with the ADT kit, the other for culture reference at The Streptococcus Laboratory (Bacteriological Department, Statens Seruminstitut, Copenhagen). A total of 1389 patients were enrolled in the study, thirty percent of whom were infected by group A streptococci. The following results were obtained: Abbott: Sensitivity: 76%, specificity: 99%, positive predictive value: 97%, negative predictive value: 91%. Concise: Sensitivity: 82%, specificity: 95%, positive predictive value: 86%, negative predictive value: 92%. Kodak: Sensitivity: 84%, specificity: 87%, positive predictive value: 73%, negative predictive value: 93%. As a follow-up to the main study, each GP filled in a questionnaire, stating his opinion about the investigated ADT kit. Considering the practical handiness, Concise scored higher than Abbott, which in turn scored higher than Kodak. In conclusion, Abbott and Concise are recommended for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis in general practice.[Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngo-tonsillitis in a primary care unit].One of the main consulting motives in ambulatory pediatric practice is acute pharyngotonsillitis. This work values the efficacy of a test to confirm rapid diagnosis (30 minutes) of streptococcal pharyngitis. Authors selected 100 children in a office of primary health care whose ages were between two and seven years, from February to July in 1986. They have considered classical clinical symptoms of pharyngitis and have applied a throat culture and rapid test in all. After comparing test results and culture results, obtained sensibility and specificity have been 80% and 95% (p less than 0.01) respectively. According to these results, they believe on the necessity of a test that permits a rapid diagnosis and which enables to treat acute pharyngitis in a more suitable way in ambulatory pediatrics.Rational decisions in managing sore throat: evaluation of a rapid test.Sixty nine general practitioners recorded what they had prescribed for a total of 1189 episodes of sore throat. Antibiotics were prescribed in 763 (64%) episodes and broad spectrum antibiotics in 161 (21%) of these. If there was dysphagia, hoarseness, cervical adenopathy, and inflamed or purulent tonsils a prescription was more likely to be written. An enzyme immunoassay rapid test was evaluated as a means of rationalizing prescribing. Among 23 general practitioners and 250 patients the sensitivity of the test was 63% and the specificity 91.7% compared with 74% and 58% for clinical assessment alone. Test results rarely caused previous prescribing decisions (34 [corrected] (13%) episodes) to be altered. We suggest that the time is not ripe for the use of the enzyme immunoassay rapid test on a wide scale in the routine assessment of sore throats.Comparison of two rapid Streptococcus pyogenes diagnostic tests with a rigorous culture standard.Comparisons of rapid antigen tests for the diagnosis of pharyngitis are often made between published studies but may not be reliable given differences in study design, sampling and reference standard definitions. Tests are rarely compared against each other in a single study.The sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests were compared against a multiplate culture standard defined as the identification of on any of four culture plates. Paired swabs were tested for antigen using Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test and compared with Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test.Ninety-four (31.1%) of 302 matched samples were identified with The sensitivity of Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test against the multiplate culture standard was 92.6%, significantly higher ( P= 0.001) than that (75.5%) of Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test. Specificities were 92.8 and 97.1%, respectively. Data analysis of culture results and statistical modeling showed that cultures of two or more samples are necessary for a sensitivity of 95% or greater for a comparison standard compared with true disease status.When comparing the performance of rapid antigen tests for pharyngitis, a rigorous culture standard should be used consisting of at least two separate samples (swabs and/or pledgets), ultimately plated on selective agar. Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test was significantly more sensitive than Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test in comparison with a multiplate culture standard and a same swab, single plate culture standard.Evaluation of two rapid antigen assays, BioStar Strep A OIA and Pacific Biotech CARDS O.S., and culture for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Suitability of throat culture procedures for detection of group A streptococci and as reference standards for evaluation of streptococcal antigen detection kits.Impact on empiric treatment of group A streptococcal pharyngitis using an optical immunoassay.The potential impact of using a rapid diagnostic test (Strep A OIA) on detection and treatment of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis in a large-volume pediatric and adolescent clinic was examined. Of 519 swabs processed for both culture and the OIA test, 114 were culture-positive for GABHS compared with 133 positive by the OIA test, for an agreement of 94%. OIA test sensitivity compared with culture was 96%, and specificity was 94%. Forty-seven percent of all study patients were empirically placed on antibiotics. In-clinic OIA testing could have reduced inappropriate therapy and been a cost-effective alternative to culture.Rapid antigen detection testing.Rapid diagnostic tests for streptococcal pharyngitis.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis from throat swabs.Optical immunoassay test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis. An office-based, multicenter investigation.To compare the accuracy of an optical immunoassay (OIA) for the rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis with blood agar plate (BAP) culture.Blinded comparison with criterion standard.A total of 6 private pediatricians' offices, 3 in Connecticut and 3 in Chicago, III.A total of 2113 consecutive patients with acute pharyngitis, 983 in Connecticut and 1130 in Chicago.The sensitivities and specificities of OIA and BAP culture (both performed and interpreted in the office) were determined using a research laboratory's interpretation of a combination of BAP culture and Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) culture of transport tube pledget as criterion standard.Among patients in Connecticut, the sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 94% and 89%, respectively (P=.004), while the specificities were 96% and 99%, respectively (P=.001). Among patients in Chicago, the sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 79% and 72%, respectively (P<.001), while the specificities were 89% and 99%, respectively (P<.001). In each of the 6 pediatricians' offices, the OIA was more sensitive than the BAP culture. Combining the data from Connecticut and Chicago, the overall sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 84% and 78%, respectively (P<.001), while the specificities were 93% and 99%, respectively (P<.001).The results of this comprehensive office-based investigation suggest that with adequately trained personnel, negative OIA test results may not always need to be routinely confirmed with BAP cultures.Comparative reliability of clinical, culture, and antigen detection methods for the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Evaluation of the pacific biotech CARDS STREP A test for detecting group A streptococci from cases of pharyngitis.The Pacific Biotech CARD STREP A test for rapid screening of throat specimens for group A streptococci was evaluated. Relative to conventional culture, this assay had a sensitivity of 76.1% (108 of 142) and a specificity of 98.7% (392 of 397). The relatively low sensitivity of the test makes it of questionable value as a screening procedure.External quality control of direct antigen tests to detect group A streptococcal antigen.Presented here are the results of an external quality control survey organized by the Swiss Center for Quality Control (CSCQ) to evaluate the performance of direct antigen tests (DATs) widely used in Swiss medical practices and laboratories for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. Twice yearly over a 4-year period, just over 100 participants were requested to analyze positive, weakly positive and negative samples provided to them by the CSCQ with their routinely used DATs and to send the results to the CSCQ. For 1,620 samples distributed, the CSCQ received 1,484 (91.6%) results obtained with 17 different DATs. The specificity of all DATs for negative samples was >91%. For samples containing abundant group A streptococcal antigen, sensitivities ranged from 59.1% to 95.5%; however, for samples containing low levels of antigen, the sensitivity was much lower for all DATs, ranging from 8.7% to 69.8%. Therefore, negative DAT results should be verified with well-performed cultures in order to assure the optimal care of patients with pharyngitis.[Evaluation of a fast test for direct research on streptococcal group A from pharyngeal samples].Importance of streptococcal pharyngitis rapid diagnosis is increasing. 645 patients with pharyngoamygdalitis were tested. The correlation between bacteriologic culture and rapid test is 86%, the sensibility of the test is 68%, its specificity is 92%, while the predictive positive and negative values are 75% and 90%. These results show the interest of the rapid test for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Treatment of streptococcal sore throat. Immunoassays for rapid diagnosis.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in general practice.to assess the efficacy of Abbott Testpack Strep A compared with throat culture for the diagnosis of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in general practice.one hundred and fifty-four specimens were obtained from general practices in selected regions, and were tested for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus using both Abbott Testpack Strep A and throat culture.sensitivity of the rapid diagnostic test was 79.4%, specificity 93.3%. The negative predictive value of the test was 94.1%; the positive predictive value 77.1%.maximum cost effectiveness is achieved, with respect to short term costs and benefits, by diagnosing and treating solely on the basis of Abbott Testpack Strep A results. When possible complications are taken into consideration, initial testing by Abbott Testpack Strep A, followed by confirmatory laboratory testing of negative Testpack results becomes a feasible alternative.Febrile exudative tonsillitis: viral or streptococcal?A prospective 1-year study of acute febrile exudative tonsillitis in 110 children was carried out. Viral infection was associated with 42% of the cases, beta-hemolytic streptococci with 31% (12% group A), Mycoplasma pneumoniae with 5%, and unknown cause with 35%. More than one agent was implicated in 14% of the cases. Adenovirus was the viral agent most frequently (19%) recorded. Other viruses involved were Epstein-Barr virus, parainfluenza, influenza A, herpes simplex, and respiratory syncytial viruses. The responsible agent was found by rapid viral antigen detection in 20% of all cases and by rapid test for group A streptococcal antigen detection in 10%. Age was the most important factor in predicting the causative agent. Viral tonsillitis was most common in children younger than 3 years of age and group A beta-hemolytic streptococci tonsillitis in children 6 years of age or more. Clinical analysis of the illness, WBC count, and ESR did not reveal differences that could help in differentiating bacterial from viral tonsillitis. All patients were treated with a regimen of oral penicillin. Fever associated with group A beta-hemolytic streptococci tonsillitis responded to penicillin therapy significantly more rapidly than fever associated with viral infections. These observations demonstrate the prominent role of viruses in the etiology of febrile exudative tonsillitis, especially in young children, and reinforce the benefit of rapid tests before antibiotic therapy is started.[Streptococcal sore throat: the role of rapid diagnostic tests in the doctor's office].[Rapid diagnosis of group A streptococci in the throat cannot yet substitute for conventional culture technics].Sore throat in family practice: comparison of blood agar throat culture with a rapid enzyme immunoassay test for diagnostic purposes.The Ventrescreen (Ventrex) rapid enzyme immunoassay test for detecting group A streptococcal antigen directly from a throat swab was compared with conventional blood agar throat culture in the diagnosis of beta haemolytic streptococcal infection among 311 patients with a sore throat attending a large suburban Jerusalem primary care clinic. Using the throat culture as the 'gold standard' the Ventrescreen test had a sensitivity of 82%, a specificity of 50%, a positive predictive value of 49%, and a negative predictive value of 82% for beta haemolytic streptococcal infection. These results are not good enough for the test to be considered a reliable substitute for throat culture in such a setting. The negative predictive value, however, supports the use of a negative test result to identify those patients in whom antibiotic therapy could be withheld until the result of their throat culture became available. These conclusions are at variance with recommendations from other studies of similar tests in different population groups, and stress the need for the careful evaluation, especially in primary care clinics, of any such rapid test which claims to be able to replace throat culture in the detection of beta haemolytic streptococcal infection.Rapid commercial test for direct detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.The Hybritech Strep A ICON was used for direct testing of 1016 throat specimens for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Both the test and culture were negative in 829 specimens (81.6%); both were positive in 164 cases (16.1%); the test was positive and culture negative in 9 cases (0.9%); and the test negative and culture positive in 14 cases (1.4%).Practice tips. Incorporating a rapid group A streptococcus assay with the sore throat score.[Reliability and general practice value of 2 rapid Streptococcus A tests].Rapid streptococcal-A-antigen detection assays have good specificity (over 90 percent) but moderate sensitivity (between 80 and 90 percent), when the tests are compared with a standard throat culture. Contradictory results have been found for one of the more recent tests, the optical immune assay Strep A OIA MAX, while for 6 years, we have been using the immune assay Strep A Plus. Results of the optical immunoassay and the conventional immune assay Strep A Plus were compared in 65 patients with acute pharyngitis. A standard culture was used as reference and confirmed by enhanced broth culturing and nucleic acid hybridization assay (Gen-Probe) when the two detection assays produced contradictory results. While both assays were equally sensitive (78.3%), Strep A OIA MAX and Strep A Plus had a similar specificity of 95.2% and 100%, respectively. Four and nine steps were required for Strep A Plus and for Strep A OIA MAX test procedures, respectively with results being available in 4-5 min and in 9-10 min, respectively. We conclude that both rapid immunoassays have a similar reliability while the handling of the Strep A Plus is much simpler than the handling of the Strep A OIA MAX. Neither rapid immunoassays are sensitive enough to eliminate the need for backup cultures.New colorimetric test for rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis: a warning.Rapid diagnostic test and throat cultures for streptococcal pharyngitis.Are follow-up throat cultures necessary when rapid antigen detection tests are negative for group A streptococci?The frequency of obtaining false-negative Group A Streptococcal (GAS) rapid antigen detection (RAD) tests utilizing currently available kits in a private practice setting and the cost effectiveness of requiring follow-up throat cultures were studied. Laboratory records of the Elmwood Pediatric Group (EPG), Rochester, NY, were retrospectively reviewed to identify all patients with pharyngeal RAD tests for GAS performed from January 1996 through May 1999. From January 1996 through October 1997 (study period 1), EPG physicians used either a RAD test or a throat culture to identify GAS; from November 1997 through May 1999 (study period 2), RAD tests were used as the primary test on all patients. Rapid antigen detection test negative results were confirmed with culture. During the 3-year study 11,427 RAD tests were performed. 8,385 (73.4%) were negative and 3,042 (26.6%) were positive. In study period 1, 3,547 (73.2%) were negative and 1,299 (26.8%) were positive; in study period 2 4,837 (73.5%) were negative and 1,743 (26.5%) were positive. Of the 8,385 negative tests, 8,234 (98.2%) were followed up with throat cultures. Of these, 200 (2.4%) were identified to have been negative RAD tests that were throat culture positive (132 [3.8%] of 3,474 in study period 1 and 68 [1.4%] of 4,764 in study period 2). A cost analysis was performed for study period 2, which showed that abandoning throat culture confirmation would generate a cost saving of $13,521 per year to the practice. Throat culture confirmation of RAD test negative results in pharyngitis patients may not be medically necessary for most patients with currently available RAD tests and is costly.Comparison of the TestPack Strep A enzyme immunoassay system with anaerobically incubated cultures for detection of group A streptococci from oropharyngeal swabs.To find a rapid and sensitive test for detection of Group A streptococci (GABS), the performance of the TestPack Strep A (TPSA; Abbott) was compared with culture with the use of rayon-tipped throat swabs from symptomatic patients six months to 90 years of age. Each swab was first inoculated to a 5% sheep blood agar plate and then tested for GABS antigen with the use of the TPSA and the manufacturer's instructions. Cultures were incubated anaerobically at 35 degrees C for 36-48 hours unless positive results were obtained after one night. GABS were identified with a fluorescent antibody method or a latex antibody test. From 1,616 throat swabs, 296 (18.3%) of the cultures contained GABS. The sensitivity and specificity of the TPSA were 73.3% and 94.8%, respectively, whereas the predictive values of positive and negative results were 75.9% and 94.1%, respectively. Results varied significantly, however, with different production lots of TPSA. The TPSA does not appear to provide a sensitive alternative to an anaerobic culture for detection of GABS.[Utilization of rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcus and and bacteriologic and clinical correlations with acute angina in general medicine].A prospective study was conducted between November 1995 and May 1996 by 130 general practitioners in France to assess feasibility of a rapid routine diagnostic test for group A streptococcus infection in a general medicine setting and to search for bacteriological and clinical correlations.A routine diagnostic test was performed in all patients presenting acute pharyngitis and cultures were ordered in case of positive tests. Among the 2,800 patients included, there were 563 children under 14 years and 2,226 adults. The routine diagnostic test was positive in 393 cases (14%). A culture was obtained in 375 case and isolated group A streptococcus in 324 (11.5% of the total population). The positive predictive value of the routine diagnostic test was 86.4% in this general medicine setting.Comparing clinical signs with the results of the routine diagnostic test showed that an erythematous pultaceous aspect of the pharynx, severe dysphagia and the presence of enlarged nodes were more frequent in patients with streptococcal pharyngitis. The association of these 3 clinical signs with fever > 38 degrees C was also more frequent in patients with a positive routine diagnostic test (OR = 3.3; 95% CI = 2.5-4.4). The triad hoarseness + cough + rhinorrhea was more frequent in subjects with a positive routine diagnostic test (22.7% versus 9%; OR = 2.6; 95% CI = 2.1-4.3).The general practitioners who participated in this study found the routine diagnostic test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis was easy to use and compatible with everyday practice. This diagnostic tool was seen as a progress in the management of acute pharyngitis, but only 53.7% of the practitioners were willing to use antibiotics only for cases where a highly specific routine diagnostic test performed during the consultation identifies group A streptococcus. Lack of reimbursement by the national health assurance however makes it impossible to use this test routinely in the general medicine setting.Comparison of two rapid diagnostic tests for group A Streptococcus.Development of rapid strep test technology.Comparison of throat cultures and rapid strep tests for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.The impact of a rapid screen for streptococcal pharyngitis on clinical decision making in the emergency department.The impact of a rapid streptococcal screening test (RSS) on clinical decision making in the management of patients with acute pharyngitis was evaluated. Physicians managing 95 ambulatory patients with the complaint of sore throat were asked to estimate the probability of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis (GRABS) in each patient and whether they intended to treat with antibiotics both before and after the results of the RSS were known. Simultaneous throat cultures were obtained for 80 patients at the discretion of the treating physicians. Regression analysis revealed that the RSS result was an important independent predictor for the posttest decision to treat with antibiotics and for the estimated probability of disease. The mean absolute log-likelihood ratio was used to quantify the effect of the RSS on diagnostic certainty; a greater contribution to diagnostic certainty occurred when the RSS was positive. Physicians would have prescribed an antibiotic 49 times without the benefit of the RSS and prescribed an antibiotic 48 times given the RSS result. Without the RSS, the treatment decision contradicted the throat culture result in 25 cases. With the RSS, this occurred in 26 cases. The RSS, while influencing decision making, especially when positive, did not decrease the use of antibiotics.Rapid strep assessment.Group A streptococcal infection in patients presenting with a sore throat at an accident and emergency department: prospective observational study.To determine the prevalence of group A streptococcal infection and to evaluate the predictive value of clinical findings and rapid streptococcal antigen detection testing in patients presenting with a sore throat or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis.Prospective observational study.Accident and emergency department of a public hospital, Hong Kong.All patients presenting with a sore throat as the chief complaint, or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis, from April to September 2000.Demographic data, clinical features, microbiological throat culture results, and rapid streptococcal antigen detection (Accustrip) test results.Of 1449 patients recruited during the 6-month study period, only 44 (3.0%) had positive throat cultures for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus. The majority of group A beta-haemolytic streptococci were isolated from patients between the age of 3 and 60 years. Clinical findings other than an absence of cough were found to be unhelpful in predicting group A beta-haemolytic streptococcal throat infection. The sensitivity of the rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection test was 52.6% and the specificity was 98.2%.The prevalence of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in patients presenting with a sore throat, or suspected clinically of having acute pharyngitis, was low. If empirical antibiotics were given to all such patients, 97% of them would be unnecessarily treated. Age and absence of cough were the only clinical findings helpful in predicting the presence of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcal throat infection. The rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection test can provide a quick guide to clinicians on the necessity of antibiotic therapy. However, a confirmatory throat culture backup is recommended for patients with a negative test result.Detection of group A streptococci in the laboratory or physician's office. Culture vs antibody methods.Much controversy has existed concerning the clinical significance of small numbers of group A streptococci (eg, one to ten or even 50 colonies) recovered in culture. The relative quantity of streptococci recovered is, in part, technique dependent. This review documents the need for sensitive throat culture technology, addresses technical problems associated with the culture procedure, and, in light of these problems, explores the need for very carefully performed studies on streptococcal antigen detection kits before their implementation as a routine test either in physicians' offices or in microbiology laboratories.[Streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis: clinical vs. microbiological diagnosis].This study aimed to evaluate the role of clinical diagnosis vs. rapid antigen detection tests (RADT) in identifying streptococcal vs. non-streptococcal cases of acute pharyngitis (AP) with respect to a scoring schedule. The Breese scoring system, modified by eliminating the count of peripheral WBC, was used in the study. At enrolment, cases of AP observed by office-based pediatricians were judged on a clinical basis as possibly of streptococcal or of non-streptococcal origin and a clinical score recorded. At the end of the visit and following completion of the clinical score to document the presence/absence of a group A beta haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS), a confirmatory RADT was performed. In RADT negative cases a standard throat swab and culture were performed. In all, 629 children presenting with AP were enrolled in the study. A correct clinical diagnosis was predicted on the basis of the clinical observation in 74.2% of cases (with a sensitivity of 81.1% and specificity of 70.5%). In cases judged as "streptococcal", a mean score of 27.6 was recorded both in those patients with a positive or negative RADT/throat swab for GABHS. By contrast, among cases considered of non-streptococcal aetiology, negative RADT/culture had a mean score of 24.3 compared to a mean score of 25 in those with a positive RADT/culture. Intragroup score differences were not significant, while intergroup differences were highly significant. Optimization of AP treatment requires careful identification of streptococcal cases, avoiding unnecessary antibiotic treatment which would contribute to enhancing antibiotic resistance and increase medical treatment costs. We document that clinical observation alone, although performed by skilled pediatricians, will misdiagnose a sizeable percentage of cases. As indicated by this study, scores may suffer from a subjective interpretative bias in grading the severity of signs and symptoms.Diagnostic value of rapid antigen detection test for streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population.Acute upper respiratory tract infections in children may result in overuse of antibiotics as throat culture cannot be performed in every setting and results cannot be obtained early. A rapid and reliable test might decrease unnecessary antibiotic usage. The purpose of this study was to determine the prevalence of group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) infections in different pediatric age groups and to assess the diagnostic value of rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for streptococcal pharyngitis. This study was performed in a pediatric outpatient clinic. All children who were admitted with signs and symptoms of acute upper respiratory tract infections were included in the study. Throat culture and RADT were performed and prevalence of GABHS was assessed. Diagnostic value of RADT was determined. This study included 1248 children with a mean age of 6.3+/-3.6 years. There were 655, 518, and 75 children in age groups of 0-6, 7-12 and 13+ years, respectively. The overall prevalence of GABHS was 38.1% (475/1248), as judged by throat culture. The prevalence was highest in the 7-12-year age group (53.9%) and lowest in the 0-6-year age group (25.2%). Considering all patients, RADT gave a sensitivity of 89.7%, specificity of 97.2%. The sensitivity and specificity of RADT were similar in different age groups (p values >0.05). Diagnostic value of RADT is high and can be used safely in populations where streptococcal pharyngitis and its complications such as acute rheumatic fever and acute glomerulonephritis are common.Comparison of two rapid tests for detecting group A streptococcal pharyngitis in the pediatric population at wright-patterson air force base.This prospective cohort study compared two rapid antigen tests for group A streptococcus in an enrolled pediatric population of a busy Air Force clinic during the autumn of 2005. The study was performed to determine whether the Genzyme test was a more sensitive rapid test than the currently used Quidel test. A highly sensitive rapid test would eliminate the need to perform backup cultures, thus saving time and facilitating faster diagnosis and treatment. The study revealed that the Genzyme test was more sensitive (85.5%) than the Quidel test (79.5%). However, the difference was not statistically significant using the McNemar chi(2) tool and was attributable to random variability. Therefore, future comparative studies need to be performed to find a rapid antigen test with sensitivity comparable to that of throat culture, for use at the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base pediatric clinic.Comparative evaluation of kits for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal disease.The role of rapid diagnostic tests for Group A streptococcal disease has not been firmly established. High quality data concerning these rapid streptococcal tests are not available; current information does not allow for direct test comparisons to be made; the superiority of rapid diagnostic technology over traditional throat cultures has not been proved. Subgroups which might benefit from this technology could include those who (1) are severely ill, (2) have been excluded from school or day care because of a streptococcal infection, (3) have a history of rheumatic fever and are not taking antimicrobial prophylaxis or (4) live in a confined residential setting. Each available test kit has a mixture of performance features, allowing for individual choices based on office and practice needs. Product technology is expected to change rapidly. Reassessment of any current decision may well lead to a different conclusion in 6 to 12 months.A quick strep test.[Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis: what's new?].Culture confirmation of negative rapid strep test results.Rapid antigen detection testing in diagnosing group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.The purpose of this study was to determine the accuracy of diagnosing group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS) with rapid antigen testing compared with throat culture methods commonly used.Two separate studies were conducted. Initially, 182 patients with acute pharyngitis had both throat culture (sheep blood agar or Strep Select Agar) and rapid antigen detection screening tests (Directigen1-2-3 Group A Strep) performed. For the second study, a rapid antigen detection test (Directigen1-2-3 Group A Strep) was obtained from 614 patients. All subjects who screened negative (n = 469) received a throat culture. All subjects who screened positive (n = 145) were treated with antibiotics, and 31 of these patients received a throat culture. Statistical analyses included calculating sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and prevalence.For the initial 182 patients, the prevalence of GABHS was 12 percent. Sensitivity was 95.45 percent, specificity was 96.25 percent, positive predictive value was 77.78 percent, and negative predictive value was 99.35 percent. In the second group of subjects, four false-negatives were present (negative predictive value = 99.18 percent).Results of these pilot studies indicate that an extremely low percentage (< 1 percent) of subjects with GABHS escaped detection with our rapid screening test methods. These results conflict with results from previous investigations, which have reported relatively low specificity and sensitivity of rapid antigen detection tests when compared with throat cultures. Results from this study support treatment protocols based on a rapid screening test as a single diagnostic test.[Diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis. Rapid test prevents treatment error].[Use of streptococcal antigen tests in acute tonsillitis].Critical evaluation of a CLIA-waived streptococcal antigen detection test in the emergency department.We compare the performance of a Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA)-waived antigen detection test (ADT) analyzed in the emergency department and a CLIA moderately complex ADT performed in the hospital microbiology laboratory.Samples from throat swabs were obtained using a double-headed Culturette II (Becton Dickinson Medical Systems, Sparks, MD) from a consecutive sample of 322 patients 3 years or older who presented to the ED of a university-affiliated pediatric referral hospital with the complaint of sore throat during 1998. One swab was transported to the microbiology laboratory and analyzed using a CLIA moderately complex ADT; negative results were confirmed using sheep blood agar culture. The second swab remained in the ED where a nurse conducted a CLIA-waived ADT. The accepted standard for documentation of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) infection was either a positive moderately complex ADT or culture result. The time of specimen collection, as well as the time the ED results and microbiology laboratory results were available to treating physicians, were recorded. Main outcome measures were concordance (kappa statistic), sensitivity, and turnaround time (Mann-Whitney U test).Three hundred twenty-two patients (mean age 7.5 years) had both ADTs performed. One hundred one (31%) patients had documented GABHS in the microbiology laboratory; 83 (82%) had a positive ADT result in the microbiology laboratory, and 18 (18%) had a positive culture result after a negative moderately complex ADT result. In 299 patients or 93% (95% confidence interval [CI] 90.8%, 95.8%) of patients, the waived ADT and the moderately complex ADT results were concordant (kappa 0.82; 95% CI 0.78, 0.86; P <.001). The sensitivity of the waived ADT was 80%; the sensitivity of the moderately complex ADT approximated 82% (difference of 2%; 95%CI -3%, 7%). The median times from swab specimen collection to availability of ADT results were 10 minutes (range 3 to 37 minutes) for the waived ADT and 35 minutes (range 5 to 162 minutes) for the moderately complex ADT (P <.001) with a difference of 25 minutes (95% CI 22.4, 27.6 minutes).In this study, an ED CLIA-waived rapid streptococcal throat test performed as well as its equivalent CLIA-regulated laboratory test. Further, the ED test provided results more rapidly than the laboratory test. Our results also validate previous work that negative rapid throat test results in pediatric patients in the ED should be confirmed by standard throat culture.Rapid office methods for the diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis--reliability and impact on patient management.Evaluation of the modified Visuwell Strep-A enzyme immunoassay for detection of group-A Streptococcus from throat swabs.The modified Visuwell Strep-A enzyme immunoassay (EIA) was compared with culture for detection of group-A Streptococcus from throat swabs. Throat swabs in modified Stuarts medium obtained after culture at two institutions were tested in Visuwell. Cumulative results were n = 417, sensitivity 87.8%, specificity 89.9% predictive value positive (PVP) 67.9%, predictive value negative (PVN) 96.8%, and accuracy 89.5%. At another site, swabs were delivered to the laboratory without transport medium, cultured, and subsequently tested by Visuwell (n = 202, sensitivity 79.6%, specificity 84.5%, PVP 65.2%, PVN 91.9%, accuracy 83.2%). When 1+ culture-positive specimens were considered negative, the sensitivity and PVN increased from 79.6% to 90.2% and 91.9% to 97.1% respectively. Overall performance of the modified Visuwell was comparable with that of the initial assay for throat swabs transported with or without modified Stuarts medium. Cross reaction with organisms other than group-A Streptococcus normally found in the oropharynx was negligible in Visuwell and the limit of detection of group-A Streptococcus was 5 x 10(4) colony-forming units.Evaluation of an ELISA for group A streptococcal antigen for diagnosis of pharyngitis.Performance of rapid streptococcal antigen testing varies by personnel.Rapid carbohydrate antigen tests are frequently used to diagnose group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis. Despite evidence of modest sensitivity in medical settings, rapid antigen tests are available to the public for self-testing. We sought to determine if the personnel performing a rapid streptococcal antigen test influence the test's performance characteristics. Throat swabs of pediatric patients performed for GAS pharyngitis in a tertiary-care children's hospital network were included during two study periods in 2004 and 2005. The performance characteristics of a rapid carbohydrate antigen test were evaluated in three clinical settings against a nucleic acid probe test method according to the personnel performing the test (laboratory technologist versus nonlaboratory personnel). Between the study periods, nonlaboratory personnel from one site underwent retraining. Subsequently, the performance characteristics of the rapid antigen test were reassessed. The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test varied widely among the different testing sites (56 to 90%). Notably, test sensitivity was consistently greater when the test was performed by laboratory technologists than when it was performed by nonlaboratory personnel (P < 0.0001). Although the rapid antigen test sensitivity significantly improved after nonlaboratory personnel at one testing site were retrained (sensitivity before versus after retraining; P < 0.0001), the sensitivity remained greater in the laboratory technologist cohort (P < 0.0001). These data confirm the important relationship of the operator performing a rapid streptococcal antigen test with the test's accuracy, even in a clinical setting, where operator training is mandated. Therefore, its use outside the medical setting by lay persons cannot be recommended without culture backup.[Acute tonsillitis: clinical symptoms; bacteriologic culture and rapid test as deciding criteria for the use of antibiotics].In order to prevent late sequelae from an untreated streptococcal pharyngitis all patients with streptococcal tonsillitis/pharyngitis have to be treated with antibiotics, preferably penicillin. A correct diagnosis by clinical criteria is only achievable in 72% of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis. Additional criteria such as diagnosis by culture are, therefore, mandatory. Time is a major disadvantage of traditional culture methods. Slide agglutination tests show an acceptable sensitivity of 92% and a specificity of 93%. Due to the possibility of false negative test results, with consequent withholding of adequate antimicrobial chemotherapy, these test results should be used only as a valuable guide. Decision to administer an antibiotic should still be based on clinical criteria.Group A streptococcal tonsillitis: comparative evaluation of kits for rapid diagnosis.Evaluation of TestPack Strep A for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.The performance of TestPack Strep A (Abbott Laboratories), a rapid enzyme immunoassay, was compared with a culture-based method for the detection of group A streptococci in 648 throat swabs. The rapid test correctly detected 99 of the 128 positive and 511 of the 520 negative specimens, a sensitivity of 77% and a specificity of 98%. Although highly specific, TestPack Strep A is less sensitive than culture techniques for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Methods for the rapid screening of group A streptococci: fluorescent in situ hybridization versus immunochromatography.To evaluate the accuracy of detection for screening group A streptococci (GAS) in pediatric clinics using fluorescent in situ hybridization (FISH) and immunochromatographic assay (ICA).A group of 630 children who attended an outpatient clinic with signs and symptoms of acute upper respiratory tract infection were enrolled in this study. Specimens were collected using a double-swab collection device. Culturing methods were employed as the gold standard for comparison. Discordant results (i.e., positive results for FISH or ICA along with negative culture results) were further evaluated by using Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) with subsequent subculture for group A selective streptococcus agar. True-positive or false-positive of GAS was determined by the presence or absence of THB subculture. The diagnostic characteristics of FISH and ICA were assessed.After discrepant analysis, the sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values were as follows: 89.2, 100, 100 and 95.4%, respectively, for FISH; corresponding values for ICA were 76.8, 98.6, 96.1 and 90.5%.The results demonstrated that the FISH assay had a higher detection sensitivity than ICA and is suitable for rapid and accurate GAS screening in pediatric clinics.Detection of group A streptococci by aerobic culture and a new simplified immunoassay in three pediatric practices and a hospital laboratory.Duplicate throat swabs for detection of group A streptococci were collected in three pediatric offices from 1,035 patients with symptoms of pharyngitis. In the collecting office and in the hospital laboratory, one swab from each patient was first inoculated to sheep blood agar (incubated at 35 degrees C aerobically for 2 days) and then tested for group A streptococcal antigen by using the SMART enzyme immunoassay technique (New Horizons Diagnostics Corp) incubated for up to 24 hours. Group A streptococci were recovered in culture (from one or both swabs) and serologically identified from 444 (42.9%) of the patients. Pediatric offices numbers 1, 2, and 3 detected 84.4%, 84.6%, and 82.2%, respectively, of their patients who had positive cultures (in the office and/or laboratory) by using their own culture system and 82.6%, 71.1%, and 84.9%, respectively, of these same patients by using the SMART technique. In the laboratory, SMART test sensitivity and specificity were 71.4% and 98.7%, respectively, after 5 minutes of test incubation. However, SMART test sensitivity improved to 86.5% after overnight incubation of the immunoassay and to 91.3% if the data from one defective lot of seven SMART production lots studied were excluded. SMART test results which are negative after 5 minutes of incubation should therefore be confirmed both by reincubation of the antigen test up to 24 hours and by culture.Comparison of TestPack Plus Strep A with selective and nonselective culture media for detection of group-A streptococci.The TestPack Plus Strep A (TPPSA), an immunoassay method, was compared with conventional culture methods including nonselective trypticase soy agar with 5% sheep blood and selective SXT blood agar for detection of group-A streptococci (GAS). A total of 452 throat swabs was evaluated, of which 261 (57.7%) and 191 (42.3%) were compared with culture using nonselective and selective media, respectively. Of 261 specimens evaluated on nonselective media, 71 (27.1%) were culture positive for GAS. TPPSA demonstrated a sensitivity of 91.6% and a specificity of 94.2% with positive and negative predictive values of 85.5% and 96.8%, respectively. Of 191 specimens evaluated on selective media, 44 (23.0%) were culture positive for GAS. TPPSA demonstrated a sensitivity of 93.2% and a specificity of 98.0% with positive and negative predictive values of 93.2% and 98.0%, respectively. The performance of TPPSA when compared with nonselective and selective media demonstrated a similar sensitivity, but a higher specificity was seen when compared to selective media. Overall, TPPSA was extremely easy to perform, had built-in procedural controls, required minimal technologist time, and was easy to interpret. With an accuracy of 93.5% when compared with nonselective media and 96.9% when compared with selective media, TPPSA could be recommended as a reliable method for detection of GAS.Rapid streptococcal testing in Vietnamese children with pharyngitis.Streptococcal pharyngitis has been a significant public health problem in Vietnam for many years. Accurate diagnosis of the infection, however, has been difficult. We carried out a clinical trial of a rapid streptococcal antigen detection test (Quick-Vue (R) Flex Strep A) on a population of 777 children with pharyngitis seen at the Institute for the Protection of Children's Health (Children's Hospital) in Hanoi, Vietnam. Bacterial culture was performed in parallel with the rapid test on simultaneously obtained throat swab specimens. The rapid test was found to be 89% sensitive and 92% specific (96% in children not on prior antibiotics) compared to culture. The test was also found to be convenient and acceptable to patients and clinicians. A significant benefit of the test is that those children found positive are more likely to be treated with penicillin rather than a broad spectrum antimicrobial, which in turn will reduce the likelihood of resistant infections in the future.Performance of a rapid antigen-detection test and throat culture in community pediatric offices: implications for management of pharyngitis.The goals were to establish performance characteristics of a rapid antigen-detection test and blood agar plate culture performed and interpreted in community pediatric offices and to assess the effect of the pretest likelihood of group A streptococcus pharyngitis on test performance (spectrum bias).Two throat swabs were collected from 1848 children 3 to 18 years of age who were evaluated for acute pharyngitis between November 15, 2004, and May 15, 2005, in 6 community pediatric offices. One swab was used to perform the rapid antigen-detection test and a blood agar plate culture in the office and the other was sent to our laboratory for blood agar plate culture. Clinical findings were used to calculate the McIsaac score for each patient. The sensitivities of the office tests were calculated, with the hospital laboratory culture results as the criterion standard.Thirty percent of laboratory blood agar plate cultures yielded group A streptococcus (range among sites: 21%-36%). Rapid antigen-detection test sensitivity was 70% (range: 61%-80%). Office culture sensitivity was significantly greater, 81% (range: 71%-91%). Rapid antigen-detection test specificity was 98% (range: 98%-99.5%), and office culture specificity was 97% (range: 94%-99%), a difference that was not statistically significant. The sensitivity of a combined approach using the rapid antigen-detection test and back-up office culture was 85%. Among patients with McIsaac scores of >2, rapid antigen-detection test sensitivity was 78%, office culture sensitivity was 87%, and combined approach sensitivity was 91%. Positive diagnostic test results were significantly associated with McIsaac scores of >2.The sensitivity of the office culture was significantly greater than the sensitivity of the rapid antigen-detection test, but neither test was highly sensitive. The sensitivities of each diagnostic modality and the recommended combined approach were best among patients with greater pretest likelihood of group A streptococcus pharyngitis.Dilemmas of streptococcal pharyngitis.Although the Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus is the most common cause of acute bacterial pharyngitis in childhood, the clinical diagnosis is often not straightforward and throat cultures are advisable. To avoid unnecessary antibiotics, treatment should be delayed until culture results are available. Patients with negative cultures should discontinue any antibiotics already started on clinical grounds. Positive cultures may represent a carrier state, which can be identified by serologic studies.Which is the best method to trace group A streptococci in sore throat patients: culture or GAS antigen test?To compare an antigen detection test (GAS antigen test) with the results from combinations of two various bacteriological test media in general practice patients with sore throat. Furthermore to assess the diagnostic properties of the chosen GAS antigen test and to compare semi-quantitative results of this test with the bacterial load found in the throat culture.Two Norwegian general practices in Stokke and Kongsberg communities.306 patients with sore throat lasting less than 7 days; 244 were adults, 62 were children under 10 years old, mean age 23.9 years (SD 15.0), 40% were men.Results from GAS antigen test, and distribution of bacteriological findings in throat cultures, compared with the results of our GAS antigen test; semi-quantitative results of the GAS antigen test compared with the bacterial load by culture.In the primary culture 110 patients harboured group A streptococci (GAS) infection, while the second culture identified another 17, giving a total of 127 patients. Some 33 patients harboured large-colony groups C and G. The GAS antigen test used had a sensitivity of 97% and specificity of 95% regarding GAS when compared with the two cultures. We found a significant correlation between the bacterial loads by culture and the semi-quantitative results of the GAS antigen test.By using a second, different set of bacteriological media, we identified an additional 17 patients with GAS infections. This raises the question of validity of frequently used reference standards in studies related to streptococcal infections. Compared with the combined results of the two throat cultures, the GAS antigen test used showed high sensitivity and specificity. Semi-quantitative evaluations of the rapid immunological test may also be of clinical value.Evaluation of a rapid antigen detection test in the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in children and its impact on antibiotic prescription.To study the performance of the Becton-Dickinson Link 2 Strep A Rapid Test, a rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis in children presenting to private offices and to the Pediatric Outpatient Clinic of a university hospital, in relation to clinical criteria (fever, tender anterior cervical lymph nodes, tonsillar exudate and absence of cough), and its impact on antibiotic prescription.Children were enrolled in Group A (enrolment by private-practice paediatricians; diagnosis by clinical picture only), Group B (enrolment by private-practice paediatricians; diagnosis by RADT and culture) or Group C (enrolment by hospital-affiliated paediatricians in the Pediatric Outpatient Clinic; diagnosis by RADT and culture).During a 2 year period, 820 children were enrolled [369 (45%) in Group A, 270 (33%) in Group B and 181 (22%) in Group C]. Streptococcal pharyngitis was diagnosed by RADT and culture in 146 (32.4%) of the 451 tested children. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the RADT were 83.1%, 93.3%, 82.4% and 93.6%, respectively. A stepwise increase in the sensitivity of the RADT was noted among children with one, two, three or four clinical criteria (60.9% to 95.8%). Paediatricians without access to laboratory tests were more likely to prescribe antibiotics compared with paediatricians with access to tests (72.2% versus 28.2%, P < 0.001). Private-practice paediatricians prescribed antibiotics more frequently compared with hospital-affiliated paediatricians (55.7% versus 19.9%, P < 0.001).Our findings support screening of all children with pharyngitis for Centor criteria and subsequently performing an RADT to guide decision for antibiotic administration. Such a strategy has an important impact on limiting throat culture testing and is associated with reduced antibiotic prescription.Comparison of the sensitivity and specificity of eight commercially-available reagents for clinical detection of group A streptococcus to different extracts of streptococci.Performance of an enzyme immunoassay test and anaerobic culture for detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric practice versus a hospital laboratory.The ability of pediatricians and hospital laboratory personnel to detect group A streptococci in patients with suspected streptococcal pharyngitis was evaluated using the TestPack Strep A and anaerobic culture. Duplicate throat specimens (for similar processing by both the pediatricians and laboratory technologists) were simultaneously collected on rayon-tipped swabs from patients with symptoms of pharyngitis. Each swab was first inoculated to a 5% sheep blood agar plate, then tested for group A streptococcus antigen using the TestPack Strep A according to the manufacturer's instructions. Cultures were incubated anaerobically at 35 degrees C for 2 nights unless positive after 1 night. Group A streptococci were identified using specific antisera. Pediatric office or laboratory cultures from 112 (31.3%) of the 358 patients contained group A streptococci. Of the patients with positive cultures, 96 (85.7%) and 107 (95.5%) were detected by the pediatricians and laboratory, respectively. Respective findings with the TestPack Strep A by the pediatricians and laboratory were sensitivity 68.8% and 74.8%, specificity 94.3% and 95.6%, predictive value of a positive result 81.5% and 87.9%, and predictive value of a negative result 89.2% and 89.9%. Anaerobic culture was significantly more sensitive than the TestPack Strep A for detection of group A streptococci by both the pediatricians (P less than 0.005) and laboratory personnel (P less than 0.05).Putting rapid group A strep throat screening tests into perspective.Evaluation of two rapid antigen assays, BioStar Strep A OIA and Pacific Biotech CARDS O.S., and culture for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Two rapid methods, BioStar Strep A OIA (OIA; BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.), an optical immunoassay, and CARDS O.S. (O.S.; Pacific Biotech, Inc., San Diego, Calif.), a color immunochromographic assay, and two culture methods, one with 5% sheep blood agar (SBA) and one with Todd-Hewitt broth (TH; Remel, Lenexa, Kans.), were evaluated for use in the detection of Streptococcus pyogenes from pharnygeal swabs. Seven hundred forty-six double swabs (Culturette II) were processed, with OIA and SBA culture performed on one swab and O.S. and SBA culture performed on the other swab. The pledget from the Culturette II was incubated overnight in TH and was subcultured onto SBA for an additional 48 h in ambient air. All beta-hemolytic streptococci from culture were tested by a direct fluorescent-antibody test (Difco Laboratories, Detroit, Mich.). Specimens with discordant fluorescent-antibody test and rapid test results were also tested by using the Streptex latex agglutination reagent (Murex Diagnostics Limited, Dartford, England). The results obtained by all testing methods were compared with a combined test result ("gold standard"), which was defined as any positive culture detected by the SBA or TH culture methods and confirmed by Streptex latex agglutination or, in the case of negative results by both culture methods, a concomitant positive result by OIA and O.S. antigen testing. Sensitivity and specificity results for each of the methods were as follows, respectively: OIA, 81.0 and 97.5%; O.S., 74.4 and 99.0%; SBA culture, 92.3 and 98.3%; and TH culture, 86.4 and 100%. Both OIA and O.S. are suitable screening methods for detecting S. pyogenes directly from throat swabs but are of insufficient sensitivity to eliminate the need for backup cultures for specimens with negative OIA and O.S. results.Use of optical immunoassay to diagnose streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use of the rapid antigen technique in the diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngotonsillitis].Streptococcus pyogenes is the most frequent bacterial cause of acute tonsillopharyngitis. The validity of the rapid antigen test was analysed for its diagnosis in a Paediatric Primary Care setting. The clinical profile with better diagnostic yield was also identified. The unnecessary use of antibiotics was quantified when the rapid antigen test or only the clinical diagnosis was used. The sensitivity of the assay to penicillin, erythromycin and clindamycin was also determined.Cross-sectional study was conducted on children between 2 to 14 years with acute tonsillitis and/or pharyngitis seen in five Primary Care Centres, from January 2008 to May 2010. After a clinical diagnosis, two swabs were taken for pharyngotonsillar smears: the first was used for a rapid antigen test, and the second one for a culture and a study of antibiotic sensitivity, with its analysis being blind to the rapid test result. A total sample of 546 consecutive was envisaged and with consecutive sampling.A total 192 patients were included. The prevalence of Streptococcus pyogenes was 38.7% (95% CI: 31.4-45.7). Odynophagia and scarlatiniform rash were most likely with positive cultures, the Streptococcus pyogenes was sensitive to penicillin in 100%, to erythromycin in 97.3% and to clindamycin in 86.3%. The specificity of the rapid antigen test was 91.5% and with a Negative Predictive Value of 91.5%. About half (49.2%) of those who would have receive antibiotics for clinical suspicion would have been treated unnecessarily, with this decreasing to at least in 29.5% when using the rapid antigen test.The rapid antigen test can lead to a better use of antibiotics. Its use in Paediatric Primary Health Care could be useful when, as when the result is negative, there would be no need to confirm by a culture, in those Health Centres with difficult access to laboratory.The sensitivity and the specifity of rapid antigen test in streptococcal upper respiratory tract infections.It is aimed to detect the sensitivity and specificity of rapid antigen detection of group A beta hemolytic streptococci from throat specimen compared with throat culture. The other goal of the study is to help in giving clinical decisions in upper respiratory tract infections according to the age group, by detection of sensitivity and positive predictive values of the rapid tests and throat cultures.Rapid antigen detection and throat culture results for group A beta hemolytic streptococci from outpatients attending to our university hospital between the first of November 2005 and 31st of December 2008 were evaluated retrospectively. Throat samples were obtained by swabs from the throat and transported in the Stuart medium and Quickvue Strep A [Quidel, San Diego, USA] cassette test was applied and for culture, specimen was inoculated on 5% blood sheep agar and identified according to bacitracin and trimethoprim-sulphametaxazole susceptibility from beta hemolytic colonies.During the dates between the first of November 2005 and 31st of December 2008, from 453 patients both rapid antigen detection and throat culture were evaluated. Rapid antigen detection sensitivity and specificity were found to be 64.6% and 96.79%, respectively. The positive predictive value was 80.95% whereas negative predictive value was 92.82%. Kappa index was 0.91. When the results were evaluated according to the age groups, the sensitivity and the positive predictive value of rapid antigen detection in children were 70%, 90.3% and in adults 59.4%, 70.4%.When bacterial infection is concerned to prevent unnecessary antibiotic use, rapid streptococcal antigen test (RSAT) is a reliable method to begin immediate treatment. To get the maximum sensitivity of RSAT, the specimen collection technique used and education of the health care workers is important. While giving clinical decision, it must be taken into consideration that the sensitivity and the positive predictive value of the RSAT is quite lower in adult age group than in pediatric age group.Comparison of three methods for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Group A streptococci are generally detected in throat swabs by (i) rapid antigen tests, (ii) conventional culture, or (iii) combinations of both. Direct fluorescent-antibody testing of a 2-h enrichment broth (FA/EN) was an accepted method for same-day results before the advent of rapid antigen tests. We compared FA/EN in Todd-Hewitt Broth (THB) with conventional culture and a rapid antigen test, TestPack Strep A (TPS). Nine hundred seventy specimens were evaluated in this study. Cultures were performed for 48 h on sheep blood agar (SBA) incubated aerobically and on a selective agar for group A streptococci (SSA) incubated in 5 to 10% CO2. Following a 2-h incubation, the fluorescent-antibody test was performed. A subculture of the centrifuged sediment from the THB enrichment was also done. In comparison with a positive culture on SBA or SSA or subculture of the THB pellet, the sensitivities and specificities of the different methods were as follows: SBA, 92 and 100%; SSA, 92 and 100%; TPS, 68 and 99%; FA/EN, 88 and 98%. The FA/EN method offers the potential for definitive finalized reports on the same day as specimen collection with greater sensitivity than TPS. This study included sequential plating and rapid antigen testing of a single swab. In a separate set of experiments to validate this study design, it was shown that recovery of streptococci from swabs plated sequentially on five plates did not vary with the order of plating and the actual proportion of organisms recovered from a swab on a single plate was only 1%.Throat culture is necessary after negative rapid antigen detection tests.This study was conducted to determine if culture confirmation is needed for a negative rapid antigen detection test. Data on 18,509 tests done in patients younger than 18 years old were reviewed. Of the 14,167 (76.5%) that were negative, 968 (6.8%) were associated with positive cultures. No significant seasonal variation was noted. Significant differences were found between hospital and pediatric practices in the percentage of patients with a negative rapid antigen detection test who actually had group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (3.5% to 9.8%). This study supports the recommendation of culture confirmation of a negative rapid antigen detection test and validation of results within an individual practice if confirmatory cultures are not being performed. This study showed a high false-negative rate of the negative rapid antigen detection test and variation among hospital and pediatric practices for rates of positive culture after a negative rapid antigen detection test.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use in hospital of a rapid diagnosis test of group A streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis in children].Superiority of conventional culture technique over rapid detection of group A Streptococcus by optical immunoassay.An optical immunoassay (OIA) has been reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture for the detection of Group A Streptococcus, eliminating the need for culture. We attempted to confirm the sensitivity and specificity through a laboratory quantitation study and a clinical trial. OIA did not detect Group A Streptococcus below 10(5) colony forming units (CFU). Culture detected Streptococcus to 10(2) CFU from the inoculated swab. In the clinical study, throat swabs were obtained from 77 patients in an outpatient clinic. Compared with culture, the sensitivity of OIA was 78% and the specificity was 90%. These results demonstrate that OIA was less sensitive than culture in seeded experiments and missed 22% of positives in clinical practice. Our study, contrary to previous reports, suggests that OIA is not sensitive enough to be used as the sole assay for Group A Streptococcus pharyngitis.Evaluation of the therapy for streptococcal pharyngitis using Abbott Test Pack strep A.A total of 953 children (511 boys and 442 girls) with streptococcal pharyngitis diagnosed with Abbott Test Pack Strep A (ATPSA) or throat cultures were analyzed. ATPSA specimens were repeatedly obtained until ATPSA turned negative during or after the treatment. The percentage of positive ATPSA specimens reached the lowest value (9.2%) on the fourth day of the course of the treatment, which indicates the acquisition from an infected individual is probably uncommon after the initial treatment. Bacteriological treatment failure (positive ATPSA after 14 days of treatment) occurred in 4.1% of the children. Out of 953 subjects studied, 216 (22.7%) had recurrent infections. More than 30% of the recurrent infections occurred within 2 months after initial infection. ATPSA is useful for establishing a rapid diagnosis and confirming the bacteriological success of the treatment.[When "throats are visiting". Increased demands should be put on the rapid test].Evaluation of four methods for the detection of streptococcal group A antigen directly from throat swabs.We have compared the sensitivity, specificity and reproducibility of four rapid tests for the detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci antigen directly from a throat swab. The four methods were very specific, all of them offered reproductibility and surpassed conventional culture in speed and simplicity.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Comparison of the Gen-Probe Group A streptococcus Direct Test with culture and a rapid streptococcal antigen detection assay for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.The Gen-Probe Group A Streptococcus Direct Test (GP-ST) is a new assay which utilizes a nucleic acid probe to detect group A streptococci directly from pharyngeal swabs. In this study, 1,103 specimens were cultured and tested by GP-ST. The sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 98.8 and 100%; GP-ST, 92.4 and 99.6%. Of the 1,103 specimens, 808 were also tested with the TestPack Strep A assay. For the specimens tested by all three methods, the sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 99.5 and 100%; TestPack Strep A assay, 76.3 and 99.7%; GP-ST, 93.5 and 99.7%. The GP-ST is a very user-friendly assay which has the potential to replace culture for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Insensitivity of rapid antigen detection methods and single blood agar plate culture for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis.To compare the sensitivity of five group A streptococcal antigen detection systems and single blood agar plate culture with a two-plate culture method for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Two simultaneous throat swabs were obtained from consecutive patients with suspected streptococcal pharyngitis. One swab was tested for streptococcal antigen by physicians' office nurses and the other was cultured on both aerobic blood agar and anaerobic trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole blood agar plates.Community office practice and community hospital laboratory.Consecutive outpatients seen by one of four pediatricians or a family practice physician.Results of rapid streptococcal antigen tests were compared with culture results either on a single aerobic blood agar plate or on the two-plate culture method.On throat swabs from 755 consecutive outpatients, the two-plate culture method detected 261 cases (defined as 100%) of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. The anaerobic trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole plate alone, read at 1 and 2 days, detected 245 cases (94%). The blood agar plate used alone detected 189 cases (72%) at 2 days and 151 cases (58%) at 1 day. Antigen detection test results were positive for 106 throat specimens (41%), with individual kit sensitivity ranging from 31% to 50% compared with the two-plate culture method. Antigen detection test sensitivity decreased with decreasing colony counts. Antigen kit false-positivity rates varied from 0 to 28%.We conclude that the single blood agar plate culture and the antigen detection tests are insensitive, possibly leading the physician toward undertreatment and risking immunologic, local, or distant sequelae. The two-plate culture method should be the standard of practice to rule out streptococcal pharyngitis.Novel color test for rapid detection of group A streptococci.A novel color test for the rapid detection of group A streptococci has been developed. The test, designed to be suitable for use in clinical laboratories as well as by less experienced personnel, incorporates the simplicity of latex tests with a color change to indicate the presence of group A streptococcal antigen. The test, which takes 5 min, was evaluated with 646 throat swabs, with a 15.6% incidence of group A streptococci; for swabs which yielded 10 or more group A streptococcal colonies in cultures, the sensitivity was 96.8%, and the specificity was 99.1%. In addition, the color test was 100% sensitive and specific when used to detect group A streptococcal antigen in beta-hemolytic colonies from culture plates.Comparative evaluation of two indigenously developed tests for rapid detection of group-A streptococci directly from throat swabs.The efficacy of two indigenously developed rapid tests, latex agglutination and antibody capture assay (a colour immunochromatographic assay) to detect group A Streptococcus pyogenes (GAS) was evaluated in comparison with the traditional culture method ('Gold Standard') in both asymptomatic children (1500) and symptomatic patients (233). Throat swabs were taken in duplicate and rapid tests performed on one swab and culture on the other. Both latex agglutination and antibody capture assays showed a sensitivity of 100 per cent and specificity of > 98 per cent as compared to culture and isolation in symptomatic patients. However, among asymptomatic carriers sensitivity of 100 per cent and 87.5 per cent and specificity > 95 per cent were observed for latex agglutination and antibody capture assays respectively. Latex agglutination showed no false negative results and sensitivity was not affected by low beta-haemolytic counts in asymptomatic children. The rapid tests described here will help in the detection and thereby the management of GAS infection.Rapid detection of beta haemolytic streptococci.[Rapid diagnosis of pharyngotonsillitis using an ELISA method (Test Pack Strep A): comparison with culture and clinical data. Analysis of 306 cases].Spectrum and inoculum size effect of a rapid antigen detection test for group A streptococcus in children with pharyngitis.The stability of the accuracy of a diagnostic test is critical to whether clinicians can rely on its result. We aimed to assess whether the performance of a rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for group A streptococcus (GAS) is affected by the clinical spectrum and/or bacterial inoculum size.Throat swabs were collected from 785 children with pharyngitis in an office-based, prospective, multicenter study (2009-2010). We analysed the effect of clinical spectrum (i.e., the McIsaac score and its components) and inoculum size (light or heavy GAS growth) on the accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios and predictive values) of a RADT, with laboratory throat culture as the reference test. We also evaluated the accuracy of a McIsaac-score-based decision rule.GAS prevalence was 36% (95CI: 33%-40%). The inoculum was heavy for 85% of cases (81%-89%). We found a significant spectrum effect on sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios and positive predictive value (p<0.05) but not negative predictive value, which was stable at about 92%. RADT sensitivity was greater for children with heavy than light inoculum (95% vs. 40%, p<0.001). After stratification by inoculum size, the spectrum effect on RADT sensitivity was significant only in patients with light inoculum, on univariate and multivariate analysis. The McIsaac-score-based decision rule had 99% (97%-100%) sensitivity and 52% (48%-57%) specificity.Variations in RADT sensitivity only occur in patients with light inocula. Because the spectrum effect does not affect the negative predictive value of the test, clinicians who want to rule out GAS can rely on negative RADT results regardless of clinical features if they accept that about 10% of children with negative RADT results will have a positive throat culture. However, such a policy is more acceptable in populations with very low incidence of complications of GAS infection.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal infection.Rapid enzyme fluorescence test for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.[Current diagnosis of acute pharyngitis].Throat infections with Group A Streptococci have a high incidence and are, therefore, a considerable health problem. It is, therefore, desirable to distinguish this bacterial infections from viral infections of the upper respiratory tract. We report about the application of an immunologic rapid antigen detection test for Group A Streptococci and its medical and economic implications.In a cross-sectional cohort study, 30 family physicians documented the application of the test in 519 patients. Follow-up costs were compared with 109 family physicians who did not have access to the test.40.27% of tests performed were positive for Streptococci. 99% of those patients received antibiotic treatment - predominantly with Penicillin. From those patients who had shown a negative test result, only 18.4% received antibiotic treatment. Both patients and physicians welcomed the availability of the test. We did not find any significant difference regarding the economic effect of the test.The employment of a rapid antigen detection test for Group A Streptococci in patients with acute pharyngitis increases therapeutic certitude and guideline-conform prescription of antibiotics among family physicians. We, therefore, assume that potential side effects of unnecessary antibiotic treatments could be minimized.The evaluation of SD Bioline Strep A rapid antigen test in acute pharyngitis in pediatric clinics.Acute pharyngitis is a very common respiratory tract infection. Rapid antigen tests (RATs) that detect group A streptococci (GAS) have an advantage over conventional throat culture in determining the cause of acute pharyngitis quickly. The efficiency of RAT should be good enough to be used in the laboratory or in the clinics.From October 2008 through February 2009, throat swabs were taken from 293 children with acute pharyngitis and conveyed to the Gyeongsang National University Hospital in a transport medium. Two swabs from each patient were inoculated onto a blood agar plate, then returned to the transport medium and stored at -20 degrees C for several months. After the samples were thawed at room temperature, the SD Bioline Strep A RAT (SD, Korea) was performed.The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of SD Bioline Strep A compared with throat culture were 95.9% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 93.6-98.2%), 91.8% (95% CI: 88.5-95.1%), 95.9% (95% CI: 93.6-98.2%), and 91.8% (95% CI: 88.5-95.1%), respectively.The SD Bioline Strep A RAT kit can be useful as an alternative to throat cultures in the clinics for rapid diagnosis of GAS pharyngitis and for an early decision on the use of antibiotics.Bacteriological examination of pharyngeal secretions.Evaluation of a rapid method for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis in an office laboratory.Performance of a predictive model for streptococcal pharyngitis in children.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GABHS) pharyngitis is a common childhood illness. The clinical diagnosis is difficult to determine and laboratory tests have limitations; hence, the condition is generally overdiagnosed and overtreated. Several clinical pediatric-specific predictive models have been published but none have been prospectively studied.To test the performance of a previously published predictive model for GABHS pharyngitis in children in different clinical settings and during different seasons.Prospective cohort study.Pediatric emergency department and 2 pediatric outpatient clinics.Children aged between 1 and 18 years with pharyngitis on initial examination at study sites between April 1, 1999, and March 31, 2000.Recording of clinical features during initial evaluation using a standardized form and recovery of GABHS from patients' throats using reference standard methods.Posttest probability for GABHS positive throat culture associated with the model's positive predictors (moderate to severe tonsillar swelling, cervical lymphadenopathy [moderate to severe tenderness and enlargement of cervical lymph nodes], scarletiniform rash, and the absence of coryza) and the models' negative predictors (absence of the above signs and the presence of coryza).Of 587 patients analyzed, 218 (37%) had a positive throat culture for GABHS. Forty-nine percent were boys. Mean +/- SD age was 6.7 +/- 3.9 years. There was no difference between the subsets within the sample. The posttest probability values for a positive throat culture associated with positive and negative predictors of the model were 79% and 12%, respectively.A pediatric predictive model for GABHS pharyngitis performed better than physicians' subjective estimates for a positive throat culture and was comparable with a rapid antigen detection test. The model performed consistently well in different populations and across seasons. It can be useful if reliable microbiological testing and/or follow-up are not attainable.Direct antigen test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of Visuwell enzyme immunoassay to culture for detection of group A Streptococcus in throat swab specimens.A microwell enzyme immunoassay (Visuwell) for direct detection of Group A streptococcal antigen from throat swab specimens has been developed. It incorporates urease conjugated antibody as the detector and is easily interpreted by a yellow to purple color change. Throat specimens obtained on rayon-tipped swabs were transported moist in modified Stuarts medium and cultured before being tested in Visuwell (n = 585, prevalence 17.1%, sensitivity 88%, specificity 92.4%, predictive value positive 70.4%, predictive value negative 97.4%, and accuracy 91.6%). In instances of discrepancy between culture and Visuwell, throat swab extracts were tested in a latex agglutination test. In 21 of 37 instances of Visuwell-positive, culture-negative specimens, latex agglutination was positive. Throat specimens obtained using double rayon swabs and transported to the laboratory dry had one swab cultured and the other tested in Visuwell (n = 280, prevalence 20.4%, sensitivity 75.4%, specificity 88.3%, predictive value positive 62.3%, predictive value negative 93.4%, and accuracy 85.7%). When 1+ culture positive specimens were considered negative, a sensitivity of 97.6% was obtained. In 14 of 26 instances of Visuwell-positive, culture-negative specimens, latex agglutination was positive. Cross-reaction with organisms other than Group A Streptococcus found in the oropharynx was negligible in Visuwell. Limit of detection of Group A streptococcal antigen was equivalent for Visuwell and latex agglutination.Better diagnosis and treatment of throat infections caused by group A beta-haemolytic streptococci.This study aims to assess the diagnostic value of a rapid streptococcal antigen test in addition to four clinical features in patients with sore throat, using throat culture and antibody titre as reference tests, and to evaluate the efficacy of the current antibiotics used in the treatment of throat infections caused by group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS). Four clinical features (fever [history of] > or = 38 degrees C, lack of cough, tonsillar exudate, and anterior cervical lymphadenopathy) are recorded in 355 patients aged four years to > or =15 years. A rapid antigen diagnostic test (RADT) is performed, as well as a throat culture. Antistreptolysin O (ASO) titre is performed in patients 11 years. GABHS from patients are tested for susceptibility to different antibiotics. Throat cultures were positive for GABHS in 19% patients. Rapid tests were positive in 24%. Compared with throat culture, the rapid test gave a sensitivity of 91%, specificity of 91%, positive predictive value of 73% and a negative predictive value of 98%. For patients with three or four clinical features, however, the sensitivity was considerably higher at 97%. Using the ASO test as a reference, no association was found between RADT and culture results. Zithromax showed the highest prescription rate (25.5%) and produced a high cure rate (91%) in patients with GABHS pharyngitis.Management of group A streptococcus pharyngitis with a second-generation rapid strep screen: Strep A OIA.Empirical therapy of presumed group A streptococcus (GAS) pharyngitis leads to unnecessary and inappropriate use of antibiotics and pressure for emergence of resistant strains of common bacteria. Immunoassay technology has produced several rapid tests for GAS. The wide variations in diagnosis and treatment of acute pharyngitis are reviewed including the impact of rapid strep tests. Published studies comparing Strep A OIA to routine agar culture and other rapid strep screens are presented to assess the reliability and applicability of this novel assay. These data suggest that Strep A OIA may be superior to the "gold standard" throat culture and other rapid streptococcal antigen detection assays. Judicious use of Strep A OIA can result in rapid, precise diagnoses and eliminate unnecessary and inappropriate use of antibiotics. Careful antibiotic selection can reduce the pressure for emergence of resistant bacteria. This innovative, effective assay can contribute to a lessening of this serious clinical challenge.Streptococcal pharyngitis: impact of a high-sensitivity antigen test on physician outcome.The purpose of the present study was to determine whether the availability of results from a high-sensitivity, rapid test for group A streptococci (Strep A OIA; BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.) improves physician outcome. The study population included 465 consecutive patients with symptoms of acute pharyngitis seen in two outpatient clinics in a large suburban medical center; one clinic, a walk-in clinic (WIC), primarily saw adult patients, and one clinic, a pediatric and adolescent medicine clinic (PED), primarily saw pediatric patients. We measured improvement in physician outcome by comparing physician intent for prescribing an antibiotic based on clinical impression with physician practice once the results of the Strep A OIA were known. Based upon intent, the physicians seeing WIC patients (WIC physicians) would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 42% of patients with cultures positive for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS) and 61% of patients with cultures negative for GABHS. After receiving the results of the Strep A OIA, WIC physicians prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 81% of patients with positive cultures and 72% of patients with negative cultures. Based upon intent, the physicians seeing PED patients (PED physicians) would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 35% of patients with positive cultures and 77% of patients with negative cultures. After receiving the results of the Strep A OIA, PED physicians prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 90% of patients with positive cultures and 81% of patients with negative cultures. Based on a 14.5% prevalence of GABHS among WIC patients, Strep A OIA improved the overall WIC physician outcome from 58 to 74%. Based on a 31.5% prevalence of GABHS among PED patients, Strep A OIA improved the PED physician outcome from 64 to 84%. Had Strep A OIA alone guided therapeutic choice, physicians would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 95% of the patients at the time of the initial encounter. We conclude that the use of Strep A OIA improves physician outcome.Liposome immunoassay for rapid identification of group A streptococci directly from throat swabs.The Q Test Strep (Becton Dickinson and Co., Franklin Lakes, N.J.) is a new solid-phase liposome immunoassay for the rapid diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis. Compared with blood agar plate cultures, the Q Test Strep had a sensitivity of 91%, a specificity of 83%, a positive predictive value of 88%, and a negative predictive value of 87%. Liposome technology can be used to facilitate the rapid diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.Sensitivity and specificity of rapid antigen detection testing for diagnosing pharyngitis in the emergency department.Acute pharyngitis in adults is primarily a viral infection; only about 10% of cases are of bacterial etiology. Most cases of bacterial pharyngitis are caused by group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS). One laboratory method for the diagnosis of GABHS is rapid antigen diagnostic testing (RADT), which can be processed during an emergency department visit and which has become a popular alternative to throat swab cultures. We conducted a study to define the sensitivity and specificity of RADT, using throat culture results as the gold standard, in 100 emergency department patients who presented with symptoms consistent with streptococcal pharyngitis. We found that RADT had a sensitivity of 68.2% (15 of 22), a specificity of 89.7% (70 of 78), a positive predictive value of 65.2% (15 of 23), and a negative predictive value of 90.9% (70 of 77). We conclude that RADT is useful in the emergency department when the clinical suspicion is GABHS, but results should be confirmed with a throat culture in patients whose RADT results are negative.Rapid detection of group A streptococci: comparative performance by nurses and laboratory technologists in pediatric satellite laboratories using three test kits.Rapid tests for detecting group A streptococci in throat swabs are often performed outside hospitals or commercial laboratories by individuals with little or no technical training. We compared the abilities of nurses and technologists to perform and interpret three commercial kits (Directigen 1-2-3, ICON Strep A, and Culturette Brand 10-Minute Strep A ID) in three hospital satellite locations (the emergency department, a walk-in emergency clinic, and a general pediatric clinic). When the three tests were compared with culture, the sensitivities of the tests as performed by nurses and technologists, respectively, were 39 versus 44% for Directigen, 55 versus 51% for Culturette, and 72 versus 39% for ICON. A significant difference in sensitivity was found only with ICON tests. This result was largely explained by the tendency of technologists to test moist swabs, while nurses generally processed dry swabs; ICON test sensitivity was significantly greater with dry swabs. The specificities of Directigen and ICON tests performed by nurses and technologists were high (97 to 100%). The difference in the specificities of the Culturette test as determined from results obtained by nurses and technologists (80 versus 98%) was due to the tendency of one nurse to overinterpret the latex agglutination reaction. Analysis of the accuracies of the tests during practice periods compared with the accuracies of the tests during the study periods revealed statistically significant improvement in test performance. We conclude that these tests are specific but not sensitive when performed by nurses and technologists in satellite laboratories. With one exception, nurses and technologists performed the tests with comparable accuracy after brief training periods.Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by detection of Streptococcus pyogenes in posterior pharyngeal versus oral cavity specimens.Carbohydrate antigen detection, nucleic acid probe detection, and bacterial culture are commonly used to confirm group A streptococcus (GAS) pharyngitis. Compared to standard throat swab specimens, the sensitivities of these tests with mouth specimens are poor. When testing for GAS pharyngitis, the throat remains the optimum site for sampling.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis using enzyme immunoassay.Should a near-patient test be part of the management of pharyngitis in the pediatric emergency department?The study's objective was to evaluate the efficacy of a rapid streptococcal test as a single diagnostic agent in the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in patients presenting to a pediatric emergency department.We performed a rapid streptococcal test as part of the diagnostic workup for patients presenting with clinical findings consistent with streptococcal pharyngitis. In addition to undergoing the study intervention, each patient had a standard throat swab sent to the laboratory for formal culture. A questionnaire detailing the clinical features was to be completed in each case.Two hundred ten near-patient tests were performed. Complete laboratory results were available in 177 cases (77%). Clinical data were available for analysis in 94 patients (53%). In our patient population, the near-patient test had a high specificity (98.6%) but a low sensitivity (71%). The clinical presentation of confirmed group A β-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis is very variable.The QuickVue In-Line Strep A test for streptococcal pharyngitis is unreliable in our patient population. Clinical findings are unhelpful in confirming the diagnosis. Formal laboratory culture is the criterion standard for identifying the organism, but the results are not clinically significant in every case. Acute pharyngitis presenting to the pediatric emergency department can be managed in accordance with the recommendations in the Scottish Intercollegiate Guideline Network guideline.Performance of a solid phase enzyme immunoassay for detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric office laboratory as refereed by a hospital laboratory.We evaluated the performance of a new rapid solid phase enzyme immunoassay, SUDS Group A Strep (MUREX Corp., Norcross, GA) for the detection of Group A beta-hemolytic streptococci in a pediatric office practice. Duplicate throat swabs were obtained from 341 children with pharyngitis. One swab was used in the SUDS test and the other was cultured in the office laboratory. Office SUDS and culture (sheep blood agar plate, aerobic 24-hour incubation) were compared with culture using reference techniques (sheep blood agar plate, anaerobic 48-hour incubation) in a hospital laboratory. Compared with hospital laboratory culture, the sensitivity of office SUDS (73.8%) was superior to that of office culture (66.6%) at P = 0.05. Specificities were 93.1 and 98.6%, respectively; positive predictive values were 86.1 and 96.6%; and negative predictive values were 85.9 and 83.5%. The sensitivity and specificity of SUDS compared with office culture were 88.5 and 87.8%, respectively, but would have been 93 and 94% had hemolyzed media not been used on several occasions in the office culture procedure. We conclude that SUDS Group A Strep was significantly more sensitive than throat cultures as performed in a typical pediatric practice although the performance of office cultures could have been improved by standard quality control techniques.Rapid, optical immunoassay for streptococcal pharyngitis.Defining the limits of office (and home) laboratory testing: rapid streptococcal antigen tests.[Evaluation of a rapid technique for detecting the type A Streptococcus antigen (Test Pack Strep A)].To test a rapid technique of Antigen Detection (TAD) of Type A Betahemolitic Streptococci (BHSA) in Acute Tonsillitis (AT), comparing it with and using as a point of reference traditional Blood Agar Cultivation (BAC). Additionally, the use of Clinical Data as a method of supposed Diagnosis was studied.Prospective observational study. SITE. Health Primary Care (Maspalomas Health Centre).118 patients between the ages of 1 and 71 affected by AT.There was a proportion of 13.56% BHSA in the AT of our sample, with a Confidence Interval (CI) of 95% (7.38-19.74) using the BAC; and 17.80% with a CI of 95% (10.90-24.70) using the TAD. The following values were obtained for the TAD: Sensitivity (S) of 93.75%, Specificity (Sp) of 94.12%, Positive Predictive Value (PPV) of 71.43% and Negative Predictive Value (NPV) of 98.9%. Of the clinical variables studied, only the presence/absence of Exudate and Adenopathies were linked to the presence of BHSA in the Cultivations (p less than 0.05 and p less than 0.01 respectively); with, however, inconclusive S, Sp, PPV and PNV values.We found insufficient correlation between clinical findings and the presence of BHSA to consider it a valid method of supposed diagnosis. There was however a statistical link between the presence of Exudate and local Adenopathies, and a positive result in the cultivation. The TAD is shown to be a rapid method, easy to use, and highly reliable for the discovery of the presence of BHSA in AT.Rapid streptococcal tests.Comparison of LightCycler PCR, rapid antigen immunoassay, and culture for detection of group A streptococci from throat swabs.We compared the performance characteristics of a real-time PCR method, the LightCycler Strep-A assay (Roche Applied Science, Indianapolis, Ind.), to those of a rapid antigen immunoassay, the Directigen 1-2-3 Group A Strep Test kit (BD Diagnostic Systems, Sparks, Md.), and a standard culture method for detection of group A streptococci (GAS) from 384 throat swabs. The LightCycler PCR produced more positive results (n = 58) than either culture (n = 55) or the Directigen immunoassay (n = 31). The results of the LightCycler PCR and the Directigen method were independently compared to the results of the accepted "gold standard," bacterial culture. The sensitivities, specificities, and positive and negative predictive values for this comparison were as follows: for the Directigen method, 55, 99, 97, and 93%, respectively; for the LightCycler PCR, 93, 98, 88, and 99%, respectively. In no case was a throat swab positive by both the LightCycler PCR and the Directigen method but negative by culture. The medical histories of patients whose throat swabs were negative by culture but positive by either the LightCycler PCR (n = 7) or the Directigen method (n = 1) were reviewed. All of these patients had signs or symptoms compatible with GAS disease, and therefore, all of these discordant positive results (along with positive results by either the Directigen method or the LightCycler PCR that agreed with the culture results) were counted as true positives for statistical analysis. For this analysis, the LightCycler PCR detected more true-positive results than the culture method (58 versus 55 swabs); however, this difference was not statistically significant (P = 0.5465). In contrast, statistically significantly more true-positive results occurred by culture than by the Directigen method (55 versus 31 swabs; P < 0.0001) and by the LightCycler PCR than by the Directigen method (58 versus 31 swabs; P < 0.0001). The LightCycler PCR is a suitable stand-alone method for the detection of GAS from throat swabs. Additionally, this method requires less than half the personnel time and the procedure can be completed in considerably less time ( approximately 1 h) than our standard approach (up to 2 days) for detection of GAS in throat swabs (i.e., testing by the Directigen method with negative results verified by culture).Comparison of Directigen Group A Strep Test with a traditional culture technique for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.The Directigen Group A Strep Test (DGAST), a new rapid method of detecting group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from throat swabs, was compared with a traditional culture technique for the detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Five hundred oropharyngeal swabs from pediatric and adult patients were cultured and then processed by using the DGAST. Of the 144 specimens positive by culture, 131 were DGAST positive (sensitivity, 90.9%). Of the 356 specimens negative by culture, 353 were DGAST negative (specificity, 99.2%). Twelve of the 13 false-negative DGAST results were from pediatric patients. One hundred isolates of non-group A beta-hemolytic streptococci were recovered, primarily groups C, F, and G. The DGAST is easy to perform, rapid, sensitive, and very specific for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from swabs. Supplementing the DGAST with a culture on a 5% sheep blood agar plate would enhance detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci, especially in pediatric patients.[A rapid test for tonsillitis/pharyngitis as an aid in the diagnostic arsenal].Rapid detection of group A streptococcal antigen with a new optical immunoassay.Are current rapid detection tests for Group A Streptococci sensitive enough? Evaluation of 2 commercial kits.A new, 1-step, enzyme-linked immunoassay kit for detection of Group A Streptococci (GAS) in throat samples (QuickVue In-Line One-Step Strep A Test; Quidel Corporation, San Diego, CA) was evaluated for use in a study comprising 536 patients in 8 primary healthcare centres. Compared to conventional culture at the clinical microbiology laboratory, the sensitivity achieved was 73.9% and the specificity 86.8%; these figures were not affected to any major extent by broth enrichment of samples before culturing or following PCR testing of the cysteine proteinase gene for independent diagnosis of GAS. It was also found that most samples containing low numbers of GAS were missed by the rapid test. We therefore evaluated the kit in use in our area (TestPack Plus Strep A Test; Abbott Laboratories, Chicago, IL) in a separate study of 615 patients. Somewhat increased sensitivity (82.8%) and specificity (96.1%) were obtained. As current antigen tests depend on subjective judgement of test outcome, improvements in test design or provision of more detailed instructions may be desirable in order to achieve optimal results.[Rapid diagnosis of Streptococcus A angina].Evaluation of a rapid test for group A Streptococcus at a physician's office and hospital laboratory in Buenos Aires, Argentina.Rapid detection of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population with optical immunoassay.Streptococcal pharyngitis in a primary care clinic.A study to determine the sensitivity and specificity of the Directogen Group A Streptococcal Test was carried out in a primary care clinic in University Hospital, Kuala Lumpur. The study also looked at the prevalence of streptococcal pharyngitis in the clinic. We found that the rapid test has a sensitivity of 90.9% and a specificity of 90.7%. Viral pharyngitis is the commonest form (63%) of pharyngitis followed by Group A Beta haemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis (14.2%). The presence of exudates, tonsillar enlargement and the presence of tender cervical lymph nodes have a significantly higher association with streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of an immunochromatographic method for rapid identification of group A streptococcal antigen with culture method.To compare the sensitivity and specificity of Concise Strep A (Hybritech, San Diego, Calif), an immunochromatographic group A streptococcal rapid antigen detection system, with a two-plate culture method for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis, and to evaluate the need for routine back-up culture when this rapid test is used.Throat cultures were obtained from 351 children with acute pharyngitis by duplicate rayon-tipped swabs held in parallel and vigorously rubbed against both tonsils and the posterior pharyngeal wall. One swab was tested for group A streptococcal antigen by a registered licensed laboratory technologist in the pediatrician's office. The other swab was streaked over each of two sheep blood agar plates, one of which was enhanced with trimethoprim in combination with sulfamethoxazole. The plain sheep blood agar plate was then incubated in a candle-extinguish jar. The enhanced agar plate was placed in a gas-pack anaerobic jar. Both plates were incubated for up to 48 hours at 35 degrees C.A six-person group pediatric practice.Three hundred fifty-one children.The Concise Strep A antigen detection test produced 129 positive results. Only six of the 129 were not confirmed by culture method. There were four false-negative rapid streptococcal antigen detection test results, all of which were found after a single overnight incubation. The sensitivity for the Concise Strep A test was 96.9% and the specificity was 97.4%. The plain 5% sheep blood agar plate (without trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole), which was incubated in a candle-extinguish jar, identified 123 (97%) of the 127 positive throat cultures. The second 24-hour incubation and use of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole agar were not rewarding for this study.Concise Strep A, a polyclonal antibody test, in conjunction with a color immunochromatographic assay for soluble streptococcal carbohydrate antigen A appears to be accurate, sensitive, and specific when throat swabs are carefully obtained and when qualified, licensed laboratory technologists perform the procedure. Further studies should be done to confirm our findings, especially when nurses or office staff perform the rapid test procedure in the office setting. If our findings are confirmed, the use of back-up cultures for negative rapid test results obtained using Concise Strep A would be unnecessary.Relationship between the clinical likelihood of group a streptococcal pharyngitis and the sensitivity of a rapid antigen-detection test in a pediatric practice.The sensitivity of a rapid antigen-detection test (RADT) for group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis is critical to whether the test is cost-effective and to whether a confirmatory throat culture is needed. We evaluated a second-generation RADT to determine if its sensitivity varies across the broad clinical spectrum of patients tested for GAS in pediatric outpatient practice.We used laboratory logbooks from a single pediatric clinic to identify 1184 consecutive patient visits at which an RADT was performed. In a blinded chart review, we calculated McIsaac scores to separately estimate the pretest clinical likelihood of GAS pharyngitis for visits at which the RADT result was positive (n = 384) and for visits at which the result proved to be false-negative (n = 65). Positive RADT results were assumed to be true positives, and test sensitivity was estimated by dividing the number of positive results by the sum of positives and false-negatives.As the clinical likelihood of GAS increased, there were stepwise increases in RADT sensitivity (from 0.67 to 0.88). Sensitivity was low (0.73; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.62-0.86) in patients clinically unlikely to have GAS (McIsaac score < or =2) and high (0.94; 95% CI: 0.89-0.99) in patients <15 years old who had tonsillar exudate and no cough. False-negative RADT results were associated with lighter growth of GAS than found on specimens obtained from a random sample of clinic patients who had only primary throat cultures ordered.For pediatric patients who are clinically unlikely to have GAS pharyngitis, as indicated by a McIsaac score < or =2, the sensitivity of a second-generation RADT may drop below thresholds reported for cost-effectiveness. For children who have tonsillar exudate and no cough, the test may be sensitive enough to meet current pediatric practice guidelines for stand-alone testing.Evaluation of the diagnostic accuracy of a kit for the rapid detection of group A streptococci.A rapid immunoassay method using an Event Test Strip Strep A experimental kit (Boehringer Mannheim) was evaluated. Results obtained were compared with culture results to evaluate the accuracy of detection of group A streptococci directly from throat swabs or from artificial swabs containing various bacterial concentrations. A good diagnostic accuracy was obtained with a sensitivity of 96.9% in the assay of throat swabs which provided more than ten group A Streptococcus colonies per plate. Since a low level of micro-organisms may indicate infection, it is recommended that a culture be performed when the rapid test based on antigen detection is negative.[Evaluation of the diagnostic reagents which detect group A Streptococcus with the immunochromatographical method].Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was evaluated for this sensitivity and specificity. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A had a capacity to detect Group A Streptococcus in 1.5x10(5) cfu/swab. The sensitivity of Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was 4 times higher than the sensitivity of the latex agglutination test (Serodirect 'Eiken' Strep A) and was almost the same as the immunochromatography test (TESTPACK Plus STREP A, CLEARVIEW STREP A and ImmunoCard STAT! STREP A TEST). No cross reaction was observed among 27 strains of 25 species microorganisms with Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A was compared with TESTPACK Plus STREP A among throat swabs from 50 patients with pharyngitis. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A had a sensitivity of 92.9%, a specificity of 90.5% and an agreement of 91.8%. Dipstick 'Eiken' Strep A is found to be useful diagnostic assay in the clinical laboratories.The utility of rapid antigen detection testing for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in low-resource settings.To evaluate the utility of rapid antigen detection testing (RADT) for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis in pediatric outpatient clinics in four countries with varied socio-economic and geographic profiles.We prospectively evaluated the utility of a commercial RADT in children aged 2-12 years presenting with symptoms of pharyngitis to urban outpatient clinics in Brazil, Croatia, Egypt, and Latvia between August 2001 and December 2005. We compared the performance of the RADT to culture using diagnostic and agreement statistics, including sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values. The Centor scores for GAS diagnosis were used to assess the potential effect of spectrum bias on RADT results.Two thousand four hundred and seventy-two children were enrolled at four sites. The prevalence of GAS by throat culture varied by country (range 24.5-39.4%) and by RADT (range 23.9-41.8%). Compared to culture, RADT sensitivity ranged from 72.4% to 91.8% and specificity ranged from 85.7% to 96.4%. The positive predictive value ranged from 67.9% to 88.6% and negative predictive value ranged from 88.1% to 95.7%.In limited-resource regions where microbiological diagnosis is not feasible or practical, RADTs should be considered an option that can be performed in a clinic and provide timely results.[Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis].Evaluation of streptococcal clinical scores, rapid antigen detection tests and cultures for childhood pharyngitis.Use of selective vs standard sheep blood agar for the diagnosis of hemolytic streptococcus group A pharyngitis.[Streptococcal pharyngitis in the pediatric emergency department: value and impact of rapid antigen detection test].The French Health Agency (Afssaps) recommands the resort to the streptocoque rapid test strip for a better targetting of antibiotics prescription.To evaluate the systematic use of the test in a pediatric emergengy department.Comparison of results of the test to the laboratory cultures. Our study took place between January and December 2004. Two thousand one hundred (and) forty-four children with acute pharyngitis have been included (mean age: 4.8+/-3.6 years).Group A streptococcus was involved in 57 pharyngitis (26%). Mean age of children with positive culture was 7+/-3 years versus 4+/-3 years if culture was negative (p>0.05). The test sensitivity was 77% (CI 95%: 65-86) and its specificity 82% (CI 95%: 75-87), the positive predictive value was 60% (CI 95%: 49-71) and the negative predictive value 91% (CI 95%: 85-95). Antibiotic prescriptions have diminished: no prescription for 70% of pharyngitis and for 93% if cultures were negative.The rapid test strip wide use has a strong repercussion on the antibiotics prescription. This test is realist in pediatric emergency unit.Point-of-care testing of group A streptococcal antigen: performance evaluated by external quality assessment.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the overall performance of rapid antigen detection (RAD) in group A streptococcus (GAS) in Finland by using the results of external quality assurance (EQA) samples. We also compared the performance of laboratory professionals to that of nursing professionals. Around 22,800 EQA results among a total of 383 laboratories and physician's offices were analysed. Vocational data on the personnel who carried out the tests were available for 10,088 EQA samples, 7,428 of which were tested by laboratory technicians and 2,531 by nursing staff. The best overall performance was found with GAS-negative samples: 99% of the reports were correct. In contrast, the overall performance was only 76% when the samples were weakly positive for GAS antigen. The laboratory technicians performed statistically significantly better than the nursing staff, with both strongly positive (correct results 98.9% vs. 95.1%, respectively; p<0.001) and weakly positive (79.3% vs. 65.3%, respectively; p<0.001) samples. With negative samples, no difference in performance between the laboratory and nursing staff was found (99.5% vs. 99.0%, respectively). The professional skills of the person performing the RAD test for GAS have a major impact on the sensitivity of the test. Based on the results of this study, we suggest that EQA-like artificial specimens could be used as a tool to improve and validate the quality of RAD testing in individual testing sites.Performance characteristics and utilization of rapid antigen test, DNA probe, and culture for detection of group a streptococci in an acute care clinic.Group A streptococcus (GAS) antigen testing has become a routine point-of-care (POC) test in acute care settings. Concern about performance parameters (PP) of these tests as well as inappropriate antibiotic use has resulted in various recommendations regarding diagnosis of GAS. There were two objectives in this study. The first was to evaluate the rapid GAS antigen test presently in use (Thermo BioStar, Boulder, Colo.) and the GAS Direct probe test (Gen-Probe, San Diego, Calif.) compared to culture. The second was to define the optimal use of these technologies in a large acute care pediatric clinic. A total of 520 consecutive pediatric patients presenting with symptoms of pharyngitis at any of three Lahey Clinic acute care facilities were evaluated. Pharyngeal specimens were collected using a double-swab collection device (Copan, Corona, Calif.). One swab was used for the antigen test, the second was used for the probe test, and the pledget was placed in the collection device for culture on 5% sheep blood agar, incubated for 48 h anaerobically, and subsequently placed in Todd-Hewitt broth. After discrepant analysis, sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were as follows: 94.8, 100, 100, and 96.9% for the probe test and 86.1, 97.1, 93.7, and 93.4% for the antigen test, respectively. Sensitivity using an enhanced culture technique was 99.4% (163 of 164). False-positive (FP) antigen results were often seen from patients previously diagnosed and/or treated for GAS. No FP results were seen with the probe test. Colony counts for the false-negative (FN) antigen tests were higher than those for the FN probe tests. Compared to culture and DNA probe, the rapid antigen test (RAT) offered a result at the time of the patient's visit, with acceptable PP when prevalence of disease is high. Follow-up testing with the RAT of GAS patients who previously tested as positive should be avoided due to increased FP results. The probe test was comparable to culture in performance. Results indicate the probe test can be used as the primary test or as a backup to negative antigen tests. The probe test offers the advantage over culture of same-day reporting of a final result but, in contrast to a POC test, necessitates follow-up communication to the patient. Preliminary data show the specificity of the probe test to be greater than that of the RAT for patients previously diagnosed with GAS.[Fast diagnostic tests in the management of group A beta-heamolytic streptococcal pharyngitis].Routine clinical diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes in pharyngitis is not always easy. The use in common practice of rapid diagnosis test (RDT), might offer a best control of the antibiotic treatments. The aim of this study is to present seven rapid diagnosis tests, to assess their feasibility and finally to determine the bacteriological correlation.We propose to compare the results obtained with seven RDT, and to assess their interest in medical diagnosis for group A streptococcus pharyngitis. A prospective study was conducted for three months, a RDT was performed for children (n=75) between eight and fourteen years old presenting acute pharyngitis. Several throat sampling were performed to order cultures.The group A streptococcus was isolated in 33% (n=25) of throat sampling. Comparing cultures results, and for all studied tests, we obtained comparable performances with manufacturer data, specificity upper than 94% and sensitivity upper than 88%.All assessed RDT may offer to physicians a decision-making tool for rapid diagnosis. However, because of its complexity, the agglutination test can be used only in pathology laboratories.[Strep A test and ear irrigation].[Rapid technics for antigen detection in acute streptococcal pharyngitis].[Predictive value of rapid antigenic technics in the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngitis].Use of plastic kits for rapid recovery of streptococci in epidemiological studies.Evaluation of two ELISA tests for the rapid detection of group A streptococci.We examined 579 oropharyngeal swab specimens from children presenting with pharyngitis in order to compare two rapid diagnostic ELISA tests for group A streptococcal antigen: the TestPack Strep A (TPSA), and the Direct Strep A EIA (DSAE), with an anaerobically incubated sheep blood agar culture. The sensitivities of the methods were respectively 60.8% (TPSA) and 64.4% (DSAE), the specificities 98.3% (TPSA) and 93.2% (DSAE), the positive predictive values 88.6% (TPSA) and 70.3% (DSAE) and the negative predictive values 92.0% (TPSA) and 91.2% (DSAE). We conclude that the TPSA is easy to interpret and is sufficiently specific to initiate treatment in patients with a positive test. It is not sufficiently sensitive to ensure negative or intermediate results. The performance of the DSAE test is similar but the specificity is slightly lower and more false positive results occur.Acute pharyngitis: no reliability of rapid streptococcal tests and clinical findings.Rapid streptococcal tests.Value of new rapid tests for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Enzyme fluorescence procedure for rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Sensitivity of a rapid antigen detection test for group A streptococci in a private pediatric office setting: answering the Red Book's request for validation.In the office laboratory of our private practice, the sensitivity of a single rapid antigen detection (RAD) test for group A streptococci (compared with backup throat culture) was examined over 3 winter periods. When cultures were held only 24 hours, the sensitivity was 92%; in the second period, when cultures were held to 48 hours, the sensitivity declined significantly to 86%; when the cultures were read without knowledge of the RAD test result, the sensitivity was 85%. As the Red Book Committee has suggested, physician office laboratories should validate the sensitivity of their RAD test against culture onto blood agar before abandoning the backup throat culture.Effect of using 2 throat swabs vs 1 throat swab on detection of group A streptococcus by a rapid antigen detection test.To assess the effect of using 2 throat swabs vs 1 on rapid detection of group A streptococcus by the STREP A OIA MAX (hereafter, OIA MAX) test.Children aged 5 to 18 years with acute pharyngitis were randomized to 1 of 2 study groups. In group 1, one throat swab was obtained, streaked first on sheep blood agar, and then used for OIA MAX testing. In group 2, two throat swabs were obtained simultaneously. One swab was streaked first on sheep blood agar and then joined with the other swab for OIA MAX testing. In both groups, the pledgets in the collection-transport tube were incubated in Todd-Hewitt broth. A positive group A streptococcus culture either by sheep blood agar or Todd-Hewitt broth was confirmed by a latex agglutination test.Three hundred sixty-three patients were enrolled, 177 in group 1 and 186 in group 2. Cultures were positive for group A streptococcus in 154 (42.4%) of 363 patients. The sensitivity and specificity of OIA MAX testing were 94.7% and 100.0%, respectively, in group 1, and 92.4% and 96.3%, respectively, in group 2. There was no statistical difference between the sensitivity, the specificity, and the predictive values of the OIA MAX test performed with 1 swab compared with those performed with 2 swabs (P>.10). There was no association between OIA MAX test sensitivity and the severity of pharyngitis as measured by the modified Centor criterion (history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal or tonsillar exudates, and presence of cervical lymphadenopathy) scores.The OIA MAX test yielded comparable sensitivity and specificity in both study groups. The use of 2 throat swabs instead of 1 swab did not increase the sensitivity of the OIA MAX test. The performance of the OIA MAX test did not depend on the severity of pharyngitis.Evaluation of a new immunologic test kit for rapid detection of group A streptococci, the Abbott Testpack Strep A plus.We compared the Testpack Strep A plus (TPSAP) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GAS) antigen rapid detection with blood agar culture in 454 pediatric patients with clinical pharyngitis. Of the 454 patients, 118 (25.9%) had positive oropharyngeal cultures for GAS. TPSAP sensitivity was 89.9% (106 of 118) and specificity was 95.8% (322 of 336). We conclude that the TPSAP is specific enough to indicate treatment for a patient with a positive test but that a negative test should be confirmed by culture.[New methods for the group identification of beta-hemolytic Streptococci].Comparison of the Inverness Medical Acceava Strep A test with the Genzyme OSOM and Quidel QuickVue Strep A tests.Previous studies of the accuracy of rapid in-office tests for group A Streptococcus had disparate results, ranging from sensitivity of 70% to more than 90%. The sensitivity and specificity of 3 commercially available Strep A tests were determined in 2 private pediatric office settings. Acceava Strep A, Genzyme OSOM Strep A, and the Quidel QuickVue Strep A tests were the representative rapid tests for detection of Streptococcus pyogenes. Overnight culture on standard 5% sheep blood agar was the reference standard for this study. All 3 CLIA (Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments)-waived tests had sensitivities and specificities that exceeded 95%.[Comparative analysis of clinical and laboratory methods for diagnosing streptococcal sore throat].Diagnosis and correct treatment of group A streptococcal sore throat is important particularly to prevent non-suppurative sequelae. Clinical findings continue to be used to differentiate streptococcal infection from viral sore throat. The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that streptococcal sore throat diagnosis should always be performed by microbiological identification methods. The aim of this study is to evaluate the accuracy of clinical diagnosis in comparison with culture and rapid test.Children aged 2 to 13 years who had received a clinical diagnosis of sore throat and sought treatment at the pediatric emergency unit of São Paulo Santa Casa were evaluated and those with clinical signs or viral infection were excluded. Clinical findings were recorded and swabs were taken for group A Streptococcus cultures and a Streptococcus rapid test.The culture was positive in 96 (24.4%) of the 376 children evaluated. The presence of petechiae, purulent exudate and painful tonsils were more likely to occur in children with positive streptococcus cultures, however they exhibited low diagnostic accuracy. The doctors' subjective evaluation failed to identify 21% of positive cases and antibiotics were prescribed in 47% of negative cases, compared with 3 and 6%, respectively, for the rapid test.A microbiologic method is necessary for the correct prescription of antibiotics in children with streptococcal sore throat.Optical immunoassay for streptococcal pharyngitis: evaluation of accuracy with routine and mucoid strains associated with acute rheumatic fever outbreak in the intermountain area of the United States.The Strep A OIA (BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.) rapid detection system is an intriguing technology that utilizes an immunoassay relying on changes in reflected light to directly detect group A streptococcal antigen from specimens. In this evaluation, 424 routine pediatric throat specimens and 20 simulated oropharyngeal specimens with added mucoid (M type 3, 18) strains were cultured and tested by the Strep A OIA. The respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: Strep A OIA versus enhanced broth culturing, 84.2 and 95.7%; and streptococcus-SXT agar (BBL Microbiology Systems, Cockeysville, Md.) culturing versus enhanced broth culturing, 82.9 and 98.6%. The Strep A OIA is an 8-min, technologist-friendly, accurate technique with an 89.4% agreement with traditional culturing.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis with enzyme immunoassay.From June 1988 to May 1989, 444 throat swab specimens were tested with an enzyme immunoassay kit for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. The results were compared with those of throat culture method. The rapid test was positive in 37 of 42 culture-positive specimens and negative in 379 of 402 culture-negative specimens, thus yielding a total agreement of 93.7%, sensitivity 88.1%, specificity 94.7%, positive predictive value 61.7%, negative predictive value 98.7%. According to this practical application, we suggest that enzyme immunoassay test can be applied in outpatient clinics by busy pediatricians for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Diagnostic accuracy of a rapid antigen test for GABHS performed by nurses in a pediatric ED.Rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Use of antigen detection tests in the diagnosis and management of patients with group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of an optical immunoassay technique with two culture methods for the detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric office.For detecting group A beta-hemolytic streptococci in an office setting, an optical immunoassay method was compared with two culture methods. The sensitivity and specificity of OIA as compared with 5% sheep blood agar cultures were 91.4% and 95.6%, and as compared with a Todd-Hewitt broth method were 90.4% and 94.1%, respectively.[Basic and clinical evaluation of the new rapid diagnostic kit for detecting group A streptococci with the immunochromatographical method].Basic and clinical performance of a new diagnostic kit that detects Group A Streptococci by an immunochromatographical method, QuickVue Dipstick Strep A (Quidel Corporation; San Diego, CA) were evaluated. In basic specificity study, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed positive reaction only to group A Streptococci strains among 34 strains of 10 species of bacteria. In detection limit study, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A had a capacity to detect Group A Streptococci in 1.0 x 10(4); cfu/ml (1.0 x 10(3) cfu/test). This sensitivity was about 6 times higher than that of the existing similar immunochromatographical test, STREP A TESTPACK Plus (TESTPACK, Abbott Japan, Tokyo). In clinical study compared with bacterial culture test using 100 patients' throat swab specimens, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed a sensitivity of 94.4% (34/36), a specificity of 100% (64/64) and an accuracy of 98% (98/100). Furthermore in correlation study with the reference test, TESTPACK, the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A showed 100% agreement (34 positive and 66 negative specimens). As the QuickVue Dipstick Strep A has several advantages as not only simple operation, rapid reaction and good performance but also easy storage (under room temperature), compact size and minimum waste products, we conclude that this new test is useful as Point-of-Care Testing kit and plays a peripheral role in the diagnosis of Group A Streptococci infection and pertinent medical treatment by antibacterial agents.[Performances of rapid antigen detection kits for group A Streptococcus].The group A streptococcus rapid antigen detection kits used to test throat swabs are frequently used by doctors for the screening of pharyngitis caused by bacteria. The Swiss Centre for Quality Control (CSCQ) has organised External Quality Assessment Schemes (EQAS) for these kits since 1997. From 2004 to 2008, negative, positive, and moderate positive antigen containing samples were sent to the laboratories. After analysing the samples, 7749 results obtained with more than 14 different test kits were returned to the CSCQ. The correct results ranged between 84.8 and 99.8% which shows that all the test kits gave good results during the EQAS. However, in case of a negative result with clinical suspicion of a bacterial pharyngitis, the result is to be confirmed by culture.Group A streptococcus-associated upper respiratory tract infections in a day-care center.Little information is available about the epidemiology of group A streptococcal upper respiratory tract infections in child day-care centers. During an initial 3-month period, symptomatic upper respiratory tract infections associated with throat cultures or rapid antigen detection tests positive for group A streptococci developed in 55 of 214 (26%) children and adult staff in one day-care center. When the entire day-care center population (except for those receiving antibiotics at the time) was then surveyed, 52 of 146 (36%) children and two of 24 (8%) adult staff had throat cultures positive for group A streptococci. Of the 54 group A streptococcal isolates found during the survey, the three most frequently encountered serotypes were M2,T2/28 (35%), M3,T3/13 (30%), and M-NT, T25 (20%). Rapid antigen detection was performed at the same time as the throat culture in the first 98 individuals examined during the culture survey but was positive in only 11 (35%) of 31 individuals with positive throat cultures. Sensitivity of the rapid antigen test was related to degree of positivity of the throat culture but not to age. The overall group A streptococcal positivity rate was 49% for 187 children and 33% for 27 adult staff; 18 of 66 (27%) children younger than 31/2 years of age were found to have group A streptococci in their upper respiratory tracts. This is the first report of high prevalence rates of group A streptococci associated with upper respiratory tract infections in a day-care center. The group A Streptococcus may represent a significant upper respiratory tract pathogen in the day-care setting.Empirical validation of guidelines for the management of pharyngitis in children and adults.Recent guidelines for management of pharyngitis vary in their recommendations concerning empirical antibiotic treatment and the need for laboratory confirmation of group A streptococcus (GAS).To assess the impact of guideline recommendations and alternative approaches on identification and treatment of GAS pharyngitis in children and adults.Throat cultures and rapid antigen tests were performed on 787 children and adults aged 3 to 69 years with acute sore throat attending a family medicine clinic in Calgary, Alberta, from September 1999 to August 2002. Recommendations from 2 guidelines (those of the Infectious Diseases Society of America and of the American College of Physicians-American Society of Internal Medicine/American Academy of Family Physicians/US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention) were compared with rapid testing alone, a clinical prediction rule (ie, the modified Centor score), and a criterion standard of treatment for positive throat culture results only.Sensitivity and specificity of each strategy for identifying GAS pharyngitis, total antibiotics recommended, and unnecessary antibiotic prescriptions.In children, sensitivity for streptococcal infection ranged from 85.8% (133/155; 95% confidence interval [CI], 79.3%-90.0%) for rapid testing to 100% for culturing all. In adults, sensitivity ranged from 76.7% (56/73; 95% CI, 65.4%-85.8%) for rapid testing without culture confirmation of negative results to 100% for culturing all. In children, specificity ranged from 90.3% (270/299; 95% CI, 86.4%-93.4%) for use of modified Centor score and throat culture to 100% for culturing all. In adults, specificity ranged from 43.8% (114/260; 95% CI, 37.7%-50.1%) for empirical treatment based on a modified Centor score of 3 or 4 to 100% for culturing all. Total antibiotic prescriptions were lowest with rapid testing (24.7% [194/787]; 95% CI, 21.7%-27.8%) and highest with empirical treatment of high-risk adults (45.7% [360/787]; 95% CI, 42.2%-49.3%), due to a high rate of unnecessary prescriptions in adults (43.8% [146/333]; 95% CI, 38.4%-49.4%).Guideline recommendations for the selective use of throat cultures but antibiotic treatment based only on positive rapid test or throat culture results can reduce unnecessary use of antibiotics for treatment of pharyngitis. However, empirical treatment of adults having a Centor score of 3 or 4 is associated with a high rate of unnecessary antibiotic use. In children, strategies incorporating throat culture or throat culture confirmation of negative rapid antigen test results are highly sensitive and specific. Throat culture of all adults or those selected on the basis of a clinical prediction rule had the highest sensitivity and specificity.Towards a better diagnosis of throat infections (with group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus) in general practice.Sore throat is a common complaint in general practice. However, management strategies are not very clear. A better diagnostic procedure is needed to prevent the overuse of antibiotics.To assess the diagnostic value of a rapid streptococcal antigen detection test in addition to four clinical features in patients with sore throat, using throat culture and antibody titres as reference tests.Four clinical features [fever (history) > or = 38.0 degrees C, lack of cough, tonsillar exudate, and anterior cervical lymphadenopathy] were registered in 558 patients aged 4 to 60 years presenting with sore throat of no more than 14 days' duration. A rapid diagnostic test was performed, as well as a throat culture and antibody titres [fourfold increase in anti-streptolysin-O (ASO) and/or anti-deoxyribonuclease B (anti-DNAase B)] in patients aged 11 years and older.Throat cultures were positive for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS) in 33% of the patients. Rapid tests were positive in 24%. Compared with the throat culture, the sensitivity of the rapid test was 65%, the specificity 96%, the positive predictive value 88%, and the negative predictive value 85%. However, for patients with three or four clinical features, the sensitivity of the rapid test was considerably higher at 75%. Children (< or = 14 years) had a slightly raised specificity and raised positive predictive value and prevalence. With the antibody titres as a reference, the rapid test performed as well as the throat culture with regard to its predictive value.For the management of patients with sore throat in general practice, a rapid test may have an additional value, especially in patients with a high chance of having GABHS infection. However, as the sensitivity of the test studied is low, tests with a higher sensitivity are needed.A comparison of the BioStar Strep A OIA rapid antigen assay, group A Selective Strep Agar (ssA), and Todd-Hewitt broth cultures for the detection of group A Streptococcus in an outpatient family practice setting.In some studies the BioStar Strep A OIA (optical immunoassay) has yielded inconsistent results, although originally it was reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture for the detection of group A Streptococcus (GAS). The Group A Selective Strep Agar with 5% sheep blood (ssA) incubated anaerobically has been reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture in the detection of GAS. We compared the BioStar Strep A OIA GAS rapid antigen detection kit to anaerobic culture on ssA with and without preincubation in Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) for the detection of GAS. From September 1995 through January 1996, throat swabs were collected in duplicate from 75 children (< or = 18 years) and 188 adults (> 18 years) who presented with pharyngitis in the outpatient University of New Mexico Family Practice Clinic. Thirty-one (12%) of the 263 cases were positive for GAS by culture and/or broth. Compared with anaerobic culture on the ssA, with and without preincubation in THB, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the BioStar Strep A OIA were 77, 62, 22, and 95%, respectively. Compared with enrichment in THB followed by subculture on ssA and anaerobic incubation, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of direct culture on ssA and anaerobic incubation were 79, 99, 98, and 96%, respectively. All isolates were serologically grouped. The BioStar Strep A OIA is as sensitive as direct culture on ssA incubated anaerobically, but the low specificity and low positive predictive value when the OIA is used in low prevalence populations could lead to unnecessary antibiotic treatment.Clinical utility of a new rapid test for the detection of group A Streptococcus and discriminate use of antibiotics for bacterial pharyngitis in an outpatient setting.To evaluate the clinical usefulness of the Diaquick Strep. A Test (SAT) as a rapid streptococcal antigen test, and its effect on antibiotic use in children.This was a prospective study of children with acute catarrh, fever, and acutely inflamed throat/tonsils. Paired throat swabs for SAT and culture were collected. None of the children received antibiotics prior to testing.Five hundred and five children were included in the study: 278 were boys (55%) and 409 (81%) were aged under 5 years. The SAT was negative in 434 cases (86%) and positive in 71 (14%); culture was negative in 425 cases (84%) and positive in 80 (16%), including nine cultures that grew bacteria other than group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GAS). Both the SAT and culture were negative in 422 cases (84%) and positive in 68 (13%), but were inconsistent in 15 cases (3%). For GAS infection, the SAT positive predictive value was 95.8% (68/71). The negative predictive value for the whole group as well as for children under five years of age was over 99% (422/425 and 355/358, respectively). SAT sensitivity was almost 96%. Finally, only 74 children (15%) were given antibiotics, while a staggering 431 (85%) were not.The Diaquick Strep. A Test (SAT) is a quick, reliable, and clinically useful test, which could help to dramatically reduce the usage of antibiotics in children with fever, catarrh, and acute pharyngotonsillitis.Effect of a rapid diagnostic method on prescribing patterns and ordering of throat cultures for streptococcal pharyngitis.The sensitivity and specificity of a rapid identification test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus and its impact on prescribing antibiotics and ordering throat cultures were evaluated in a primary care office setting. The calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value were 82 percent, 92 percent, 76 percent, and 94 percent, respectively. Throat cultures were ordered for 98 percent of patients with acute pharyngitis regardless of the method of testing available. After use of the rapid identification test within the office, a reduction was observed in physician prescribing of antibiotics before the throat culture results were known. Physicians were more likely to initiate antibiotics immediately when rapid test results for streptococcal infection were positive and provide patient education regarding symptomatic treatment when the results were negative. The rapid identification test is an acceptable alternative to the standard culture technique in the family practice office. The rapid test was apparently responsible for the observed reduction in antibiotic prescribing and should reduce unnecessary cost and antibiotic exposure in the ambulatory setting.The role of point of care testing for patients with acute pharyngitis.There is no consensus favoring a particular strategy for evaluating patients with pharyngitis.To compare a clinical decision aid and a rapid office-based point of care (POC) test with routine culture for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS).Prospective observational study.Among 179 patients enrolled, 150 were eligible and 148 had POC testing and cultures initially performed.An encounter form included eligibility criteria, clinical information based upon the Centor rule, and treatment provided. Sensitivity and specificity of POC test compared to routine culture for GAS.Thirty-eight patients (25.7%) had a positive GAS culture. The POC test was 92.1% sensitive (95% confidence interval [CI] 80% to 98%) and 100% specific (95% CI 97% to 100%). Although the Centor rule did not adequately discriminate among symptomatic patients with or without GAS (receiver operating curve area 0.63), the 3 patients with a false-negative POC test had a Centor score of less than 2. Among patients with a negative POC test, 26% initially received antibiotics.For patients with a Centor score of > or =2, a POC test was highly sensitive for GAS. Future studies should confirm these results and assess whether implementation of POC testing as part of a local practice guideline can decrease variability in testing and treatment.Rapid office diagnostic tests for streptococcal pharyngitis.Effects of a rapid antigen test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis on physician prescribing and antibiotic costs.Decision analysis and opinion survey suggest that introduction of rapid antigen detection tests should decrease the number of patients with negative test results for group A streptococcal pharyngitis treated by antibiotics. We reviewed all cases in which a test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis was performed during the last 7 months of culture diagnosis and the first 7 months of antigen test diagnosis at an inner city community health center, recording culture or antigen test results, whether antibiotics were prescribed, and patient status (as regular health center patients or patients referred to the center). Positive rates for culture and antigen-test periods were similar (10% and 12%), but 53% of patients with negative culture were treated, where only 32% of patients with negative antigen-test results received prescriptions. Significant reductions in the treatment of patients with negative test results were found in both patient-status subpopulations: health center patients, 43% to 29%; referred patients, 91% to 52%. Among health center patients reductions were consistent for both adult (30% to 21%) and child and adolescent (55% to 45%) age groups. For all patients with negative test results, direct costs of diagnostic reagents and antibiotic prescriptions fell from $3.58 per patient with culture to $3.45 with antigen testing; the $0.13 savings per patient was due to less treatment of referred patients. Thus, rapid antigen testing led to (1) significantly fewer patients with negative test results receiving antibiotic prescriptions; and, (2) savings in antibiotic costs offsetting reagent cost of antigen detection diagnosis.Diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus using clinical scoring criteria, Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test, and culture.Cultures for group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus were performed on 806 patients presenting with a sore throat to five urgent care centers. The accuracies of a clinical scoring system and of a liposomal in-office direct test for Streptococcus were compared with culture results. The Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test had a sensitivity of 67%, a specificity of 85%, a positive predictive value of 61%, and a negative predictive value of 89% compared with culture. The scoring system had a sensitivity of 26%, a specificity of 94%, a positive predictive value of 58%, and a negative predictive value of 79%. Using a combination of the direct test results and the clinical score did not improve the accuracy significantly over the use of either alone. The rates of delayed treatment, unnecessary treatment, and increased costs were compared using different combinations of the clinical scoring system, the in-office streptococcal test, and culture. Neither the Directigen 1-2-3 group A streptococcal test nor the clinical score can replace culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.[Comparative study of 2 rapid antigenic technics for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis].Spectrum bias of a rapid antigen detection test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population.Rapid antigen detection testing (RADT) is often performed for diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis among children. Among adults, the sensitivity of this test varies on the basis of disease severity (spectrum bias). A similar phenomenon may occur when this test is used in a pediatric population, which may affect the need for culture confirmation of all negative RADT results.To assess the performance of a clinical scoring system and to determine whether RADT spectrum bias is present among children who are evaluated for GABHS pharyngitis.Laboratory and clinical records for a consecutive series of pediatric patients who underwent RADT at the Marshfield Clinic between January 2002 and March 2002 were reviewed retrospectively. Patients were stratified according to the number of clinical features present by using modified Centor criteria, ie, history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal exudates, and cervical lymphadenopathy. The sensitivity of the RADT was defined as the number of patients with positive RADT results divided by the number of patients with either positive RADT results or negative RADT results but positive throat culture results.RADT results were positive for 117 of 561 children (21%), and culture results were positive for 35 of 444 children (8%) with negative RADT results. The overall prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 27% (95% confidence interval: 23-31%). The prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 18% among patients with 0 Centor criteria, 16% among those with 1 criterion, 32% among those with 2 criteria, and 50% among those with 3 or 4 criteria. Spectrum bias was present, inasmuch as RADT sensitivity increased with Centor scores, ie, 47% sensitivity among children with 0 Centor criteria, 65% among those with 1 criterion, 82% among those with 2 criteria, and 90% among those with 3 or 4 criteria.The sensitivity of RADT for GABHS pharyngitis is not a fixed value but varies with the severity of disease. However, even among pediatric patients with > or =3 Centor criteria for GABHS pharyngitis, the sensitivity of RADT is still too low to support the use of RADT without culture confirmation of negative results.Rapid antibody capture assay for detection of group-A streptococci using monoclonal antibody and colloidal gold-monospecific polyvalent antibody conjugate.A rapid one step, sensitive and specific antibody capture assay for detection of group-A streptococci from the throat swabs of children is described. Monoclonal antibody either MA-106 or MA-107 specific for group-A streptococci polysaccharide (APS) was used as the capture antibody on nitrocellulose paper and rabbit monospecific polyvalent antibody conjugated with colloidal gold to detect the presence of antigen. The lower detection limit of this assay is 15.6ng APS/ml. The assay is specific for APS and failed to recognize polysaccharides obtained from group-B,-C,-G streptococci as well as Staphylococcus aureus. Antigen extracted from throat swabs of children who were positive for beta-hemolytic plaques (other than group-A streptococci) as seen on blood agar culture gave negative readings, thereby confirming the specificity of the assay for APS.[Rapid diagnosis of the group A streptococcal infection--comparison with culture method, latex agglutination and enzyme immunoassay].Rapid detection of group A streptococci on throat swabs.Value of rapid tests for the detection of streptococcal infections.Quality of care in the retail health care setting using national clinical guidelines for acute pharyngitis.Rates of adherence to an acute pharyngitis practice guideline in the retail clinic setting were measured as an indicator of clinical quality. An analysis of 57,331 patient visits for the evaluation of acute pharyngitis was conducted. In 39,530 patients with a negative rapid strep test result, nurse practitioner and physician assistant staff adhered to guidelines in 99.05% of cases by withholding unnecessary antibiotics. Of 13,471 patients with a positive rapid strep test result, 99.75% received an appropriate antibiotic prescription. The combined guideline adherence rate for groups with positive and negative rapid strep test results was 99.15%. Strep cultures were performed on 99.1% of patients with a negative rapid strep test result, and 96.2% of patients with a positive culture were treated with an antibiotic. Finally, 0.95% of patients with a negative rapid strep test result were provided an antibiotic outside clinical guidelines; however, approximately half of these prescriptions (n = 190) were supported by documentation of clinical concerns for which an antibiotic was a reasonable choice.["When throats are visiting...." A profitable business for a rapid test?].Impact of rapid streptococcal test on antibiotic use in a pediatric emergency department.Acute pharyngitis is commonly seen in children. Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus is the most common bacterial cause of acute pharyngitis and accounts for approximately 15% to 30% of cases in children, but this condition is generally overdiagnosed and overtreated. The availability of rapid streptococcal tests (RSTs) have made this diagnosis simpler and reduced the use of antibiotics. Overuse of antibiotics leads to drug-resistant bacterial strains. Reducing the number of antibiotic prescriptions provided for upper respiratory tract infections has been strongly recommended to limit bacterial resistance.To assess the impact of RSTs on antibiotic prescriptions in children with pharyngitis in the emergency department.A retrospective study from September 2005 to September 2007 of all patients (3-18 years old) presenting to the pediatric emergency department with sore throat as the chief complaint or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis and who had an RST performed. Patients with a negative RST result had a culture performed. The information of the patients with the diagnosis of pharyngitis was also collected in a 2-year control period before the availability of the test. Patients with a negative RST result had a culture performed. In addition, the antibiotic prescriptions for these patients were also recorded.A total of 8280 patients were included in the study. Throat culture results of 1723 patients were reviewed in the pre-RST phase. During the post-RST phase, 6557 children underwent RST. The RST results were positive in 1474 children (22.5%) and negative in 5083 patients (77.5%). Rapid strep testing was associated with a lower antibiotic prescription rate for children with pharyngitis (41.38% for those treated in the pre-RST phase versus 22.45% for those treated in the post-RST phase; P < 0.001).The availability of a RST could substantially reduce the unnecessary prescription of antibiotics. This study supports the screening of all children with pharyngitis by performing an RST to guide decision making for antibiotic administration. This strategy has a significant impact on reducing the antibiotic prescription rate to almost 50%. In addition, only 2 children (0.04%) had negative rapid antigen test results with cultures positive for Streptococcus.Suitability of a throat culture method for evaluation of group A streptococcal antigen detection kits.Previous reports have indicated a wide variation in observed sensitivity of antigen-detection kits for group A streptococci. Before undertaking an evaluation of these new kits, the sensitivity of the throat culture technic routinely used by this laboratory was reexamined. Each throat swab was directly inoculated to sheep blood agar containing trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole (SXT X BA) and drug-free sheep blood agar (SBA) plates. Swabs were then washed in saline and the saline used to inoculate one more of each type of medium. SXT X BA cultures were incubated aerobically (5 to 10% CO2), and SBA cultures were incubated anaerobically, both for two days at 35 degrees C. From 726 patients, 164 (22.6%) of the specimens contained group A streptococci, 99% detected on directly inoculated cultures and 100% on cultures inoculated with the saline wash. Either an aerobically (CO2) incubated SXT X BA or an anaerobically incubated SBA, directly inoculated and held for two days, appears to offer a satisfactory reference culture method for the recovery of group A streptococci.Direct detection of groups A, C and G streptococci in clinical specimens by a trivalent colour test.A simple trivalent colour test, developed for the rapid detection and identification of streptococci belonging to Lancefield groups A, C and G, was evaluated for sensitivity and specificity with cultures and when directly used with wound and throat swabs. In tests performed on cultures, all of 94 group A, 78 group C and 94 group G cultures were correctly identified. In direct tests on wound swabs, 49 of 52 group A, 17 of 19 group C and 48 of 51 group G streptococci were detected and correctly identified; no false positives were observed. With throat swabs from pharyngitis patients 34 of 36 group A, 3 of 6 group C and 5 of 8 group G streptococci gave positive results. Almost 10% of these swabs gave false positive reactions with the group C component of the test system. Samples taken from uninfected individuals indicated that the false positives were probably associated with blood group A. The test system gives rapid and reliable results with streptococcal cultures, but when directly applied to clinical samples the results must be interpreted with caution, particularly if the patient's blood group is not known.The relationship between the clinical features of pharyngitis and the sensitivity of a rapid antigen test: evidence of spectrum bias.We evaluate the test characteristics and test for spectrum bias of a rapid antigen test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis among adults.Medical record and laboratory results of consecutive adult patients receiving a rapid antigen test for GABHS in the emergency department or urgent care clinic of an urban teaching hospital between August 1999 and December 1999 were analyzed. Patients were stratified according to the number of clinical features present using the following modified Centor criteria: history of fever, absence of cough, presence of pharyngeal exudate, and cervical lymphadenopathy. The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test was defined as the number of patients with positive rapid antigen test results divided by the number of patients with either positive rapid antigen test results or negative rapid antigen test results and positive throat culture results.In the study sample of 498 patient visits, the prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis was 28% (95% confidence interval [CI] 24% to 32%). The prevalence of GABHS pharyngitis increased as modified Centor scores increased: 0 or 1=14%, 2=20%, 3=43%, and 4=52%. An increased number of modified Centor criteria (0 or 1, 2, 3, 4) was associated with increased rapid antigen test sensitivity (61%, 76%, 90%, and 97%, respectively) (Mantel-Haenszel trend test; P =.001).The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test for GABHS is not a fixed value but varies with the spectrum of disease. Among adults with 3 or 4 clinical criteria for GABHS pharyngitis, further study may reveal that culture confirmation of negative rapid antigen test results are not necessary.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal infections.[Early diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in paediatric practice: Validity of a rapid antigen detection test].To determine the validity of the rapid antigen test for the diagnoses of acute pharyngitis caused by group A beta-haemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) compared with culture.Observational study of a consecutive sample of paediatric patients.Two primary care centres (PCC) from the metropolitan area of Barcelona.Children aged 1-14 years with sore throat of no more than 5 days duration were chosen at PCC.Oropharyngeal samples were collected from tonsillar bed and posterior pharynx. A rapid diagnostic test was performed, as well as a throat culture.A total of 211 patients were studied. The overall prevalence of pharyngitis due to Streptococcus was 34.1%. Compared with the throat culture, the sensitivity of the rapid test was 90.3% (95% CI: 81.0-96.0), the specificity was 78.4% (95% CI: 70.6-84.9). The percentage of false negatives was 9.7% and the false positives was 21.6%. Spectrum bias was present, inasmuch as the rapid test sensitivity increased with Centor scores.The diagnostic value of a rapid antigen test for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in paediatric patients at PCC is high. However, the percentage of false positives and negatives is too high, and also the sensitivity is too low in patients with fewer symptoms to support the use of rapid antigenic test without culture confirmation and bacterial sensitivity test.Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by rapid antigen detection from the throat swab.Optical immunoassay for rapid detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Should culture be replaced?To evaluate an optical immunoassay rapid antigen test to detect group A beta-hemolytic streptococci directly from throat swab specimens.Criterion standard with "blinded" comparison. Double-swab pharyngeal samples were obtained; one swab was cultured and the other was used for the rapid antigen test.Microbiology laboratory in a primary care center at a university teaching hospital.Two hundred sixty-two outpatients with pharyngitis.The results of the optical immunoassay rapid antigen test were compared with results of standard aerobic culture.Sixty-two (24%) of 262 samples were culture-positive; 48 of these 62 were positive by the optical immunoassay rapid test (sensitivity, 77%). Of the 200 culture-negative samples, seven (4%) were positive by the rapid test (specificity, 96%).The optical immunoassay performed well, but like other rapid tests, is not sensitive enough to replace standard culture for detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.Proper evaluation of rapid antigen detection methods for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis.Emergency department testing for Streptococcus in children with sore throats.Polymerase chain reaction for Streptococcus pyogenes used to evaluate an optical immunoassay for the detection of group A streptococci in children with pharyngitis.In evaluations of sensitive rapid tests for group A streptococci such as the optical immunoassay (OIA), some samples are positive by the antigen test but negative by culture. A method is needed for resolving these discrepant results.To develop a PCR-based assay to detect group A streptococci and to use it to establish a reference standard for evaluating an OIA for group A streptococcal antigen.A PCR assay that detects a segment of the MF gene of Streptococcus pyogenes was developed for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs. Paired swabs were obtained from 200 children with symptomatic pharyngitis and used to perform OIA, agar culture, broth-enhanced culture and PCR. As a reference standard any patient with group A streptococci detected by either culture or PCR was considered to be truly positive.In comparison to agar and broth-enhanced culture procedures, OIA had sensitivities of 82 and 80% and specificities of 87 and 89%, respectively. Eight (44%) of 18 samples that were positive by OIA but negative by culture were positive for group A streptococci by PCR. Compared with the reference standard, sensitivities were OIA 76%, agar culture 79%, broth-enhanced culture 86% and PCR 96%. The specificity of OIA was 92%.PCR can be used to establish a reference standard for evaluating rapid tests for group A streptococci. With this reference standard OIA was nearly as sensitive as but less specific than agar culture for detection of group A streptococci. Maximum detection requires use of both tests.Rapid strep tests in the emergency department: an evidence-based approach.Accuracy of rapid strep testing in patients who have had recent streptococcal pharyngitis.Some clinicians have questioned the accuracy of rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis by commercial immunochemical antigen test kits in the setting of recent streptococcal pharyngitis, believing that the false-positive rate was increased because of presumed antigen persistence.We studied 443 patients--211 cases--who had clinical pharyngitis diagnosed as group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus infection in the past 28 days and compared them with 232 control patients who had symptoms of pharyngitis but no recent diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis. Our aim was narrowly focused to compare the rapid strep test with the culture method we used in our clinical practice.We found that the rapid strep test in this setting showed no difference in specificity (0.96 vs 0.98); hence, the assertion that rapid antigen testing had higher false-positive rates in those with recent infection was not confirmed. We also found that in patients who had recent streptococcal pharyngitis, the rapid strep test appears to be more reliable (0.91 vs 0.70, P < .001) than in those patients who had not had recent streptococcal pharyngitis.The findings of this study indicate that the rapid strep test is both sensitive and specific in the setting of recent group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis, and its use might allow earlier treatment in this subgroup of patients.Rapid test, throat culture and clinical assessment in the diagnosis of tonsillitis.Our aim was to identify a group of patients with clinical signs of tonsillitis to whom antibiotics could be prescribed without further diagnostic actions, and to compare the outcome of clinical assessment with the result of an antigen detection test using culture as the gold standard.During two winter months, patients aged > or =4 years attending for sore throat at three primary health care centres in Malmö, Sweden, were examined. Odds ratios, sensitivities, specificities and predictive values were calculated for clinical assessment and for an antigen detection test.Among the 169 participating patients, growth of group A beta-haemolytic streptococci (GAS) was found in 53 cultures, and 23 patients (14%) were clinically assessed as 'absolutely positive', representing positive clinical assessment. Nineteen had positive cultures for GAS. The sensitivity, specificity and predictive positive and negative value for the antigen detection test were 82, 96, 90 and 93%, respectively, and for positive clinical assessment 36, 97, 83 and 77%.It is possible to identify a small group of patients with convincing signs of tonsillitis in which the specificity as well as the predictive positive value of the rapid test and the clinical assessment are close to equal. Antibiotics may be prescribed to these patients without further diagnostic actions.Detection of Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus employing three different detection methods: culture, rapid antigen detecting test, and molecular assay.In order to study the prevalence of Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) pharyngotonsillitis in our pediatric population and to compare different sampling methods of GABHS detection, oropharyngeal swabs from 50 children with acute pharyngotonsillitis, between 1 and 12 years old, were used simultaneously for culture, molecular assay and rapid GABHS antigen detection tests. All children were clinically examined at the Division of Pediatric Otorhinolaryngology of the Federal University of São Paulo. Diagnostic criteria were based on signs and symptoms, including sore throat, fever and oropharyngeal purulent secretion. Children that had been treated with antibiotics were excluded. Overall, combining the three methods, the prevalence of GABHS was 34%. GABHS was diagnosed in 30% of the bacterial cultures, in 25% of the samples tested with the molecular nucleic acid hybridization method and in 26% of the cases tested with the rapid antigen detection test. There was no significant difference between these three methods.[A direct, rapid method for the identification of Streptococcus pyogenes from throat smears].Streptococcal throat infection: calculation of test standards and a comparison between an antigen detection test and culture.The standard minimum sensitivity (94%) and minimum specificity (89%) of a group A streptococcus (GAS) test were calculated, assuming that no more than 10% false positive and no more than 2% false negative test results should be allowed. The clinical judgement of the need for immediate antibiotic treatment in tonsillitis/pharyngitis was an unreliable indicator of a GAS aetiology, 20-29% of the results being false positive and 2-10% false negative. The rapid antigen detection test Tandem Icon Strep A was not sensitive enough to be used as a single test, though it was specific enough. The sensitivity of culture almost reached the standard demand. Two combinations of rapid test and culture (sequence testing) were superior to the rapid test, but were not significantly better than culture.Comparison of two rapid streptococcal antigen detection assays with culture for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.In this study, 801 pharyngeal specimens were cultured for group A streptococci and tested with the Biostar Strep A Optical Immunoassay (Strep A OIA). The respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 97.1 and 100%; Strep A OIA, 91.5 and 94.8%. Of the 801 specimens, 597 were also tested with the Abbott TestPack Strep A Assay (TP-ST). For those specimens tested by all three methods, the respective sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 98.1 and 100%; Strep A OIA, 92.3 and 95.4%; and TP-ST, 79.4 and 100%. The Strep A OIA is significantly more sensitive than TP-ST and compares favorably with culture.Comparison of direct specimen testing utilizing TestPack strep A with testing of specimens following a two-hour broth enrichment.In a previous study, we demonstrated that a 2-h enrichment of throat swabs in broth followed by a direct fluorescent antibody test was significantly more sensitive than the Abbott TestPack Strep A for the detection of group-A streptococci. In this study, in an effort to simplify the technique, we utilized broth enrichment with an enzyme immunoassay detection method. A total of 1017 pharyngeal specimens were tested with TestPack Strep A (DTP), culture on a selective streptococcal agar, and a 2-h broth enrichment in Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) followed by TestPack Strep A (ETP). Subculture of the THB was used to arbitrate discordant test results. The sensitivities and specificities respectively were as follows: DTP (69% and 99%), ETP (90% and 98%), and SSA (97% and 100%). This enrichment method offers significantly greater sensitivity than direct testing for antigen yet still allows the potential for finalized same-day reporting of results.Streptococcus A in paediatric accident and emergency: are rapid streptococcal tests and clinical examination of any help?Rapid streptococcal tests (RSTs) for streptococcal pharyngitis have made diagnosis at once simpler and more complicated. The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that all RSTs be confirmed by a follow up throat culture unless local validation has proved the RST to be equally sensitive.To evaluate (a) RST as a single diagnostic tool, compared with RST with or without throat culture; (b) clinical diagnosis and the relative contribution of different symptoms.The study included 213 patients with clinical signs of pharyngitis. Throat swabs were analysed using Quickvue+ Strep A Test; negative RSTs were backed up by throat culture. Thirteen clinical features commonly associated with strep throat were analysed using backward stepwise logistic regression.Positive results (RST or throat culture) were obtained in 33 patients; RST correctly identified 21. Eleven samples were false negative on RST. At a strep throat prevalence of 15.9%, sensitivity of RST was 65.6% (95% CI 46.8% to 81.4%) and specificity 99.4% (96.7% to 99.9%). Sensitivity of clinical diagnosis alone was 57% (34% to 78%) and specificity 71% (61% to 80%). Clinically, only history of sore throat, rash, and pyrexia contributed to the diagnosis of strep throat (p<0.05).The high specificity of RST facilitates early diagnosis of strep throat. However, the low sensitivity of RST does not support its use as a single diagnostic tool. The sensitivity in the present study is markedly different from that reported by the manufacturer. Clinical examination is of limited value in the diagnosis of strep throat. It is important to audit the performance of new diagnostic tests, previously validated in different settings.[Incidence of streptococcal pharyngitis].To determine the incidence of streptococcal pharyngitis in patients younger than 2 years of age, and to evaluate the role of group C streptococci as a pathogenic agent in acute pharyngitis through throat culture in symptomatic patients.We performed a retrospective descriptive study of patients with clinical symptoms of acute pharyngitis and fast detection of streptococcal antigen and/or exudate culture who attended the emergency department between February 2004 and February 2005.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS) was isolated by pharyngeal culture in 85 patients aged less than 2 years (12.6%). In these patients the fast test displayed lower sensitivity and positive predictive value (PPV) (sensitivity: 78%; PPV: 69%, p < 0.01). Patients aged less than 2 years had a greater frequency fever, exanthema and catarrhal symptoms than older children (p < 0.01). In the younger age group, erythromycin resistance rates increased to 24.7% (p = 0.08). Group C streptococcus was isolated in 5.2% (43 patients). The most frequent reason for consultation was fever (74.4%) and the most common findings on examination were abnormal pharynx in 90.7%, odynophagia and adenopathies in 55.8%. Two incidence peaks (in May and September) were observed, with sporadic cases throughout the year.In our sample, the percentage of GAS in patients aged less than 2 years was higher than that reported in other series. In this age group, the sensitivity of the fast test is lower than in other age groups and there is a higher rate of erythromycin resistance. The percentage of tonsillitis due to serotype C was also slightly higher than expected. Two peaks of incidence were observed, similar to those occurring with SGA, with sporadic cases throughout the year.[Diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis in the pediatric department with the help of antigen detection test].The aim was to examine the validity in the paediatric hospital department of an antigen detection test (ADT) for the diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis.A prospective multicenter study including three Danish paediatric hospital departments was performed from May 1, 1998 to April 30, 1999. In 353 children aged 0-14 years the result of the ADT, Clearview Strep A, was compared with the result obtained with cultivation in an aerobic culture and the clinical parameters: hyperaemia, swelling, coating, adenitis and a temperature > or = 38.5 degrees C. In 126 patients the results of the ADT were also compared with white blood cell count (WBC), neutrofil count (NC) and C-reactive protein (CRP).The prevalence of Group A Streptococci (GAS) from culture was 15%. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of ADT were 67%, 95%, 72% and 94%, respectively. The positive predictive value of the ADT was significantly lower in patients aged 0-4 years than in patients aged > or = 5 years (p = 0.02). The prevalence of positive ADT was significantly higher in patients with heavy growth of GAS than in patients with moderate or sparse growth (p = 0.01). The prevalence of adenitis (p = 0.003) and coating (p = 0.003) was significantly raised in ADT-positive patients. In patients with growth of Group A Streptococci in cultivation in an aerobic culture the prevalence of adenitis (p = 0.006) and elevated CRP (p = 0.03) was significantly raised.The sensitivity of 67% for the ADT is not satisfactory. However, in our opinion, this is not a sufficient argument against using ADT. It was a problem that the result of the ADT was sometimes difficult to read. Adjustment of the test procedure and the use of easy readable and high-sensitive optical immunoassay tests would probably improve the results significantly. Until the results of such studies exist, we suggest that the method of cultivation in an aerobic culture is used in the case of negative ADT, at least in patients with pronounced symptoms and/or clinical signs of streptococcal tonsilitis (adenitis and coating).[Childhood pharyngitis in Sfax (Tunisia): epidemiology and utility of a rapid streptococcal test].The authors studied the epidemiology of pharyngitis in children and evaluated the contribution of a rapid streptococcal test.This prospective study was conducted from June 2007 to May 2008 in a primary health care institution (Policlinique de la Caisse Nationale de Sécurité Sociale) in Tunisia. Clinical findings were recorded; throat swabs were performed, and a rapid streptococcal test was made.Five hundred and four children were included in this study. The mean age was 5 years and 8 months. Culture was positive for group A streptococcus in 166 cases (32.9 %). Group A streptococcus was more frequently isolated in children aged 5 to 8 years. There was no difference in clinical features between groups of streptococcal and non-streptococcal pharyngitis. The sensitivity and specificity of the rapid test were respectively 93.2 and 95.3 %.Pharyngitis was of bacterial origin in one third of cases; among these, group A streptococcus was the most frequent bacterium. The rapid test is a quick and reliable tool for the diagnosis of pharyngitis and hence an appropriate treatment.The diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by optical immunoassay.Rapid diagnostic assay for strep throat.Detection of group A streptococcal antigen from throat swabs with five diagnostic kits in general practice.During a 5-month period, 248 general practitioners from 164 general practice offices obtained duplicate throat swabs from 2469 patients with acute pharyngotonsillitis. At the general practice office, one of the swabs was assayed for the presence of group A streptococcal antigen, using one of five commercially available diagnostic kits. (The participants did not receive instruction in the use of the kits). The other swab was cultured in our laboratory for the presence of group A streptococci. The diagnostic parameters for the five kits were as follows: Abbott TestPack Strep A--sensitivity, 79% (110/139) and specificity, 98% (490/501); Direct Strep A EIA (Roche)--sensitivity, 79% (104/132) and specificity, 63% (178/281); Respirastick--sensitivity, 55% (46/84) and specificity, 96% (298/309); Reveal Colour Strep A--sensitivity, 82% (114/139) and specificity, 83% (223/268); Tandem ICON Strep A--sensitivity, 78% (111/143) and specificity, 98% (362/368). The antigen detection test results were heavily influenced by the clinical prediction of a streptococcal or viral etiology. It is concluded that in the absence of a standard throat culture, the Abbott TestPack Strep A kit and the Tandem ICON Strep A kit both offer a more safe diagnostic alternative than clinical assessment. Depending on the current prevalence of group A streptococci, the additional use of a throat swab culture should be considered in case of negative antigen detection test results.Diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a private clinic: comparative evaluation of an optical immunoassay method and culture.We compared the sensitivity and specificity of the Strep A Optical ImmunoAssay (OIA) method with our routine trypticase soy agar with 5% sheep blood (TSA) culture technique and with a broth-enhanced culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal infection. Compared with broth-enhanced culture, the Strep A OIA had a sensitivity and specificity of 94.8% and 98.8%, respectively; TSA culture had a sensitivity and specificity of 92.5% and 99.4%, respectively. The Strep A OIA, which takes 10 minutes to perform, offered sensitivity and specificity equivalent to that of TSA culture in the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use of the rapid antigen detection test in group A streptococci pharyngitis diagnosis in Tunis, Tunisia].The aims of this study were to determine the contribution of commercial rapid antigen detection test (RADT) in the rapid diagnosis of pharyngitis caused by group A streptococci. A total of 292 children with pharyngitis was included. A duplicate throat swabs was taken simultaneously from each patient. One of them was used for RADT achievement and the other for culture. When cultures were positive, a semi-quantitative evaluation was done. Throat culture and RADT were positive in 59 and 72 cases respectively. Fifty four specimens were positive simultaneously with RADT and culture and 215 specimens were negative using both methods. Eighteen specimens were positive only with RADT, 5 of them were treated by amoxicillin. Regarding to the group of patients with a negative RADT and a positive culture (5 cases), all of them had a culture evaluation at "+" or "++". Specificity and sensibility of the RADT were 92.2% and 91.5% respectively. RADT use by physicians can reduce antibiotic prescription among paediatric population. Because of the high specificity of RADT, therapeutic decisions can be made on the basis of a positive test.[Evaluation of a rapid test for direct detection of group A streptococcal antigen in throat swabs. Study of 4 commercial test systems].Four commercially prepared test reagent kits for the rapid screening of throat swabs for group A streptococci were examined in comparison to bacteriological cultures of 963 double throat swabs. The sensitivities of the test systems were 86.7% (Abbott Test Pack Strep A), 81.8% (Hybritech Tandem Icon Strep A), 79.6% (Pharmacia Phadirect Strep A), and 72.6% (Wellcome Reveal Colour Strep A) respectively. The specificity of the four tests was above 90%. Marked variations between different test reagent batches could be observed. The two tests based on the enzyme immunoassay principle proved to be superior to the agglutination tests investigated with respect to sensitivity and reading accuracy. Our results are evaluated in the light of the published literature on these tests.[Reliability of the rapid Streptococcus A test].The results of three second-generation immune assays for direct detection of group A streptococcus were compared in 65 patients with acute pharyngitis. The assays included Strep A Plus, (Abbott), Concise Strep A (Hybritech) and Cards Plus (Pacific Biotech). A standard culture was used as reference. Additionally a nucleic acid hybridization assay (Gen-Probe) was applied after enhanced broth culturing. The sensitivities and specificities of the three immunoassays were similar and showed that Strep A Plus had an 84.2% sensitivity and 88.9% specificity, Concise Strep A an 82.4% sensitivity and 92.3% specificity, and Cards Plus an 84.2% specificity and 90.7% sensitivity. The Concise Strep A had significantly more doubtful results in comparison with the two other rapid immune assays (9.7% versus 2.3%, P = 0.034. The standard culture and the DNA probe test gave the same results in 94% of cases. Clinical parameters were found to be unreliable for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. However, findings show that when the rapid immune assay is positive, it is reasonable to start antibiotic treatment without performing a bacterial culture. In cases with a negative assay, management is best tailored to clinical symptoms and laboratory examinations.Use of rapid group A strep throat screening tests.Comparison of TestPack Strep A test kit with culture technique for detection of group A streptococci.Results obtained with Abbott Laboratories TestPack Strep A (TPSA), a 7-min enzyme immunoassay method, were compared with culture results to measure the ability of this assay to detect group A streptococci directly from 365 throat swabs. Our study demonstrated a sensitivity of 90.0% and a specificity of 97.4% for TPSA compared with cultures incubated for 48 h. The positive and negative predictive values of this assay versus the culture method were 92.8 and 96.3%, respectively. If specimens that provided fewer than 10 colonies per plate of group A streptococci are eliminated from the data, the sensitivity is increased to 95.6%. Additionally, 10 group A and 40 non-group A streptococcal isolates were tested directly with TPSA for the ability to distinguish group A from non-group A streptococci. All 50 isolates were correctly identified (100% accuracy). TPSA is a rapid, accurate, and easy-to-interpret method for detection and confirmation of group A streptococcal antigen directly from throat swabs and pure culture isolates.Evaluation of a two-minute strep A direct swab test (SADST) on patients with pharyngitis at a primary care clinic.A two-minute strep A direct swab test (SADST) was used to detect the presence of Lancefield group A streptococci (GAS) from the throats of 207 patients with pharyngitis at a primary-care clinic. The results were compared with a standard culture method. Fifty-one specimens were positive and 156 specimens were negative for GAS by culture. The SADST had a sensitivity of 96% (49 of 51) and specificity of 98.7% (154 of 156). The predictive values of a positive and negative SADST, for GAS, were 96% and 98.7% respectively. The SADST showed negative reactions with five specimens containing beta-haemolytic streptococci other than GAS and 34 known stock cultures other than GAS. Our results indicate that SADST is a rapid, simple, convenient and reliable test to use for diagnosis of GAS pharyngitis at primary care clinics, physicians' offices and clinical laboratories.Diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Importance of inoculum size and sampling effect in rapid antigen detection for diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis.Current recommendations suggest that negative rapid Streptococcus pyogenes antigen tests be backed up with a culture, reflecting evidence that culture may have a higher sensitivity and also that testing of a second swab may yield a different (i.e., a positive) result because of variation in sample size or distribution. If the latter is common, the sensitivities of current antigen detection tests might be improved by simply increasing the amount of sample tested. The present study assessed the effect of antigen testing of two swabs extracted together compared to independent testing of each swab extracted separately for children with clinical pharyngitis. S. pyogenes grew from one or both swabs for 198 (37%) of 537 children. The combined culture was significantly (P < 0.05) more sensitive than culture of either swab alone. Compared to combined culture, antigen testing of two swabs extracted and tested together was significantly more sensitive than two single swab extractions (94.1 versus 80%; P = 0.03); however, the specificity was decreased (81.5 versus 89.8 to 92.7%; P < 0.05). This study suggests that sample size and/or uneven sample distribution may have influenced the apparent sensitivities of prior studies that compared antigen tests to a single plate culture. A strategy, such as the one used in the present study, that increases the sample size available for antigen testing (i.e., extraction of samples from both swabs) may improve detection rates to a level that will better approximate true disease status and obviate the need for backup cultures if specificity can be improved.Evaluation of the Strep A OIA assay versus culture methods: ability to detect different quantities of group A Streptococcus.The Strep A OIA assay by Biostar (Boulder, Co., USA) is a unique optical immunoassay system for the rapid detection of Group A streptococcal carbohydrate. As part of a community-based pediatric cohort study of Group A Streptococcus (GAS) persistence following antibiotic therapy of pharyngitis, the performance of the Strep A OIA assay was compared with the amount of growth from standard throat swab culture methods. A total of 363 throat swabs taken over the course of the study was evaluated from 248 children between 2 and 18 years of age. Two culture methods were performed: an agar plate with the throat swab using Columbia agar base with 5% sheep blood incubated under an anaerobic environment for 48 h and Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) enhancement. The Strep A OIA was then performed. A total of 144 of 363 (39.7%) samples was positive for GAS by one or more of the laboratory tests across study visits: agar culture detected 132 of 144 (91.7%), THB culture detected 128 of 144 (88.9%), and the Strep A OIA assay detected 129 of 144 (89.6%). Complete agreement among all three laboratory tests was found for 333 of 363 (91.7%) of the samples. Agar culture results were comparable to THB cultures with a sensitivity of 96.9%, specificity of 96.6%, a positive predictive value of 93.9%, and a negative predictive value of 98.3%. Although the performance of the Strep A OIA assay had similar specificity (96.5%) and positive predictive value (93.8%) compared with the combined results of the two culture methods, the sensitivity (89.0%) and negative predictive value (93.6%) were lower. A significant difference (p < 0.001) was found in the ability of the Strep A OIA assay to detect agar culture-positive swabs that had a light growth (1+ or 2+) (63.0%) versus a moderate (3+) or heavy (4+) growth (98.1%) of GAS. Although the Strep A OIA assay allows GAS throat swab results to be reported an average of 24 h sooner than either of the cultures, the rapid assay was not as sensitive in detecting light growth GAS-positive cultures.[Does a pharyngeal culture have to be requested when using rapid antigen techniques?].Role of rapid antigen detection test for the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus in patients with pharyngotonsillitis.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GAS) is an important pharyngotonsillitis etiologic agent. Correct etiologic diagnosis and early treatment prevent suppurative and non-suppurative complications of streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis; however, clinical diagnosis is not reliable. Within this context, rapid detection methods of GAS antigen are useful to diagnose this agent.The objective of the present study was to determine sensitivity and specificity of rapid GAS antigen detection tests used in Brazil.Clinical prospective.Eighty-one patients with clinical diagnosis of acute pharyngotonsillitis seen at the otorhinolaryngology emergency department of the University Hospital, FMUSP, between May 2001 and April 2002 were submitted to two simultaneous collections of oropharyngeal material using swabs. The rapid GAS antigen detection test was compared to culture on blood agar, the gold standard for the diagnosis of this etiologic agent.Among the 81 patients studied, the rapid test was positive in 56% and negative in 44%. GAS growth in culture was observed in 40.7% of the patients. Sensitivity and specificity of the rapid test were, respectively, 93.9% and 68.7%, and the negative and positive predictive values were 94.2 and 67.4%, respectively.We concluded that high sensitivity of the test allows its use in the identification of patients with GAS. Rapid streptococcal antigen detection tests have been shown to be an important adjuvant tool in the etiologic diagnosis of pharyngotonsillitis.Novel, rapid optical immunoassay technique for detection of group A streptococci from pharyngeal specimens: comparison with standard culture methods.A novel immunoassay system based on the changes in the reflection of light, termed an optical immunoassay (OIA), was utilized to directly detect group A streptococcal (GAS) carbohydrate antigen from clinical specimens. In two studies, a total of 1,275 throat swabs were tested for the presence of this antigen with the Strep A OIA rapid detection system and the results were compared with those of standard culture methods. In both studies, the Strep A OIA yielded more positive results than plating of the throat swab onto a selective agar, Trypticase soy agar containing sheep blood, or an enriched broth. In one study, the sensitivity and specificity of Strep A OIA compared with those of the broth-enriched culture were 97.4 and 95.6%, respectively. In a second study a sensitivity of 98.9% and a specificity of 98.6% were achieved. It was also shown that the carbohydrate antigen could be detected in the absence of viable GAS organisms. The Strep A OIA is an easily interpretable method and was shown to be more sensitive than routine culture methods for detecting GAS infections directly from throat swabs.Identification of streptococcal pharyngitis in the office laboratory: reassessment of new technology.[Validation of a rapid antigenic test in the diagnosis of pharyngitis caused by group a beta-haemolytic Streptococcus].To determine the validity of the rapid antigen test (RAT) OSOM StrepA Genzyme for the diagnosis of acute pharyngitis caused by group A beta-haemolytic strep (GABHS).Diagnostic techniques survey.Urban primary care centre, Spain.All patients over 14 years old seen in 6 surgeries with sore throat and 2 or more Centor criteria: pharyngotonsillar exudate, tender laterocervical nodes, absence of coughing, and/or history or presence of fever.Pharyngeal swabs were taken from all the patients, one for RAT and another to send for culture in the microbiology department.A total of 182 patients were evaluable, with a mean age of 30.6 (12.1) years of which 116 were women (63.7%); 63 patients had 2 Centor criteria; 83 had 3 and 36, the 4 criteria. The culture was positive in 102 patients (56%), with GABHS showing infection in forty (22%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 21.2-22.8). Group C Streptococcus was isolated in 26 patients (14.3%). GABHS was higher among patients with four Centor criteria (38.9% vs 25.3% observed among those with 3 criteria and 7.9% with 2 criteria; P<.001). Sensitivity of RAT was 95%, with a specificity of 93%, a positive predictive value of 79.2% and a negative predictive value of 98.5%.These results show the usefulness of RAT for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis. Its use should be spread to all primary care practices.[Rational use of antibiotics in pediatrics: impact of a rapid test for detection of beta-haemolytic group A streptococci in acute pharyngotonsillitis].To assess the reliability and validity of a rapid test for the identification of Streptococcus pyogenes in the pharyngeal exudate of children presenting with pharyngotonsillitis. To evaluate the impact of its use in outpatient clinics on antibiotic use, on the incidence of second medical visits and complications, and on the degree of parental satisfaction.After a clinical diagnosis of acute pharyngitis was established and written informed consent obtained from the parents, dual throat swabs were collected from 430 children who attended the emergency department of our hospital or the pediatric offices of three health centers in our area. The first specimen was examined by the rapid test, QuickVue Flex Strep A, and the second one was sent to the laboratory for conventional culture. As a rule, antibiotics were indicated only when the rapid test was positive. Special emphasis was placed on explaining to parents that treatment was not necessary when the test was negative. Telephone follow-up was provided to the family during the next four weeks, after which a satisfaction survey was carried out.The sensitivity of the investigated rapid test was 91.2% (negative predictive value: 96.5%) and specificity was 96.2% (positive predictive value: 90.4%). Antibiotics were given to 41.9% of the patients, approximately half the expected rate in the absence of the rapid test. There was no significant difference in the number of second visits or hospitalizations between the groups of treated and non-treated subjects. Clinical evolution was good in all cases. The degree of parental satisfaction was very high, independent of the treatment given to the patients.The rapid test for the detection of group A streptococci is a reliable tool for the selection of patients able to benefit from antibiotic treatment. It is easy to handle and apply and its use allows a significant reduction in the administration of antibiotics in pharyngotonsillitis. Most users accept and are satisfied with this novel diagnostic and therapeutic procedure.[Rapid antigen tests for the diagnosis of group A streptococci in practice].Evaluating the American Academy of Pediatrics diagnostic standard for Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis: backup culture versus repeat rapid antigen testing.The American Academy of Pediatrics recommends that all negative rapid diagnostic tests for Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngitis be backed up by culture, which creates a dilemma for clinicians who must make treatment decisions without complete diagnostic information at the time of visit. The use of a follow-up serial rapid antigen test instead of a follow-up culture would provide a more timely result.Two swabs were collected from children who were suspected of having S pyogenes pharyngitis. Each swab was used for a culture and an OSOM Ultra Strep A Test rapid antigen test. The gold standard of comparison was defined as the identification of S pyogenes on either of the 2 culture plates. Three diagnostic strategies were evaluated: a single rapid antigen test, a rapid antigen test with follow-up rapid antigen test (rapid-rapid), and a rapid antigen test with follow-up culture (rapid-culture).A total of 210 (23.7%) of 887 throat cultures with matched data were identified with S pyogenes. A single rapid antigen test had a sensitivity of 87.6% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 83.2%-92.1%), the sensitivity of the rapid-rapid follow-up was 91.4% (95% CI: 87.6%-95.2%), and the sensitivity of the rapid-culture follow-up was 95.7% (95% CI: 93.0%-98.5%), which was significantly higher than the others. As shown in Fig 1, when these test strategies were evaluated on a subgroup with clinical symptoms commonly associated with S pyogenes pharyngitis, the sensitivities all increased and were no longer significantly different. None of the strategies reliably exceeded a 95% sensitivity threshold.The American Academy of Pediatrics strategy for S pyogenes detection in children with pharyngitis, requiring a backup culture for those with negative antigen tests, was not exceeded by any other test strategy; however, a rapid-rapid diagnostic strategy may approximate it with the use of judicious clinical selection of patients.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Comparison of two antigen detection techniques for group A streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric emergency department.Evaluation of the throat culture as a follow-up for an initially negative enzyme immunosorbent assay rapid streptococcal antigen detection test.In a study of the efficacy of following up an initially negative enzyme immunosorbent assay (EIA) rapid streptococcal antigen detection test with a throat culture, 2 double swabs (4 total) were obtained from 264 pediatric patients with sore throats. Although a throat culture was more specific (97%) than the EIA (89%), the sensitivity (87%) and negative predictive value (97%) of a single EIA was the same as that of a single throat culture. A follow-up throat culture was more accurate than a follow-up EIA. We conclude that the office EIA tested results in more false positives but misses no more true positives than a single throat culture processed by a well-controlled microbiology laboratory. If a follow-up technique is used for an initially negative EIA rapid streptococcal antigen detection test, the throat culture is the superior test and would be equally applicable following an initially negative throat culture or EIA.[Rapid diagnostic tests of Streptococcus group A in pharyngitis. Value and limitations].[Evaluation of clinical data and a technique of rapid detection (TestPack Strep A) in the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngo-tonsillitis].We have evaluated the validity of the clinical data, the clinical impression (CI) of the physician and a rapid antigenic technique (RAT) for the diagnosis of acute streptococcal pharyngitis and tonsillitis (SPT). We evaluated 126 patients aged 7-60 years (October 1988-March 1989). The incidence of SPT was 19%. SPTs had a significantly higher frequency of lack of cough and sudden onset as isolated findings, and of the associations fever greater than 38 degrees C + exudate + lack of cough, and sudden onset + fever greater than 38 degrees C + exudate + lack of cough. CI had a sensibility (S) of 56%, a specificity (Sp) of 72%, a positive predictive value (PPV) of 32%, a negative predictive value (NPV) of 88% and an overall valve (OV) of 69%. The RAT had a S of 79.2%, a Sp 93%, a PPV of 73%, a NPV of 95%, and an OV of 90.5%. Only some clinical data are useful to diagnose SPT. The CI of the physician has a low predictive value, whereas TestPack Strep A is useful and has a similar value as pharyngeal culture.TestPack Strep A kit for the rapid detection of group A streptococci on 11,088 throat swabs in a clinical pathology laboratory.Results obtained with Abbott Laboratories' TestPack Strep A, a rapid test kit to detect group A streptococcal antigen on throat swabs, were compared with the culture results. All tests were performed by American Society of Clinical Pathology-registered technologists in a large clinical laboratory. A total of 11,088 throat swabs were tested; 9,161 belonged to pediatric patients and 1,927 to adults. For TestPack Strep A, the study demonstrated a sensitivity value of 0.91 and a specificity value of 0.96; positive predictive value and negative predictive values were 0.82 and 0.98, respectively. These data indicate that even when performed by experienced technologists, in a laboratory setting, approximately 1 of 10 patients with group A streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis will be missed if physicians rely solely on this direct antigen test. A backup culture on all patients who are negative by a rapid antigen detection test is recommended.Rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection kit: effect on antimicrobial therapy for acute pharyngitis.Newly introduced rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcal pharyngitis should facilitate appropriate antimicrobial use in patients with group A streptococcal pharyngitis. Because of high rates of acute pharyngitis in Tuba City, AZ, at the Navajo Indian reservation, the use of rapid diagnostic test was prospectively evaluated. The sensitivity and specificity of the test was measured and changes in physician prescribing patterns attributable to use of the test were correlated. Of 320 patients with pharyngitis enrolled during the present 3-week study, 86 met the study's definition of a patient with streptococcal pharyngitis and 163 met the study's definition of a patient with nonstreptococcal pharyngitis. The rapid test was 62.8% sensitive and 96.9% specific in identifying patients from whom group A streptococci were isolated. Although treatment of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis at the time of the first visit increased from 36.5% in a retrospective sample to 72.5% during the study, treatment of patients in whom cultures were negative remained the same. Further analyses showed that physicians tended to treat patients with signs characteristic of streptococcal pharyngitis and, as the study progressed, to rely less on negative rapid test results as a reason to withhold antimicrobial agents. It was concluded that rapid tests with good specificity but limited sensitivity may improve treatment of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis by allowing earlier specific therapy. A more sensitive test with a higher negative predictive value would be necessary to prevent treatment of persons with nonstreptococcal pharyngitis.The rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal infection.Comparison of BioStar Strep A OIA optical immune assay, Abbott TestPack Plus Strep A, and culture with selective media for diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis.We directly compared three techniques for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis in 500 symptomatic children seen in the Emergency Department or Child Care Clinic of The Children's Hospital of Denver. Throats were vigorously swabbed with two rayon swabs, which were transported immediately to the Microbiology Laboratory. Each swab was cultured aerobically on Strep A Isolation Agar (Remel) and then tested for antigen-one swab by the Strep A OIA optical immune assay (BioStar) and the other by the TestPack Plus Strep A (Abbott) technique. Each test was performed blind to the others. The refrigerated pledget was cultured in Todd-Hewitt broth if an antigen test was positive and both direct plate cultures were negative (the "gold standard" was any culture positive). All isolates were serologically grouped. Of 500 complete patient cultures, 151 (30%) were positive for group A streptococcal growth. The two antigen tests gave comparable results with an average sensitivity of 83%. Each was significantly (P < 0.02) less sensitive than its corresponding culture. The BioStar Strep A OIA optical immune assay produced significantly (P < 0.003) more false-positive results than did the Abbott test. Rapid antigen testing is not sensitive enough to eliminate the need for backup cultures.Rapid diagnosis of group A strep pharyngitis in the emergency department.Two ten-minute rapid tests for diagnosing Group A streptococcal pharyngitis in 147 emergency department patients with a complaint of sore throat were evaluated using positive throat cultures as the marker for disease. Treatment was initiated solely on the basis of clinical judgment. Sensitivity and specificity were 78% and 93%, respectively, for the rapid test and 69% and 56%, respectively, for clinical judgment. The rapid test was significantly better than clinical judgment alone in determining the presence of disease (P less than .05). The predictive values of the positive and negative and were 78% and 93%, respectively, for the rapid test and 38% and 85%, respectively, for clinical judgment. In the ED setting in which adequate followup is difficult, the rapid test can identify more accurately than can clinical judgment alone those patients who need therapy.Evaluation of rapid streptococcal detection tests.Repetition of the rapid antigen test in initially negative supposed streptococcal pharyngitis is not necessary in adults.To determine whether the repetition of the rapid antigen detection test (RADT) in patients, with a high suspicion of presenting pharyngitis by group A beta-haemolytic streptococci (GABHS), with a previously negative test improves the validity of the test.Two hundred and twenty-two patients aged 14 years or more with acute pharyngitis and two or more Centor criteria--tonsillar exudates, fever, tenderness in the lymph glands and/or absence of cough--were consecutively recruited. In all patients, a pharyngotonsillar sample was obtained with two swabs, one for the RADT (OSOM Strep A Genzyme test, Genzyme Diagnostics, Cambridge, MA, USA) and the other was sent to the Department of Microbiology for culture. In patients with a negative RADT, the determination was repeated. The sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were determined.Cultures were positive for GABHS in 55 patients (24.8%). Three false-negatives and 14 false-positives were observed by comparing the rapid test with throat culture, achieving a sensitivity of 94.5% and a specificity of 91.6%. Positive and negative predictive values were 78.8% and 98.1% respectively. Taking the second determination in the negative cases into account, the results were 96.4%, 91.6%, 79.1% and 98.7% respectively.The negative predictive value achieved with the RADT determination was very high. Repetition of the test only slightly improved this percentage, making repetition of this test unnecessary.Rapid strep tests in the pediatric clinical setting.Evaluation of a new rapid antigen detection kit for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci.To evaluate the use of a new rapid antigen-detection kit for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus and compare results with previously published studies.Throat swabs were obtained prospectively from patients, aged one to 18 years, presenting to the emergency department, acute concerns clinic, and walk-in clinic of an urban tertiary care children's hospital. Throat swabs were first inoculated on a 5% sheep blood agar plate and then used for the streptococcus A optical immunoassay (OIA) kit. Results of both the throat culture and the rapid antigen-detection test were then compared.Two-hundred thirty-three patients were enrolled. Seventy-three patients had a positive culture and 63 patients had a positive OIA. Fifteen patients had a false negative result for the OIA kit and five patients had a false positive result. Test sensitivity was 79.5%, specificity was 96.9%, positive predictive value was 92.1%, and negative predictive value was 91.2%Although previous studies have demonstrated OIA kit sensitivities as high as 98.9% and authors have, as a result, recommended that the performance of a backup throat culture for a negative OIA test is unnecessary, our results do not support this. A sensitivity of 79.5% is not sufficiently high to justify omission of a standard throat culture. Accordingly, all OIA tests that are negative should be confirmed by the performance of a throat culture.[Diagnosis of sore throat. A multipractice study of 3 different ways of antigenic determination for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs].During five months in the winter of 1992/1993, 34 general practitioners (GPs) from 18 offices participated in a clinical testing of three group A streptococcal antigen detection test (ADT) kits (Abbott TestPack Strep A Plus (Abbott), Concise Strep A, Hybritech (Concise) and Kodak SureCell Strep A (Kodak)). The GPs obtained duplicate throat swabs, one for processing with the ADT kit, the other for culture reference at The Streptococcus Laboratory (Bacteriological Department, Statens Seruminstitut, Copenhagen). A total of 1389 patients were enrolled in the study, thirty percent of whom were infected by group A streptococci. The following results were obtained: Abbott: Sensitivity: 76%, specificity: 99%, positive predictive value: 97%, negative predictive value: 91%. Concise: Sensitivity: 82%, specificity: 95%, positive predictive value: 86%, negative predictive value: 92%. Kodak: Sensitivity: 84%, specificity: 87%, positive predictive value: 73%, negative predictive value: 93%. As a follow-up to the main study, each GP filled in a questionnaire, stating his opinion about the investigated ADT kit. Considering the practical handiness, Concise scored higher than Abbott, which in turn scored higher than Kodak. In conclusion, Abbott and Concise are recommended for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis in general practice.[Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngo-tonsillitis in a primary care unit].One of the main consulting motives in ambulatory pediatric practice is acute pharyngotonsillitis. This work values the efficacy of a test to confirm rapid diagnosis (30 minutes) of streptococcal pharyngitis. Authors selected 100 children in a office of primary health care whose ages were between two and seven years, from February to July in 1986. They have considered classical clinical symptoms of pharyngitis and have applied a throat culture and rapid test in all. After comparing test results and culture results, obtained sensibility and specificity have been 80% and 95% (p less than 0.01) respectively. According to these results, they believe on the necessity of a test that permits a rapid diagnosis and which enables to treat acute pharyngitis in a more suitable way in ambulatory pediatrics.Rational decisions in managing sore throat: evaluation of a rapid test.Sixty nine general practitioners recorded what they had prescribed for a total of 1189 episodes of sore throat. Antibiotics were prescribed in 763 (64%) episodes and broad spectrum antibiotics in 161 (21%) of these. If there was dysphagia, hoarseness, cervical adenopathy, and inflamed or purulent tonsils a prescription was more likely to be written. An enzyme immunoassay rapid test was evaluated as a means of rationalizing prescribing. Among 23 general practitioners and 250 patients the sensitivity of the test was 63% and the specificity 91.7% compared with 74% and 58% for clinical assessment alone. Test results rarely caused previous prescribing decisions (34 [corrected] (13%) episodes) to be altered. We suggest that the time is not ripe for the use of the enzyme immunoassay rapid test on a wide scale in the routine assessment of sore throats.Comparison of two rapid Streptococcus pyogenes diagnostic tests with a rigorous culture standard.Comparisons of rapid antigen tests for the diagnosis of pharyngitis are often made between published studies but may not be reliable given differences in study design, sampling and reference standard definitions. Tests are rarely compared against each other in a single study.The sensitivity and specificity of two rapid diagnostic tests were compared against a multiplate culture standard defined as the identification of on any of four culture plates. Paired swabs were tested for antigen using Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test and compared with Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test.Ninety-four (31.1%) of 302 matched samples were identified with The sensitivity of Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test against the multiplate culture standard was 92.6%, significantly higher ( P= 0.001) than that (75.5%) of Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test. Specificities were 92.8 and 97.1%, respectively. Data analysis of culture results and statistical modeling showed that cultures of two or more samples are necessary for a sensitivity of 95% or greater for a comparison standard compared with true disease status.When comparing the performance of rapid antigen tests for pharyngitis, a rigorous culture standard should be used consisting of at least two separate samples (swabs and/or pledgets), ultimately plated on selective agar. Genzyme's OSOM Ultra Strep A Test was significantly more sensitive than Biostar's Strep A OIA Max Test in comparison with a multiplate culture standard and a same swab, single plate culture standard.Evaluation of two rapid antigen assays, BioStar Strep A OIA and Pacific Biotech CARDS O.S., and culture for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Suitability of throat culture procedures for detection of group A streptococci and as reference standards for evaluation of streptococcal antigen detection kits.Impact on empiric treatment of group A streptococcal pharyngitis using an optical immunoassay.The potential impact of using a rapid diagnostic test (Strep A OIA) on detection and treatment of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) pharyngitis in a large-volume pediatric and adolescent clinic was examined. Of 519 swabs processed for both culture and the OIA test, 114 were culture-positive for GABHS compared with 133 positive by the OIA test, for an agreement of 94%. OIA test sensitivity compared with culture was 96%, and specificity was 94%. Forty-seven percent of all study patients were empirically placed on antibiotics. In-clinic OIA testing could have reduced inappropriate therapy and been a cost-effective alternative to culture.Rapid antigen detection testing.Rapid diagnostic tests for streptococcal pharyngitis.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis from throat swabs.Optical immunoassay test for group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis. An office-based, multicenter investigation.To compare the accuracy of an optical immunoassay (OIA) for the rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis with blood agar plate (BAP) culture.Blinded comparison with criterion standard.A total of 6 private pediatricians' offices, 3 in Connecticut and 3 in Chicago, III.A total of 2113 consecutive patients with acute pharyngitis, 983 in Connecticut and 1130 in Chicago.The sensitivities and specificities of OIA and BAP culture (both performed and interpreted in the office) were determined using a research laboratory's interpretation of a combination of BAP culture and Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) culture of transport tube pledget as criterion standard.Among patients in Connecticut, the sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 94% and 89%, respectively (P=.004), while the specificities were 96% and 99%, respectively (P=.001). Among patients in Chicago, the sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 79% and 72%, respectively (P<.001), while the specificities were 89% and 99%, respectively (P<.001). In each of the 6 pediatricians' offices, the OIA was more sensitive than the BAP culture. Combining the data from Connecticut and Chicago, the overall sensitivities of the OIA and BAP culture were 84% and 78%, respectively (P<.001), while the specificities were 93% and 99%, respectively (P<.001).The results of this comprehensive office-based investigation suggest that with adequately trained personnel, negative OIA test results may not always need to be routinely confirmed with BAP cultures.Comparative reliability of clinical, culture, and antigen detection methods for the diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Evaluation of the pacific biotech CARDS STREP A test for detecting group A streptococci from cases of pharyngitis.The Pacific Biotech CARD STREP A test for rapid screening of throat specimens for group A streptococci was evaluated. Relative to conventional culture, this assay had a sensitivity of 76.1% (108 of 142) and a specificity of 98.7% (392 of 397). The relatively low sensitivity of the test makes it of questionable value as a screening procedure.External quality control of direct antigen tests to detect group A streptococcal antigen.Presented here are the results of an external quality control survey organized by the Swiss Center for Quality Control (CSCQ) to evaluate the performance of direct antigen tests (DATs) widely used in Swiss medical practices and laboratories for the diagnosis of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. Twice yearly over a 4-year period, just over 100 participants were requested to analyze positive, weakly positive and negative samples provided to them by the CSCQ with their routinely used DATs and to send the results to the CSCQ. For 1,620 samples distributed, the CSCQ received 1,484 (91.6%) results obtained with 17 different DATs. The specificity of all DATs for negative samples was >91%. For samples containing abundant group A streptococcal antigen, sensitivities ranged from 59.1% to 95.5%; however, for samples containing low levels of antigen, the sensitivity was much lower for all DATs, ranging from 8.7% to 69.8%. Therefore, negative DAT results should be verified with well-performed cultures in order to assure the optimal care of patients with pharyngitis.[Evaluation of a fast test for direct research on streptococcal group A from pharyngeal samples].Importance of streptococcal pharyngitis rapid diagnosis is increasing. 645 patients with pharyngoamygdalitis were tested. The correlation between bacteriologic culture and rapid test is 86%, the sensibility of the test is 68%, its specificity is 92%, while the predictive positive and negative values are 75% and 90%. These results show the interest of the rapid test for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Treatment of streptococcal sore throat. Immunoassays for rapid diagnosis.Evaluation of a rapid diagnostic test for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in general practice.to assess the efficacy of Abbott Testpack Strep A compared with throat culture for the diagnosis of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in general practice.one hundred and fifty-four specimens were obtained from general practices in selected regions, and were tested for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus using both Abbott Testpack Strep A and throat culture.sensitivity of the rapid diagnostic test was 79.4%, specificity 93.3%. The negative predictive value of the test was 94.1%; the positive predictive value 77.1%.maximum cost effectiveness is achieved, with respect to short term costs and benefits, by diagnosing and treating solely on the basis of Abbott Testpack Strep A results. When possible complications are taken into consideration, initial testing by Abbott Testpack Strep A, followed by confirmatory laboratory testing of negative Testpack results becomes a feasible alternative.Febrile exudative tonsillitis: viral or streptococcal?A prospective 1-year study of acute febrile exudative tonsillitis in 110 children was carried out. Viral infection was associated with 42% of the cases, beta-hemolytic streptococci with 31% (12% group A), Mycoplasma pneumoniae with 5%, and unknown cause with 35%. More than one agent was implicated in 14% of the cases. Adenovirus was the viral agent most frequently (19%) recorded. Other viruses involved were Epstein-Barr virus, parainfluenza, influenza A, herpes simplex, and respiratory syncytial viruses. The responsible agent was found by rapid viral antigen detection in 20% of all cases and by rapid test for group A streptococcal antigen detection in 10%. Age was the most important factor in predicting the causative agent. Viral tonsillitis was most common in children younger than 3 years of age and group A beta-hemolytic streptococci tonsillitis in children 6 years of age or more. Clinical analysis of the illness, WBC count, and ESR did not reveal differences that could help in differentiating bacterial from viral tonsillitis. All patients were treated with a regimen of oral penicillin. Fever associated with group A beta-hemolytic streptococci tonsillitis responded to penicillin therapy significantly more rapidly than fever associated with viral infections. These observations demonstrate the prominent role of viruses in the etiology of febrile exudative tonsillitis, especially in young children, and reinforce the benefit of rapid tests before antibiotic therapy is started.[Streptococcal sore throat: the role of rapid diagnostic tests in the doctor's office].[Rapid diagnosis of group A streptococci in the throat cannot yet substitute for conventional culture technics].Sore throat in family practice: comparison of blood agar throat culture with a rapid enzyme immunoassay test for diagnostic purposes.The Ventrescreen (Ventrex) rapid enzyme immunoassay test for detecting group A streptococcal antigen directly from a throat swab was compared with conventional blood agar throat culture in the diagnosis of beta haemolytic streptococcal infection among 311 patients with a sore throat attending a large suburban Jerusalem primary care clinic. Using the throat culture as the 'gold standard' the Ventrescreen test had a sensitivity of 82%, a specificity of 50%, a positive predictive value of 49%, and a negative predictive value of 82% for beta haemolytic streptococcal infection. These results are not good enough for the test to be considered a reliable substitute for throat culture in such a setting. The negative predictive value, however, supports the use of a negative test result to identify those patients in whom antibiotic therapy could be withheld until the result of their throat culture became available. These conclusions are at variance with recommendations from other studies of similar tests in different population groups, and stress the need for the careful evaluation, especially in primary care clinics, of any such rapid test which claims to be able to replace throat culture in the detection of beta haemolytic streptococcal infection.Rapid commercial test for direct detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.The Hybritech Strep A ICON was used for direct testing of 1016 throat specimens for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci. Both the test and culture were negative in 829 specimens (81.6%); both were positive in 164 cases (16.1%); the test was positive and culture negative in 9 cases (0.9%); and the test negative and culture positive in 14 cases (1.4%).Practice tips. Incorporating a rapid group A streptococcus assay with the sore throat score.[Reliability and general practice value of 2 rapid Streptococcus A tests].Rapid streptococcal-A-antigen detection assays have good specificity (over 90 percent) but moderate sensitivity (between 80 and 90 percent), when the tests are compared with a standard throat culture. Contradictory results have been found for one of the more recent tests, the optical immune assay Strep A OIA MAX, while for 6 years, we have been using the immune assay Strep A Plus. Results of the optical immunoassay and the conventional immune assay Strep A Plus were compared in 65 patients with acute pharyngitis. A standard culture was used as reference and confirmed by enhanced broth culturing and nucleic acid hybridization assay (Gen-Probe) when the two detection assays produced contradictory results. While both assays were equally sensitive (78.3%), Strep A OIA MAX and Strep A Plus had a similar specificity of 95.2% and 100%, respectively. Four and nine steps were required for Strep A Plus and for Strep A OIA MAX test procedures, respectively with results being available in 4-5 min and in 9-10 min, respectively. We conclude that both rapid immunoassays have a similar reliability while the handling of the Strep A Plus is much simpler than the handling of the Strep A OIA MAX. Neither rapid immunoassays are sensitive enough to eliminate the need for backup cultures.New colorimetric test for rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis: a warning.Rapid diagnostic test and throat cultures for streptococcal pharyngitis.Are follow-up throat cultures necessary when rapid antigen detection tests are negative for group A streptococci?The frequency of obtaining false-negative Group A Streptococcal (GAS) rapid antigen detection (RAD) tests utilizing currently available kits in a private practice setting and the cost effectiveness of requiring follow-up throat cultures were studied. Laboratory records of the Elmwood Pediatric Group (EPG), Rochester, NY, were retrospectively reviewed to identify all patients with pharyngeal RAD tests for GAS performed from January 1996 through May 1999. From January 1996 through October 1997 (study period 1), EPG physicians used either a RAD test or a throat culture to identify GAS; from November 1997 through May 1999 (study period 2), RAD tests were used as the primary test on all patients. Rapid antigen detection test negative results were confirmed with culture. During the 3-year study 11,427 RAD tests were performed. 8,385 (73.4%) were negative and 3,042 (26.6%) were positive. In study period 1, 3,547 (73.2%) were negative and 1,299 (26.8%) were positive; in study period 2 4,837 (73.5%) were negative and 1,743 (26.5%) were positive. Of the 8,385 negative tests, 8,234 (98.2%) were followed up with throat cultures. Of these, 200 (2.4%) were identified to have been negative RAD tests that were throat culture positive (132 [3.8%] of 3,474 in study period 1 and 68 [1.4%] of 4,764 in study period 2). A cost analysis was performed for study period 2, which showed that abandoning throat culture confirmation would generate a cost saving of $13,521 per year to the practice. Throat culture confirmation of RAD test negative results in pharyngitis patients may not be medically necessary for most patients with currently available RAD tests and is costly.Comparison of the TestPack Strep A enzyme immunoassay system with anaerobically incubated cultures for detection of group A streptococci from oropharyngeal swabs.To find a rapid and sensitive test for detection of Group A streptococci (GABS), the performance of the TestPack Strep A (TPSA; Abbott) was compared with culture with the use of rayon-tipped throat swabs from symptomatic patients six months to 90 years of age. Each swab was first inoculated to a 5% sheep blood agar plate and then tested for GABS antigen with the use of the TPSA and the manufacturer's instructions. Cultures were incubated anaerobically at 35 degrees C for 36-48 hours unless positive results were obtained after one night. GABS were identified with a fluorescent antibody method or a latex antibody test. From 1,616 throat swabs, 296 (18.3%) of the cultures contained GABS. The sensitivity and specificity of the TPSA were 73.3% and 94.8%, respectively, whereas the predictive values of positive and negative results were 75.9% and 94.1%, respectively. Results varied significantly, however, with different production lots of TPSA. The TPSA does not appear to provide a sensitive alternative to an anaerobic culture for detection of GABS.[Utilization of rapid diagnostic tests for group A streptococcus and and bacteriologic and clinical correlations with acute angina in general medicine].A prospective study was conducted between November 1995 and May 1996 by 130 general practitioners in France to assess feasibility of a rapid routine diagnostic test for group A streptococcus infection in a general medicine setting and to search for bacteriological and clinical correlations.A routine diagnostic test was performed in all patients presenting acute pharyngitis and cultures were ordered in case of positive tests. Among the 2,800 patients included, there were 563 children under 14 years and 2,226 adults. The routine diagnostic test was positive in 393 cases (14%). A culture was obtained in 375 case and isolated group A streptococcus in 324 (11.5% of the total population). The positive predictive value of the routine diagnostic test was 86.4% in this general medicine setting.Comparing clinical signs with the results of the routine diagnostic test showed that an erythematous pultaceous aspect of the pharynx, severe dysphagia and the presence of enlarged nodes were more frequent in patients with streptococcal pharyngitis. The association of these 3 clinical signs with fever > 38 degrees C was also more frequent in patients with a positive routine diagnostic test (OR = 3.3; 95% CI = 2.5-4.4). The triad hoarseness + cough + rhinorrhea was more frequent in subjects with a positive routine diagnostic test (22.7% versus 9%; OR = 2.6; 95% CI = 2.1-4.3).The general practitioners who participated in this study found the routine diagnostic test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis was easy to use and compatible with everyday practice. This diagnostic tool was seen as a progress in the management of acute pharyngitis, but only 53.7% of the practitioners were willing to use antibiotics only for cases where a highly specific routine diagnostic test performed during the consultation identifies group A streptococcus. Lack of reimbursement by the national health assurance however makes it impossible to use this test routinely in the general medicine setting.Comparison of two rapid diagnostic tests for group A Streptococcus.Development of rapid strep test technology.Comparison of throat cultures and rapid strep tests for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.The impact of a rapid screen for streptococcal pharyngitis on clinical decision making in the emergency department.The impact of a rapid streptococcal screening test (RSS) on clinical decision making in the management of patients with acute pharyngitis was evaluated. Physicians managing 95 ambulatory patients with the complaint of sore throat were asked to estimate the probability of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis (GRABS) in each patient and whether they intended to treat with antibiotics both before and after the results of the RSS were known. Simultaneous throat cultures were obtained for 80 patients at the discretion of the treating physicians. Regression analysis revealed that the RSS result was an important independent predictor for the posttest decision to treat with antibiotics and for the estimated probability of disease. The mean absolute log-likelihood ratio was used to quantify the effect of the RSS on diagnostic certainty; a greater contribution to diagnostic certainty occurred when the RSS was positive. Physicians would have prescribed an antibiotic 49 times without the benefit of the RSS and prescribed an antibiotic 48 times given the RSS result. Without the RSS, the treatment decision contradicted the throat culture result in 25 cases. With the RSS, this occurred in 26 cases. The RSS, while influencing decision making, especially when positive, did not decrease the use of antibiotics.Rapid strep assessment.Group A streptococcal infection in patients presenting with a sore throat at an accident and emergency department: prospective observational study.To determine the prevalence of group A streptococcal infection and to evaluate the predictive value of clinical findings and rapid streptococcal antigen detection testing in patients presenting with a sore throat or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis.Prospective observational study.Accident and emergency department of a public hospital, Hong Kong.All patients presenting with a sore throat as the chief complaint, or suspected clinically to have acute pharyngitis, from April to September 2000.Demographic data, clinical features, microbiological throat culture results, and rapid streptococcal antigen detection (Accustrip) test results.Of 1449 patients recruited during the 6-month study period, only 44 (3.0%) had positive throat cultures for group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus. The majority of group A beta-haemolytic streptococci were isolated from patients between the age of 3 and 60 years. Clinical findings other than an absence of cough were found to be unhelpful in predicting group A beta-haemolytic streptococcal throat infection. The sensitivity of the rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection test was 52.6% and the specificity was 98.2%.The prevalence of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus in patients presenting with a sore throat, or suspected clinically of having acute pharyngitis, was low. If empirical antibiotics were given to all such patients, 97% of them would be unnecessarily treated. Age and absence of cough were the only clinical findings helpful in predicting the presence of group A beta-haemolytic streptococcal throat infection. The rapid group A streptococcal antigen detection test can provide a quick guide to clinicians on the necessity of antibiotic therapy. However, a confirmatory throat culture backup is recommended for patients with a negative test result.Detection of group A streptococci in the laboratory or physician's office. Culture vs antibody methods.Much controversy has existed concerning the clinical significance of small numbers of group A streptococci (eg, one to ten or even 50 colonies) recovered in culture. The relative quantity of streptococci recovered is, in part, technique dependent. This review documents the need for sensitive throat culture technology, addresses technical problems associated with the culture procedure, and, in light of these problems, explores the need for very carefully performed studies on streptococcal antigen detection kits before their implementation as a routine test either in physicians' offices or in microbiology laboratories.[Streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis: clinical vs. microbiological diagnosis].This study aimed to evaluate the role of clinical diagnosis vs. rapid antigen detection tests (RADT) in identifying streptococcal vs. non-streptococcal cases of acute pharyngitis (AP) with respect to a scoring schedule. The Breese scoring system, modified by eliminating the count of peripheral WBC, was used in the study. At enrolment, cases of AP observed by office-based pediatricians were judged on a clinical basis as possibly of streptococcal or of non-streptococcal origin and a clinical score recorded. At the end of the visit and following completion of the clinical score to document the presence/absence of a group A beta haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS), a confirmatory RADT was performed. In RADT negative cases a standard throat swab and culture were performed. In all, 629 children presenting with AP were enrolled in the study. A correct clinical diagnosis was predicted on the basis of the clinical observation in 74.2% of cases (with a sensitivity of 81.1% and specificity of 70.5%). In cases judged as "streptococcal", a mean score of 27.6 was recorded both in those patients with a positive or negative RADT/throat swab for GABHS. By contrast, among cases considered of non-streptococcal aetiology, negative RADT/culture had a mean score of 24.3 compared to a mean score of 25 in those with a positive RADT/culture. Intragroup score differences were not significant, while intergroup differences were highly significant. Optimization of AP treatment requires careful identification of streptococcal cases, avoiding unnecessary antibiotic treatment which would contribute to enhancing antibiotic resistance and increase medical treatment costs. We document that clinical observation alone, although performed by skilled pediatricians, will misdiagnose a sizeable percentage of cases. As indicated by this study, scores may suffer from a subjective interpretative bias in grading the severity of signs and symptoms.Diagnostic value of rapid antigen detection test for streptococcal pharyngitis in a pediatric population.Acute upper respiratory tract infections in children may result in overuse of antibiotics as throat culture cannot be performed in every setting and results cannot be obtained early. A rapid and reliable test might decrease unnecessary antibiotic usage. The purpose of this study was to determine the prevalence of group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus (GABHS) infections in different pediatric age groups and to assess the diagnostic value of rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for streptococcal pharyngitis. This study was performed in a pediatric outpatient clinic. All children who were admitted with signs and symptoms of acute upper respiratory tract infections were included in the study. Throat culture and RADT were performed and prevalence of GABHS was assessed. Diagnostic value of RADT was determined. This study included 1248 children with a mean age of 6.3+/-3.6 years. There were 655, 518, and 75 children in age groups of 0-6, 7-12 and 13+ years, respectively. The overall prevalence of GABHS was 38.1% (475/1248), as judged by throat culture. The prevalence was highest in the 7-12-year age group (53.9%) and lowest in the 0-6-year age group (25.2%). Considering all patients, RADT gave a sensitivity of 89.7%, specificity of 97.2%. The sensitivity and specificity of RADT were similar in different age groups (p values >0.05). Diagnostic value of RADT is high and can be used safely in populations where streptococcal pharyngitis and its complications such as acute rheumatic fever and acute glomerulonephritis are common.Comparison of two rapid tests for detecting group A streptococcal pharyngitis in the pediatric population at wright-patterson air force base.This prospective cohort study compared two rapid antigen tests for group A streptococcus in an enrolled pediatric population of a busy Air Force clinic during the autumn of 2005. The study was performed to determine whether the Genzyme test was a more sensitive rapid test than the currently used Quidel test. A highly sensitive rapid test would eliminate the need to perform backup cultures, thus saving time and facilitating faster diagnosis and treatment. The study revealed that the Genzyme test was more sensitive (85.5%) than the Quidel test (79.5%). However, the difference was not statistically significant using the McNemar chi(2) tool and was attributable to random variability. Therefore, future comparative studies need to be performed to find a rapid antigen test with sensitivity comparable to that of throat culture, for use at the Wright-Patterson Air Force Base pediatric clinic.Comparative evaluation of kits for rapid diagnosis of group A streptococcal disease.The role of rapid diagnostic tests for Group A streptococcal disease has not been firmly established. High quality data concerning these rapid streptococcal tests are not available; current information does not allow for direct test comparisons to be made; the superiority of rapid diagnostic technology over traditional throat cultures has not been proved. Subgroups which might benefit from this technology could include those who (1) are severely ill, (2) have been excluded from school or day care because of a streptococcal infection, (3) have a history of rheumatic fever and are not taking antimicrobial prophylaxis or (4) live in a confined residential setting. Each available test kit has a mixture of performance features, allowing for individual choices based on office and practice needs. Product technology is expected to change rapidly. Reassessment of any current decision may well lead to a different conclusion in 6 to 12 months.A quick strep test.[Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis: what's new?].Culture confirmation of negative rapid strep test results.Rapid antigen detection testing in diagnosing group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.The purpose of this study was to determine the accuracy of diagnosing group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS) with rapid antigen testing compared with throat culture methods commonly used.Two separate studies were conducted. Initially, 182 patients with acute pharyngitis had both throat culture (sheep blood agar or Strep Select Agar) and rapid antigen detection screening tests (Directigen1-2-3 Group A Strep) performed. For the second study, a rapid antigen detection test (Directigen1-2-3 Group A Strep) was obtained from 614 patients. All subjects who screened negative (n = 469) received a throat culture. All subjects who screened positive (n = 145) were treated with antibiotics, and 31 of these patients received a throat culture. Statistical analyses included calculating sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and prevalence.For the initial 182 patients, the prevalence of GABHS was 12 percent. Sensitivity was 95.45 percent, specificity was 96.25 percent, positive predictive value was 77.78 percent, and negative predictive value was 99.35 percent. In the second group of subjects, four false-negatives were present (negative predictive value = 99.18 percent).Results of these pilot studies indicate that an extremely low percentage (< 1 percent) of subjects with GABHS escaped detection with our rapid screening test methods. These results conflict with results from previous investigations, which have reported relatively low specificity and sensitivity of rapid antigen detection tests when compared with throat cultures. Results from this study support treatment protocols based on a rapid screening test as a single diagnostic test.[Diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis. Rapid test prevents treatment error].[Use of streptococcal antigen tests in acute tonsillitis].Critical evaluation of a CLIA-waived streptococcal antigen detection test in the emergency department.We compare the performance of a Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA)-waived antigen detection test (ADT) analyzed in the emergency department and a CLIA moderately complex ADT performed in the hospital microbiology laboratory.Samples from throat swabs were obtained using a double-headed Culturette II (Becton Dickinson Medical Systems, Sparks, MD) from a consecutive sample of 322 patients 3 years or older who presented to the ED of a university-affiliated pediatric referral hospital with the complaint of sore throat during 1998. One swab was transported to the microbiology laboratory and analyzed using a CLIA moderately complex ADT; negative results were confirmed using sheep blood agar culture. The second swab remained in the ED where a nurse conducted a CLIA-waived ADT. The accepted standard for documentation of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal (GABHS) infection was either a positive moderately complex ADT or culture result. The time of specimen collection, as well as the time the ED results and microbiology laboratory results were available to treating physicians, were recorded. Main outcome measures were concordance (kappa statistic), sensitivity, and turnaround time (Mann-Whitney U test).Three hundred twenty-two patients (mean age 7.5 years) had both ADTs performed. One hundred one (31%) patients had documented GABHS in the microbiology laboratory; 83 (82%) had a positive ADT result in the microbiology laboratory, and 18 (18%) had a positive culture result after a negative moderately complex ADT result. In 299 patients or 93% (95% confidence interval [CI] 90.8%, 95.8%) of patients, the waived ADT and the moderately complex ADT results were concordant (kappa 0.82; 95% CI 0.78, 0.86; P <.001). The sensitivity of the waived ADT was 80%; the sensitivity of the moderately complex ADT approximated 82% (difference of 2%; 95%CI -3%, 7%). The median times from swab specimen collection to availability of ADT results were 10 minutes (range 3 to 37 minutes) for the waived ADT and 35 minutes (range 5 to 162 minutes) for the moderately complex ADT (P <.001) with a difference of 25 minutes (95% CI 22.4, 27.6 minutes).In this study, an ED CLIA-waived rapid streptococcal throat test performed as well as its equivalent CLIA-regulated laboratory test. Further, the ED test provided results more rapidly than the laboratory test. Our results also validate previous work that negative rapid throat test results in pediatric patients in the ED should be confirmed by standard throat culture.Rapid office methods for the diagnosis of streptococcal tonsillitis--reliability and impact on patient management.Evaluation of the modified Visuwell Strep-A enzyme immunoassay for detection of group-A Streptococcus from throat swabs.The modified Visuwell Strep-A enzyme immunoassay (EIA) was compared with culture for detection of group-A Streptococcus from throat swabs. Throat swabs in modified Stuarts medium obtained after culture at two institutions were tested in Visuwell. Cumulative results were n = 417, sensitivity 87.8%, specificity 89.9% predictive value positive (PVP) 67.9%, predictive value negative (PVN) 96.8%, and accuracy 89.5%. At another site, swabs were delivered to the laboratory without transport medium, cultured, and subsequently tested by Visuwell (n = 202, sensitivity 79.6%, specificity 84.5%, PVP 65.2%, PVN 91.9%, accuracy 83.2%). When 1+ culture-positive specimens were considered negative, the sensitivity and PVN increased from 79.6% to 90.2% and 91.9% to 97.1% respectively. Overall performance of the modified Visuwell was comparable with that of the initial assay for throat swabs transported with or without modified Stuarts medium. Cross reaction with organisms other than group-A Streptococcus normally found in the oropharynx was negligible in Visuwell and the limit of detection of group-A Streptococcus was 5 x 10(4) colony-forming units.Evaluation of an ELISA for group A streptococcal antigen for diagnosis of pharyngitis.Performance of rapid streptococcal antigen testing varies by personnel.Rapid carbohydrate antigen tests are frequently used to diagnose group A streptococcal (GAS) pharyngitis. Despite evidence of modest sensitivity in medical settings, rapid antigen tests are available to the public for self-testing. We sought to determine if the personnel performing a rapid streptococcal antigen test influence the test's performance characteristics. Throat swabs of pediatric patients performed for GAS pharyngitis in a tertiary-care children's hospital network were included during two study periods in 2004 and 2005. The performance characteristics of a rapid carbohydrate antigen test were evaluated in three clinical settings against a nucleic acid probe test method according to the personnel performing the test (laboratory technologist versus nonlaboratory personnel). Between the study periods, nonlaboratory personnel from one site underwent retraining. Subsequently, the performance characteristics of the rapid antigen test were reassessed. The sensitivity of the rapid antigen test varied widely among the different testing sites (56 to 90%). Notably, test sensitivity was consistently greater when the test was performed by laboratory technologists than when it was performed by nonlaboratory personnel (P < 0.0001). Although the rapid antigen test sensitivity significantly improved after nonlaboratory personnel at one testing site were retrained (sensitivity before versus after retraining; P < 0.0001), the sensitivity remained greater in the laboratory technologist cohort (P < 0.0001). These data confirm the important relationship of the operator performing a rapid streptococcal antigen test with the test's accuracy, even in a clinical setting, where operator training is mandated. Therefore, its use outside the medical setting by lay persons cannot be recommended without culture backup.[Acute tonsillitis: clinical symptoms; bacteriologic culture and rapid test as deciding criteria for the use of antibiotics].In order to prevent late sequelae from an untreated streptococcal pharyngitis all patients with streptococcal tonsillitis/pharyngitis have to be treated with antibiotics, preferably penicillin. A correct diagnosis by clinical criteria is only achievable in 72% of patients with streptococcal pharyngitis. Additional criteria such as diagnosis by culture are, therefore, mandatory. Time is a major disadvantage of traditional culture methods. Slide agglutination tests show an acceptable sensitivity of 92% and a specificity of 93%. Due to the possibility of false negative test results, with consequent withholding of adequate antimicrobial chemotherapy, these test results should be used only as a valuable guide. Decision to administer an antibiotic should still be based on clinical criteria.Group A streptococcal tonsillitis: comparative evaluation of kits for rapid diagnosis.Evaluation of TestPack Strep A for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.The performance of TestPack Strep A (Abbott Laboratories), a rapid enzyme immunoassay, was compared with a culture-based method for the detection of group A streptococci in 648 throat swabs. The rapid test correctly detected 99 of the 128 positive and 511 of the 520 negative specimens, a sensitivity of 77% and a specificity of 98%. Although highly specific, TestPack Strep A is less sensitive than culture techniques for the detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Methods for the rapid screening of group A streptococci: fluorescent in situ hybridization versus immunochromatography.To evaluate the accuracy of detection for screening group A streptococci (GAS) in pediatric clinics using fluorescent in situ hybridization (FISH) and immunochromatographic assay (ICA).A group of 630 children who attended an outpatient clinic with signs and symptoms of acute upper respiratory tract infection were enrolled in this study. Specimens were collected using a double-swab collection device. Culturing methods were employed as the gold standard for comparison. Discordant results (i.e., positive results for FISH or ICA along with negative culture results) were further evaluated by using Todd-Hewitt broth (THB) with subsequent subculture for group A selective streptococcus agar. True-positive or false-positive of GAS was determined by the presence or absence of THB subculture. The diagnostic characteristics of FISH and ICA were assessed.After discrepant analysis, the sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values were as follows: 89.2, 100, 100 and 95.4%, respectively, for FISH; corresponding values for ICA were 76.8, 98.6, 96.1 and 90.5%.The results demonstrated that the FISH assay had a higher detection sensitivity than ICA and is suitable for rapid and accurate GAS screening in pediatric clinics.Detection of group A streptococci by aerobic culture and a new simplified immunoassay in three pediatric practices and a hospital laboratory.Duplicate throat swabs for detection of group A streptococci were collected in three pediatric offices from 1,035 patients with symptoms of pharyngitis. In the collecting office and in the hospital laboratory, one swab from each patient was first inoculated to sheep blood agar (incubated at 35 degrees C aerobically for 2 days) and then tested for group A streptococcal antigen by using the SMART enzyme immunoassay technique (New Horizons Diagnostics Corp) incubated for up to 24 hours. Group A streptococci were recovered in culture (from one or both swabs) and serologically identified from 444 (42.9%) of the patients. Pediatric offices numbers 1, 2, and 3 detected 84.4%, 84.6%, and 82.2%, respectively, of their patients who had positive cultures (in the office and/or laboratory) by using their own culture system and 82.6%, 71.1%, and 84.9%, respectively, of these same patients by using the SMART technique. In the laboratory, SMART test sensitivity and specificity were 71.4% and 98.7%, respectively, after 5 minutes of test incubation. However, SMART test sensitivity improved to 86.5% after overnight incubation of the immunoassay and to 91.3% if the data from one defective lot of seven SMART production lots studied were excluded. SMART test results which are negative after 5 minutes of incubation should therefore be confirmed both by reincubation of the antigen test up to 24 hours and by culture.Comparison of TestPack Plus Strep A with selective and nonselective culture media for detection of group-A streptococci.The TestPack Plus Strep A (TPPSA), an immunoassay method, was compared with conventional culture methods including nonselective trypticase soy agar with 5% sheep blood and selective SXT blood agar for detection of group-A streptococci (GAS). A total of 452 throat swabs was evaluated, of which 261 (57.7%) and 191 (42.3%) were compared with culture using nonselective and selective media, respectively. Of 261 specimens evaluated on nonselective media, 71 (27.1%) were culture positive for GAS. TPPSA demonstrated a sensitivity of 91.6% and a specificity of 94.2% with positive and negative predictive values of 85.5% and 96.8%, respectively. Of 191 specimens evaluated on selective media, 44 (23.0%) were culture positive for GAS. TPPSA demonstrated a sensitivity of 93.2% and a specificity of 98.0% with positive and negative predictive values of 93.2% and 98.0%, respectively. The performance of TPPSA when compared with nonselective and selective media demonstrated a similar sensitivity, but a higher specificity was seen when compared to selective media. Overall, TPPSA was extremely easy to perform, had built-in procedural controls, required minimal technologist time, and was easy to interpret. With an accuracy of 93.5% when compared with nonselective media and 96.9% when compared with selective media, TPPSA could be recommended as a reliable method for detection of GAS.Rapid streptococcal testing in Vietnamese children with pharyngitis.Streptococcal pharyngitis has been a significant public health problem in Vietnam for many years. Accurate diagnosis of the infection, however, has been difficult. We carried out a clinical trial of a rapid streptococcal antigen detection test (Quick-Vue (R) Flex Strep A) on a population of 777 children with pharyngitis seen at the Institute for the Protection of Children's Health (Children's Hospital) in Hanoi, Vietnam. Bacterial culture was performed in parallel with the rapid test on simultaneously obtained throat swab specimens. The rapid test was found to be 89% sensitive and 92% specific (96% in children not on prior antibiotics) compared to culture. The test was also found to be convenient and acceptable to patients and clinicians. A significant benefit of the test is that those children found positive are more likely to be treated with penicillin rather than a broad spectrum antimicrobial, which in turn will reduce the likelihood of resistant infections in the future.Performance of a rapid antigen-detection test and throat culture in community pediatric offices: implications for management of pharyngitis.The goals were to establish performance characteristics of a rapid antigen-detection test and blood agar plate culture performed and interpreted in community pediatric offices and to assess the effect of the pretest likelihood of group A streptococcus pharyngitis on test performance (spectrum bias).Two throat swabs were collected from 1848 children 3 to 18 years of age who were evaluated for acute pharyngitis between November 15, 2004, and May 15, 2005, in 6 community pediatric offices. One swab was used to perform the rapid antigen-detection test and a blood agar plate culture in the office and the other was sent to our laboratory for blood agar plate culture. Clinical findings were used to calculate the McIsaac score for each patient. The sensitivities of the office tests were calculated, with the hospital laboratory culture results as the criterion standard.Thirty percent of laboratory blood agar plate cultures yielded group A streptococcus (range among sites: 21%-36%). Rapid antigen-detection test sensitivity was 70% (range: 61%-80%). Office culture sensitivity was significantly greater, 81% (range: 71%-91%). Rapid antigen-detection test specificity was 98% (range: 98%-99.5%), and office culture specificity was 97% (range: 94%-99%), a difference that was not statistically significant. The sensitivity of a combined approach using the rapid antigen-detection test and back-up office culture was 85%. Among patients with McIsaac scores of >2, rapid antigen-detection test sensitivity was 78%, office culture sensitivity was 87%, and combined approach sensitivity was 91%. Positive diagnostic test results were significantly associated with McIsaac scores of >2.The sensitivity of the office culture was significantly greater than the sensitivity of the rapid antigen-detection test, but neither test was highly sensitive. The sensitivities of each diagnostic modality and the recommended combined approach were best among patients with greater pretest likelihood of group A streptococcus pharyngitis.Dilemmas of streptococcal pharyngitis.Although the Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus is the most common cause of acute bacterial pharyngitis in childhood, the clinical diagnosis is often not straightforward and throat cultures are advisable. To avoid unnecessary antibiotics, treatment should be delayed until culture results are available. Patients with negative cultures should discontinue any antibiotics already started on clinical grounds. Positive cultures may represent a carrier state, which can be identified by serologic studies.Which is the best method to trace group A streptococci in sore throat patients: culture or GAS antigen test?To compare an antigen detection test (GAS antigen test) with the results from combinations of two various bacteriological test media in general practice patients with sore throat. Furthermore to assess the diagnostic properties of the chosen GAS antigen test and to compare semi-quantitative results of this test with the bacterial load found in the throat culture.Two Norwegian general practices in Stokke and Kongsberg communities.306 patients with sore throat lasting less than 7 days; 244 were adults, 62 were children under 10 years old, mean age 23.9 years (SD 15.0), 40% were men.Results from GAS antigen test, and distribution of bacteriological findings in throat cultures, compared with the results of our GAS antigen test; semi-quantitative results of the GAS antigen test compared with the bacterial load by culture.In the primary culture 110 patients harboured group A streptococci (GAS) infection, while the second culture identified another 17, giving a total of 127 patients. Some 33 patients harboured large-colony groups C and G. The GAS antigen test used had a sensitivity of 97% and specificity of 95% regarding GAS when compared with the two cultures. We found a significant correlation between the bacterial loads by culture and the semi-quantitative results of the GAS antigen test.By using a second, different set of bacteriological media, we identified an additional 17 patients with GAS infections. This raises the question of validity of frequently used reference standards in studies related to streptococcal infections. Compared with the combined results of the two throat cultures, the GAS antigen test used showed high sensitivity and specificity. Semi-quantitative evaluations of the rapid immunological test may also be of clinical value.Evaluation of a rapid antigen detection test in the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in children and its impact on antibiotic prescription.To study the performance of the Becton-Dickinson Link 2 Strep A Rapid Test, a rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis in children presenting to private offices and to the Pediatric Outpatient Clinic of a university hospital, in relation to clinical criteria (fever, tender anterior cervical lymph nodes, tonsillar exudate and absence of cough), and its impact on antibiotic prescription.Children were enrolled in Group A (enrolment by private-practice paediatricians; diagnosis by clinical picture only), Group B (enrolment by private-practice paediatricians; diagnosis by RADT and culture) or Group C (enrolment by hospital-affiliated paediatricians in the Pediatric Outpatient Clinic; diagnosis by RADT and culture).During a 2 year period, 820 children were enrolled [369 (45%) in Group A, 270 (33%) in Group B and 181 (22%) in Group C]. Streptococcal pharyngitis was diagnosed by RADT and culture in 146 (32.4%) of the 451 tested children. The sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the RADT were 83.1%, 93.3%, 82.4% and 93.6%, respectively. A stepwise increase in the sensitivity of the RADT was noted among children with one, two, three or four clinical criteria (60.9% to 95.8%). Paediatricians without access to laboratory tests were more likely to prescribe antibiotics compared with paediatricians with access to tests (72.2% versus 28.2%, P < 0.001). Private-practice paediatricians prescribed antibiotics more frequently compared with hospital-affiliated paediatricians (55.7% versus 19.9%, P < 0.001).Our findings support screening of all children with pharyngitis for Centor criteria and subsequently performing an RADT to guide decision for antibiotic administration. Such a strategy has an important impact on limiting throat culture testing and is associated with reduced antibiotic prescription.Comparison of the sensitivity and specificity of eight commercially-available reagents for clinical detection of group A streptococcus to different extracts of streptococci.Performance of an enzyme immunoassay test and anaerobic culture for detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric practice versus a hospital laboratory.The ability of pediatricians and hospital laboratory personnel to detect group A streptococci in patients with suspected streptococcal pharyngitis was evaluated using the TestPack Strep A and anaerobic culture. Duplicate throat specimens (for similar processing by both the pediatricians and laboratory technologists) were simultaneously collected on rayon-tipped swabs from patients with symptoms of pharyngitis. Each swab was first inoculated to a 5% sheep blood agar plate, then tested for group A streptococcus antigen using the TestPack Strep A according to the manufacturer's instructions. Cultures were incubated anaerobically at 35 degrees C for 2 nights unless positive after 1 night. Group A streptococci were identified using specific antisera. Pediatric office or laboratory cultures from 112 (31.3%) of the 358 patients contained group A streptococci. Of the patients with positive cultures, 96 (85.7%) and 107 (95.5%) were detected by the pediatricians and laboratory, respectively. Respective findings with the TestPack Strep A by the pediatricians and laboratory were sensitivity 68.8% and 74.8%, specificity 94.3% and 95.6%, predictive value of a positive result 81.5% and 87.9%, and predictive value of a negative result 89.2% and 89.9%. Anaerobic culture was significantly more sensitive than the TestPack Strep A for detection of group A streptococci by both the pediatricians (P less than 0.005) and laboratory personnel (P less than 0.05).Putting rapid group A strep throat screening tests into perspective.Evaluation of two rapid antigen assays, BioStar Strep A OIA and Pacific Biotech CARDS O.S., and culture for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Two rapid methods, BioStar Strep A OIA (OIA; BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.), an optical immunoassay, and CARDS O.S. (O.S.; Pacific Biotech, Inc., San Diego, Calif.), a color immunochromographic assay, and two culture methods, one with 5% sheep blood agar (SBA) and one with Todd-Hewitt broth (TH; Remel, Lenexa, Kans.), were evaluated for use in the detection of Streptococcus pyogenes from pharnygeal swabs. Seven hundred forty-six double swabs (Culturette II) were processed, with OIA and SBA culture performed on one swab and O.S. and SBA culture performed on the other swab. The pledget from the Culturette II was incubated overnight in TH and was subcultured onto SBA for an additional 48 h in ambient air. All beta-hemolytic streptococci from culture were tested by a direct fluorescent-antibody test (Difco Laboratories, Detroit, Mich.). Specimens with discordant fluorescent-antibody test and rapid test results were also tested by using the Streptex latex agglutination reagent (Murex Diagnostics Limited, Dartford, England). The results obtained by all testing methods were compared with a combined test result ("gold standard"), which was defined as any positive culture detected by the SBA or TH culture methods and confirmed by Streptex latex agglutination or, in the case of negative results by both culture methods, a concomitant positive result by OIA and O.S. antigen testing. Sensitivity and specificity results for each of the methods were as follows, respectively: OIA, 81.0 and 97.5%; O.S., 74.4 and 99.0%; SBA culture, 92.3 and 98.3%; and TH culture, 86.4 and 100%. Both OIA and O.S. are suitable screening methods for detecting S. pyogenes directly from throat swabs but are of insufficient sensitivity to eliminate the need for backup cultures for specimens with negative OIA and O.S. results.Use of optical immunoassay to diagnose streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use of the rapid antigen technique in the diagnosis of Streptococcus pyogenes pharyngotonsillitis].Streptococcus pyogenes is the most frequent bacterial cause of acute tonsillopharyngitis. The validity of the rapid antigen test was analysed for its diagnosis in a Paediatric Primary Care setting. The clinical profile with better diagnostic yield was also identified. The unnecessary use of antibiotics was quantified when the rapid antigen test or only the clinical diagnosis was used. The sensitivity of the assay to penicillin, erythromycin and clindamycin was also determined.Cross-sectional study was conducted on children between 2 to 14 years with acute tonsillitis and/or pharyngitis seen in five Primary Care Centres, from January 2008 to May 2010. After a clinical diagnosis, two swabs were taken for pharyngotonsillar smears: the first was used for a rapid antigen test, and the second one for a culture and a study of antibiotic sensitivity, with its analysis being blind to the rapid test result. A total sample of 546 consecutive was envisaged and with consecutive sampling.A total 192 patients were included. The prevalence of Streptococcus pyogenes was 38.7% (95% CI: 31.4-45.7). Odynophagia and scarlatiniform rash were most likely with positive cultures, the Streptococcus pyogenes was sensitive to penicillin in 100%, to erythromycin in 97.3% and to clindamycin in 86.3%. The specificity of the rapid antigen test was 91.5% and with a Negative Predictive Value of 91.5%. About half (49.2%) of those who would have receive antibiotics for clinical suspicion would have been treated unnecessarily, with this decreasing to at least in 29.5% when using the rapid antigen test.The rapid antigen test can lead to a better use of antibiotics. Its use in Paediatric Primary Health Care could be useful when, as when the result is negative, there would be no need to confirm by a culture, in those Health Centres with difficult access to laboratory.The sensitivity and the specifity of rapid antigen test in streptococcal upper respiratory tract infections.It is aimed to detect the sensitivity and specificity of rapid antigen detection of group A beta hemolytic streptococci from throat specimen compared with throat culture. The other goal of the study is to help in giving clinical decisions in upper respiratory tract infections according to the age group, by detection of sensitivity and positive predictive values of the rapid tests and throat cultures.Rapid antigen detection and throat culture results for group A beta hemolytic streptococci from outpatients attending to our university hospital between the first of November 2005 and 31st of December 2008 were evaluated retrospectively. Throat samples were obtained by swabs from the throat and transported in the Stuart medium and Quickvue Strep A [Quidel, San Diego, USA] cassette test was applied and for culture, specimen was inoculated on 5% blood sheep agar and identified according to bacitracin and trimethoprim-sulphametaxazole susceptibility from beta hemolytic colonies.During the dates between the first of November 2005 and 31st of December 2008, from 453 patients both rapid antigen detection and throat culture were evaluated. Rapid antigen detection sensitivity and specificity were found to be 64.6% and 96.79%, respectively. The positive predictive value was 80.95% whereas negative predictive value was 92.82%. Kappa index was 0.91. When the results were evaluated according to the age groups, the sensitivity and the positive predictive value of rapid antigen detection in children were 70%, 90.3% and in adults 59.4%, 70.4%.When bacterial infection is concerned to prevent unnecessary antibiotic use, rapid streptococcal antigen test (RSAT) is a reliable method to begin immediate treatment. To get the maximum sensitivity of RSAT, the specimen collection technique used and education of the health care workers is important. While giving clinical decision, it must be taken into consideration that the sensitivity and the positive predictive value of the RSAT is quite lower in adult age group than in pediatric age group.Comparison of three methods for detection of group A streptococci in throat swabs.Group A streptococci are generally detected in throat swabs by (i) rapid antigen tests, (ii) conventional culture, or (iii) combinations of both. Direct fluorescent-antibody testing of a 2-h enrichment broth (FA/EN) was an accepted method for same-day results before the advent of rapid antigen tests. We compared FA/EN in Todd-Hewitt Broth (THB) with conventional culture and a rapid antigen test, TestPack Strep A (TPS). Nine hundred seventy specimens were evaluated in this study. Cultures were performed for 48 h on sheep blood agar (SBA) incubated aerobically and on a selective agar for group A streptococci (SSA) incubated in 5 to 10% CO2. Following a 2-h incubation, the fluorescent-antibody test was performed. A subculture of the centrifuged sediment from the THB enrichment was also done. In comparison with a positive culture on SBA or SSA or subculture of the THB pellet, the sensitivities and specificities of the different methods were as follows: SBA, 92 and 100%; SSA, 92 and 100%; TPS, 68 and 99%; FA/EN, 88 and 98%. The FA/EN method offers the potential for definitive finalized reports on the same day as specimen collection with greater sensitivity than TPS. This study included sequential plating and rapid antigen testing of a single swab. In a separate set of experiments to validate this study design, it was shown that recovery of streptococci from swabs plated sequentially on five plates did not vary with the order of plating and the actual proportion of organisms recovered from a swab on a single plate was only 1%.Throat culture is necessary after negative rapid antigen detection tests.This study was conducted to determine if culture confirmation is needed for a negative rapid antigen detection test. Data on 18,509 tests done in patients younger than 18 years old were reviewed. Of the 14,167 (76.5%) that were negative, 968 (6.8%) were associated with positive cultures. No significant seasonal variation was noted. Significant differences were found between hospital and pediatric practices in the percentage of patients with a negative rapid antigen detection test who actually had group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (3.5% to 9.8%). This study supports the recommendation of culture confirmation of a negative rapid antigen detection test and validation of results within an individual practice if confirmatory cultures are not being performed. This study showed a high false-negative rate of the negative rapid antigen detection test and variation among hospital and pediatric practices for rates of positive culture after a negative rapid antigen detection test.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.[Use in hospital of a rapid diagnosis test of group A streptococcal pharyngotonsillitis in children].Superiority of conventional culture technique over rapid detection of group A Streptococcus by optical immunoassay.An optical immunoassay (OIA) has been reported to be more sensitive than conventional culture for the detection of Group A Streptococcus, eliminating the need for culture. We attempted to confirm the sensitivity and specificity through a laboratory quantitation study and a clinical trial. OIA did not detect Group A Streptococcus below 10(5) colony forming units (CFU). Culture detected Streptococcus to 10(2) CFU from the inoculated swab. In the clinical study, throat swabs were obtained from 77 patients in an outpatient clinic. Compared with culture, the sensitivity of OIA was 78% and the specificity was 90%. These results demonstrate that OIA was less sensitive than culture in seeded experiments and missed 22% of positives in clinical practice. Our study, contrary to previous reports, suggests that OIA is not sensitive enough to be used as the sole assay for Group A Streptococcus pharyngitis.Evaluation of the therapy for streptococcal pharyngitis using Abbott Test Pack strep A.A total of 953 children (511 boys and 442 girls) with streptococcal pharyngitis diagnosed with Abbott Test Pack Strep A (ATPSA) or throat cultures were analyzed. ATPSA specimens were repeatedly obtained until ATPSA turned negative during or after the treatment. The percentage of positive ATPSA specimens reached the lowest value (9.2%) on the fourth day of the course of the treatment, which indicates the acquisition from an infected individual is probably uncommon after the initial treatment. Bacteriological treatment failure (positive ATPSA after 14 days of treatment) occurred in 4.1% of the children. Out of 953 subjects studied, 216 (22.7%) had recurrent infections. More than 30% of the recurrent infections occurred within 2 months after initial infection. ATPSA is useful for establishing a rapid diagnosis and confirming the bacteriological success of the treatment.[When "throats are visiting". Increased demands should be put on the rapid test].Evaluation of four methods for the detection of streptococcal group A antigen directly from throat swabs.We have compared the sensitivity, specificity and reproducibility of four rapid tests for the detection of group A beta-hemolytic streptococci antigen directly from a throat swab. The four methods were very specific, all of them offered reproductibility and surpassed conventional culture in speed and simplicity.Culture and antigen detection tests for streptococcal tonsillopharyngitis.Comparison of the Gen-Probe Group A streptococcus Direct Test with culture and a rapid streptococcal antigen detection assay for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.The Gen-Probe Group A Streptococcus Direct Test (GP-ST) is a new assay which utilizes a nucleic acid probe to detect group A streptococci directly from pharyngeal swabs. In this study, 1,103 specimens were cultured and tested by GP-ST. The sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 98.8 and 100%; GP-ST, 92.4 and 99.6%. Of the 1,103 specimens, 808 were also tested with the TestPack Strep A assay. For the specimens tested by all three methods, the sensitivities and specificities were as follows: culture, 99.5 and 100%; TestPack Strep A assay, 76.3 and 99.7%; GP-ST, 93.5 and 99.7%. The GP-ST is a very user-friendly assay which has the potential to replace culture for the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Insensitivity of rapid antigen detection methods and single blood agar plate culture for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis.To compare the sensitivity of five group A streptococcal antigen detection systems and single blood agar plate culture with a two-plate culture method for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.Two simultaneous throat swabs were obtained from consecutive patients with suspected streptococcal pharyngitis. One swab was tested for streptococcal antigen by physicians' office nurses and the other was cultured on both aerobic blood agar and anaerobic trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole blood agar plates.Community office practice and community hospital laboratory.Consecutive outpatients seen by one of four pediatricians or a family practice physician.Results of rapid streptococcal antigen tests were compared with culture results either on a single aerobic blood agar plate or on the two-plate culture method.On throat swabs from 755 consecutive outpatients, the two-plate culture method detected 261 cases (defined as 100%) of group A streptococcal pharyngitis. The anaerobic trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole plate alone, read at 1 and 2 days, detected 245 cases (94%). The blood agar plate used alone detected 189 cases (72%) at 2 days and 151 cases (58%) at 1 day. Antigen detection test results were positive for 106 throat specimens (41%), with individual kit sensitivity ranging from 31% to 50% compared with the two-plate culture method. Antigen detection test sensitivity decreased with decreasing colony counts. Antigen kit false-positivity rates varied from 0 to 28%.We conclude that the single blood agar plate culture and the antigen detection tests are insensitive, possibly leading the physician toward undertreatment and risking immunologic, local, or distant sequelae. The two-plate culture method should be the standard of practice to rule out streptococcal pharyngitis.Novel color test for rapid detection of group A streptococci.A novel color test for the rapid detection of group A streptococci has been developed. The test, designed to be suitable for use in clinical laboratories as well as by less experienced personnel, incorporates the simplicity of latex tests with a color change to indicate the presence of group A streptococcal antigen. The test, which takes 5 min, was evaluated with 646 throat swabs, with a 15.6% incidence of group A streptococci; for swabs which yielded 10 or more group A streptococcal colonies in cultures, the sensitivity was 96.8%, and the specificity was 99.1%. In addition, the color test was 100% sensitive and specific when used to detect group A streptococcal antigen in beta-hemolytic colonies from culture plates.Comparative evaluation of two indigenously developed tests for rapid detection of group-A streptococci directly from throat swabs.The efficacy of two indigenously developed rapid tests, latex agglutination and antibody capture assay (a colour immunochromatographic assay) to detect group A Streptococcus pyogenes (GAS) was evaluated in comparison with the traditional culture method ('Gold Standard') in both asymptomatic children (1500) and symptomatic patients (233). Throat swabs were taken in duplicate and rapid tests performed on one swab and culture on the other. Both latex agglutination and antibody capture assays showed a sensitivity of 100 per cent and specificity of > 98 per cent as compared to culture and isolation in symptomatic patients. However, among asymptomatic carriers sensitivity of 100 per cent and 87.5 per cent and specificity > 95 per cent were observed for latex agglutination and antibody capture assays respectively. Latex agglutination showed no false negative results and sensitivity was not affected by low beta-haemolytic counts in asymptomatic children. The rapid tests described here will help in the detection and thereby the management of GAS infection.Rapid detection of beta haemolytic streptococci.[Rapid diagnosis of pharyngotonsillitis using an ELISA method (Test Pack Strep A): comparison with culture and clinical data. Analysis of 306 cases].Spectrum and inoculum size effect of a rapid antigen detection test for group A streptococcus in children with pharyngitis.The stability of the accuracy of a diagnostic test is critical to whether clinicians can rely on its result. We aimed to assess whether the performance of a rapid antigen detection test (RADT) for group A streptococcus (GAS) is affected by the clinical spectrum and/or bacterial inoculum size.Throat swabs were collected from 785 children with pharyngitis in an office-based, prospective, multicenter study (2009-2010). We analysed the effect of clinical spectrum (i.e., the McIsaac score and its components) and inoculum size (light or heavy GAS growth) on the accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios and predictive values) of a RADT, with laboratory throat culture as the reference test. We also evaluated the accuracy of a McIsaac-score-based decision rule.GAS prevalence was 36% (95CI: 33%-40%). The inoculum was heavy for 85% of cases (81%-89%). We found a significant spectrum effect on sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratios and positive predictive value (p<0.05) but not negative predictive value, which was stable at about 92%. RADT sensitivity was greater for children with heavy than light inoculum (95% vs. 40%, p<0.001). After stratification by inoculum size, the spectrum effect on RADT sensitivity was significant only in patients with light inoculum, on univariate and multivariate analysis. The McIsaac-score-based decision rule had 99% (97%-100%) sensitivity and 52% (48%-57%) specificity.Variations in RADT sensitivity only occur in patients with light inocula. Because the spectrum effect does not affect the negative predictive value of the test, clinicians who want to rule out GAS can rely on negative RADT results regardless of clinical features if they accept that about 10% of children with negative RADT results will have a positive throat culture. However, such a policy is more acceptable in populations with very low incidence of complications of GAS infection.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal infection.Rapid enzyme fluorescence test for diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis.[Current diagnosis of acute pharyngitis].Throat infections with Group A Streptococci have a high incidence and are, therefore, a considerable health problem. It is, therefore, desirable to distinguish this bacterial infections from viral infections of the upper respiratory tract. We report about the application of an immunologic rapid antigen detection test for Group A Streptococci and its medical and economic implications.In a cross-sectional cohort study, 30 family physicians documented the application of the test in 519 patients. Follow-up costs were compared with 109 family physicians who did not have access to the test.40.27% of tests performed were positive for Streptococci. 99% of those patients received antibiotic treatment - predominantly with Penicillin. From those patients who had shown a negative test result, only 18.4% received antibiotic treatment. Both patients and physicians welcomed the availability of the test. We did not find any significant difference regarding the economic effect of the test.The employment of a rapid antigen detection test for Group A Streptococci in patients with acute pharyngitis increases therapeutic certitude and guideline-conform prescription of antibiotics among family physicians. We, therefore, assume that potential side effects of unnecessary antibiotic treatments could be minimized.The evaluation of SD Bioline Strep A rapid antigen test in acute pharyngitis in pediatric clinics.Acute pharyngitis is a very common respiratory tract infection. Rapid antigen tests (RATs) that detect group A streptococci (GAS) have an advantage over conventional throat culture in determining the cause of acute pharyngitis quickly. The efficiency of RAT should be good enough to be used in the laboratory or in the clinics.From October 2008 through February 2009, throat swabs were taken from 293 children with acute pharyngitis and conveyed to the Gyeongsang National University Hospital in a transport medium. Two swabs from each patient were inoculated onto a blood agar plate, then returned to the transport medium and stored at -20 degrees C for several months. After the samples were thawed at room temperature, the SD Bioline Strep A RAT (SD, Korea) was performed.The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of SD Bioline Strep A compared with throat culture were 95.9% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 93.6-98.2%), 91.8% (95% CI: 88.5-95.1%), 95.9% (95% CI: 93.6-98.2%), and 91.8% (95% CI: 88.5-95.1%), respectively.The SD Bioline Strep A RAT kit can be useful as an alternative to throat cultures in the clinics for rapid diagnosis of GAS pharyngitis and for an early decision on the use of antibiotics.Bacteriological examination of pharyngeal secretions.Evaluation of a rapid method for diagnosing streptococcal pharyngitis in an office laboratory.Performance of a predictive model for streptococcal pharyngitis in children.Group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus (GABHS) pharyngitis is a common childhood illness. The clinical diagnosis is difficult to determine and laboratory tests have limitations; hence, the condition is generally overdiagnosed and overtreated. Several clinical pediatric-specific predictive models have been published but none have been prospectively studied.To test the performance of a previously published predictive model for GABHS pharyngitis in children in different clinical settings and during different seasons.Prospective cohort study.Pediatric emergency department and 2 pediatric outpatient clinics.Children aged between 1 and 18 years with pharyngitis on initial examination at study sites between April 1, 1999, and March 31, 2000.Recording of clinical features during initial evaluation using a standardized form and recovery of GABHS from patients' throats using reference standard methods.Posttest probability for GABHS positive throat culture associated with the model's positive predictors (moderate to severe tonsillar swelling, cervical lymphadenopathy [moderate to severe tenderness and enlargement of cervical lymph nodes], scarletiniform rash, and the absence of coryza) and the models' negative predictors (absence of the above signs and the presence of coryza).Of 587 patients analyzed, 218 (37%) had a positive throat culture for GABHS. Forty-nine percent were boys. Mean +/- SD age was 6.7 +/- 3.9 years. There was no difference between the subsets within the sample. The posttest probability values for a positive throat culture associated with positive and negative predictors of the model were 79% and 12%, respectively.A pediatric predictive model for GABHS pharyngitis performed better than physicians' subjective estimates for a positive throat culture and was comparable with a rapid antigen detection test. The model performed consistently well in different populations and across seasons. It can be useful if reliable microbiological testing and/or follow-up are not attainable.Direct antigen test for group A streptococcal pharyngitis.Comparison of Visuwell enzyme immunoassay to culture for detection of group A Streptococcus in throat swab specimens.A microwell enzyme immunoassay (Visuwell) for direct detection of Group A streptococcal antigen from throat swab specimens has been developed. It incorporates urease conjugated antibody as the detector and is easily interpreted by a yellow to purple color change. Throat specimens obtained on rayon-tipped swabs were transported moist in modified Stuarts medium and cultured before being tested in Visuwell (n = 585, prevalence 17.1%, sensitivity 88%, specificity 92.4%, predictive value positive 70.4%, predictive value negative 97.4%, and accuracy 91.6%). In instances of discrepancy between culture and Visuwell, throat swab extracts were tested in a latex agglutination test. In 21 of 37 instances of Visuwell-positive, culture-negative specimens, latex agglutination was positive. Throat specimens obtained using double rayon swabs and transported to the laboratory dry had one swab cultured and the other tested in Visuwell (n = 280, prevalence 20.4%, sensitivity 75.4%, specificity 88.3%, predictive value positive 62.3%, predictive value negative 93.4%, and accuracy 85.7%). When 1+ culture positive specimens were considered negative, a sensitivity of 97.6% was obtained. In 14 of 26 instances of Visuwell-positive, culture-negative specimens, latex agglutination was positive. Cross-reaction with organisms other than Group A Streptococcus found in the oropharynx was negligible in Visuwell. Limit of detection of Group A streptococcal antigen was equivalent for Visuwell and latex agglutination.Better diagnosis and treatment of throat infections caused by group A beta-haemolytic streptococci.This study aims to assess the diagnostic value of a rapid streptococcal antigen test in addition to four clinical features in patients with sore throat, using throat culture and antibody titre as reference tests, and to evaluate the efficacy of the current antibiotics used in the treatment of throat infections caused by group A beta-haemolytic streptococcus (GABHS). Four clinical features (fever [history of] > or = 38 degrees C, lack of cough, tonsillar exudate, and anterior cervical lymphadenopathy) are recorded in 355 patients aged four years to > or =15 years. A rapid antigen diagnostic test (RADT) is performed, as well as a throat culture. Antistreptolysin O (ASO) titre is performed in patients 11 years. GABHS from patients are tested for susceptibility to different antibiotics. Throat cultures were positive for GABHS in 19% patients. Rapid tests were positive in 24%. Compared with throat culture, the rapid test gave a sensitivity of 91%, specificity of 91%, positive predictive value of 73% and a negative predictive value of 98%. For patients with three or four clinical features, however, the sensitivity was considerably higher at 97%. Using the ASO test as a reference, no association was found between RADT and culture results. Zithromax showed the highest prescription rate (25.5%) and produced a high cure rate (91%) in patients with GABHS pharyngitis.Management of group A streptococcus pharyngitis with a second-generation rapid strep screen: Strep A OIA.Empirical therapy of presumed group A streptococcus (GAS) pharyngitis leads to unnecessary and inappropriate use of antibiotics and pressure for emergence of resistant strains of common bacteria. Immunoassay technology has produced several rapid tests for GAS. The wide variations in diagnosis and treatment of acute pharyngitis are reviewed including the impact of rapid strep tests. Published studies comparing Strep A OIA to routine agar culture and other rapid strep screens are presented to assess the reliability and applicability of this novel assay. These data suggest that Strep A OIA may be superior to the "gold standard" throat culture and other rapid streptococcal antigen detection assays. Judicious use of Strep A OIA can result in rapid, precise diagnoses and eliminate unnecessary and inappropriate use of antibiotics. Careful antibiotic selection can reduce the pressure for emergence of resistant bacteria. This innovative, effective assay can contribute to a lessening of this serious clinical challenge.Streptococcal pharyngitis: impact of a high-sensitivity antigen test on physician outcome.The purpose of the present study was to determine whether the availability of results from a high-sensitivity, rapid test for group A streptococci (Strep A OIA; BioStar, Inc., Boulder, Colo.) improves physician outcome. The study population included 465 consecutive patients with symptoms of acute pharyngitis seen in two outpatient clinics in a large suburban medical center; one clinic, a walk-in clinic (WIC), primarily saw adult patients, and one clinic, a pediatric and adolescent medicine clinic (PED), primarily saw pediatric patients. We measured improvement in physician outcome by comparing physician intent for prescribing an antibiotic based on clinical impression with physician practice once the results of the Strep A OIA were known. Based upon intent, the physicians seeing WIC patients (WIC physicians) would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 42% of patients with cultures positive for group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS) and 61% of patients with cultures negative for GABHS. After receiving the results of the Strep A OIA, WIC physicians prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 81% of patients with positive cultures and 72% of patients with negative cultures. Based upon intent, the physicians seeing PED patients (PED physicians) would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 35% of patients with positive cultures and 77% of patients with negative cultures. After receiving the results of the Strep A OIA, PED physicians prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 90% of patients with positive cultures and 81% of patients with negative cultures. Based on a 14.5% prevalence of GABHS among WIC patients, Strep A OIA improved the overall WIC physician outcome from 58 to 74%. Based on a 31.5% prevalence of GABHS among PED patients, Strep A OIA improved the PED physician outcome from 64 to 84%. Had Strep A OIA alone guided therapeutic choice, physicians would have prescribed an appropriate antibiotic course for 95% of the patients at the time of the initial encounter. We conclude that the use of Strep A OIA improves physician outcome.Liposome immunoassay for rapid identification of group A streptococci directly from throat swabs.The Q Test Strep (Becton Dickinson and Co., Franklin Lakes, N.J.) is a new solid-phase liposome immunoassay for the rapid diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis. Compared with blood agar plate cultures, the Q Test Strep had a sensitivity of 91%, a specificity of 83%, a positive predictive value of 88%, and a negative predictive value of 87%. Liposome technology can be used to facilitate the rapid diagnosis of group A beta-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis.Sensitivity and specificity of rapid antigen detection testing for diagnosing pharyngitis in the emergency department.Acute pharyngitis in adults is primarily a viral infection; only about 10% of cases are of bacterial etiology. Most cases of bacterial pharyngitis are caused by group A beta-hemolytic streptococci (GABHS). One laboratory method for the diagnosis of GABHS is rapid antigen diagnostic testing (RADT), which can be processed during an emergency department visit and which has become a popular alternative to throat swab cultures. We conducted a study to define the sensitivity and specificity of RADT, using throat culture results as the gold standard, in 100 emergency department patients who presented with symptoms consistent with streptococcal pharyngitis. We found that RADT had a sensitivity of 68.2% (15 of 22), a specificity of 89.7% (70 of 78), a positive predictive value of 65.2% (15 of 23), and a negative predictive value of 90.9% (70 of 77). We conclude that RADT is useful in the emergency department when the clinical suspicion is GABHS, but results should be confirmed with a throat culture in patients whose RADT results are negative.Rapid detection of group A streptococci: comparative performance by nurses and laboratory technologists in pediatric satellite laboratories using three test kits.Rapid tests for detecting group A streptococci in throat swabs are often performed outside hospitals or commercial laboratories by individuals with little or no technical training. We compared the abilities of nurses and technologists to perform and interpret three commercial kits (Directigen 1-2-3, ICON Strep A, and Culturette Brand 10-Minute Strep A ID) in three hospital satellite locations (the emergency department, a walk-in emergency clinic, and a general pediatric clinic). When the three tests were compared with culture, the sensitivities of the tests as performed by nurses and technologists, respectively, were 39 versus 44% for Directigen, 55 versus 51% for Culturette, and 72 versus 39% for ICON. A significant difference in sensitivity was found only with ICON tests. This result was largely explained by the tendency of technologists to test moist swabs, while nurses generally processed dry swabs; ICON test sensitivity was significantly greater with dry swabs. The specificities of Directigen and ICON tests performed by nurses and technologists were high (97 to 100%). The difference in the specificities of the Culturette test as determined from results obtained by nurses and technologists (80 versus 98%) was due to the tendency of one nurse to overinterpret the latex agglutination reaction. Analysis of the accuracies of the tests during practice periods compared with the accuracies of the tests during the study periods revealed statistically significant improvement in test performance. We conclude that these tests are specific but not sensitive when performed by nurses and technologists in satellite laboratories. With one exception, nurses and technologists performed the tests with comparable accuracy after brief training periods.Diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis by detection of Streptococcus pyogenes in posterior pharyngeal versus oral cavity specimens.Carbohydrate antigen detection, nucleic acid probe detection, and bacterial culture are commonly used to confirm group A streptococcus (GAS) pharyngitis. Compared to standard throat swab specimens, the sensitivities of these tests with mouth specimens are poor. When testing for GAS pharyngitis, the throat remains the optimum site for sampling.Rapid diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis using enzyme immunoassay.Should a near-patient test be part of the management of pharyngitis in the pediatric emergency department?The study's objective was to evaluate the efficacy of a rapid streptococcal test as a single diagnostic agent in the diagnosis of streptococcal pharyngitis in patients presenting to a pediatric emergency department.We performed a rapid streptococcal test as part of the diagnostic workup for patients presenting with clinical findings consistent with streptococcal pharyngitis. In addition to undergoing the study intervention, each patient had a standard throat swab sent to the laboratory for formal culture. A questionnaire detailing the clinical features was to be completed in each case.Two hundred ten near-patient tests were performed. Complete laboratory results were available in 177 cases (77%). Clinical data were available for analysis in 94 patients (53%). In our patient population, the near-patient test had a high specificity (98.6%) but a low sensitivity (71%). The clinical presentation of confirmed group A β-hemolytic streptococcal pharyngitis is very variable.The QuickVue In-Line Strep A test for streptococcal pharyngitis is unreliable in our patient population. Clinical findings are unhelpful in confirming the diagnosis. Formal laboratory culture is the criterion standard for identifying the organism, but the results are not clinically significant in every case. Acute pharyngitis presenting to the pediatric emergency department can be managed in accordance with the recommendations in the Scottish Intercollegiate Guideline Network guideline.Performance of a solid phase enzyme immunoassay for detection of group A streptococci in a pediatric office laboratory as refereed by a hospital laboratory.We evaluated the performance of a new rapid solid phase enzyme immunoassay, SUDS Group A Strep (MUREX Corp., Norcross, GA) for the detection of Group A beta-hemolytic streptococci in a pediatric office practice. Duplicate throat swabs were obtained from 341 children with pharyngitis. One swab was used in the SUDS test and the other was cultured in the office laboratory. Office SUDS and culture (sheep blood agar plate, aerobic 24-hour incubation) were compared with culture using reference techniques (sheep blood agar plate, anaerobic 48-hour incubation) in a hospital laboratory. Compared with hospital laboratory culture, the sensitivity of office SUDS (73.8%) was superior to that of office culture (66.6%) at P = 0.05. Specificities were 93.1 and 98.6%, respectively; positive predictive values were 86.1 and 96.6%; and negative predictive values were 85.9 and 83.5%. The sensitivity and specificity of SUDS compared with office culture were 88.5 and 87.8%, respectively, but would have been 93 and 94% had hemolyzed media not been used on several occasions in the office culture procedure. We conclude that SUDS Group A Strep was significantly more sensitive than throat cultures as performed in a typical pediatric practice although the performance of office cultures could have been improved by standard quality control techniques.